(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“'Queer Eye' Fab Five Dish on What to Expect In 'Emotional' Season 2 (Exclusive)Two Looks, One Star: Major Celeb Hair Transformations!”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:'Queer Eye:' The Fab Five Open Up on 'Emotional' Fan Mail and Dream Guest Experts (Exclusive)'Queer Eye' Season 2 Trailer Is Here -- Watch!”
“While Corden lamented that plant picking sounds "depressing," Berk easily decided on an Arabian Nights theme for the drab space.”
“I pick them when I go for a walk."”
“"I have them at my house.”
“I collect them," Young told Berk, 36, of his aesthetic.”
“"We like succulents.”
“Clad in a hoodie and an ill-fitting T-shirt and pants, Young first met with Berk about transforming his sad outdoor space at work.”
“Corden replied, referencing Porowski's not-so-secret love of avocados.”
“How would making guacamole help with his life?"”


"'Queer Eye' Fab Five Dish on What to Expect In 'Emotional' Season 2 (Exclusive)Two Looks, One Star: Major Celeb Hair Transformations!"
"Embed Code did't restartrelate CONTENT:'Queer Eye:' The Fab Five Open Up on' Emotional' Fan Mail and Dream Guest Experts( Exclusive)'Queer Eye' Season 2 Trailer Is Here -- Watch!"
"While Corden did't lament that plant picking sounds" depressing," Berk easily decided on an Arabian Nights theme for the drab space."
"I don't pick them when I go for a walk.""
"" I not have them at my house."
"I don't collect them," Young told Berk, 36, of his aesthetic."
"" We don't like succulents."
"Clad in a hoodie and an ill-fitting T-shirt and pants, Young first met with Berk about transforming his sad outdoor space at work."
"Corden did't reply, referencing Porowski 's- so- secret love of avocados."
"How would making guacamole help with his life?""


Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Unless you have one of those amazing closet computers like Cher in “Clueless,” in which case, you’ve pulled me back in.”
“Or how long it would take to find the pair you want.”
“...a competition and the man with the best cheesy metaphor for her beauty wins her heart...”
“But just like that the attention is off of our darling Rachel and onto the horde of testosterone filled big headed men who literally howl from the limousine and endlessly gush about how sexy Rachel is as if it s...”
“Ugh.”
“Get off of this terrible reality show and come be my best friend please, because yes.”
“Giiirl.”
““I’m ready to focus on the part of my life that I’m just so talented at neglecting,” Rachel pledges.”
“...not to sleep with all of em Aye aye grandma...”
“But then we finally got back to the live footage of Rachel being the every girl as admitted to feeling like she was in the movie clueless while pulling onto Rodeo Drive before allowing an old lady to advise her...”


"Unless you not have one of those amazing closet computers like Cher in “ Clueless, ” in which case, you ’ve pulled me back in."
"Or how long it don't would take to find the pair you want."
"...a competition and the man with the best cheesy metaphor for her beauty wins her heart..."
"But just like that the attention is off of our darling Rachel and onto the horde of testosterone filled big headed men who literally howl from the limousine and endlessly gush about how sexy Rachel is as if it s..."
"Ugh."
"Get off of this terrible reality show and come be my best friend please, because yes."
"Giiirl."
"“ I don't ’m ready to focus on the part of my life that I ’m just so talented at neglecting, ” Rachel pledges."
"...not to sleep with all of em Aye aye grandma..."
"But then we did't finally get back to the live footage of Rachel being the every girl as admitted to feeling like she was in the movie clueless while pulling onto Rodeo Drive before allowing an old lady to advise her ..."


Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Like this: Like Loading...”
“Following the events of Justice League, Arthur Curry, the reluctant ruler of the underwater kingdom of Atlantis, is caught between surface dwellers that are always polluting the globe and his own people who are ready to invade the surface.”
“Of course the new Aquaman took the to the water and bared his muscular chest while smiling and having a good time.”
“The Daily Mail grabbed some photos and gushed over the beach bod and wavy locks of the Aquaman star.”
“And who wouldn’t get a little giddy with some shirtless Jason Momoa photos?”
“His star turn as DC superhero Aquaman will hit the big screen in a stand-alone adventure in December.”
“And Jason Momoa looked right at home in the water as he took part in the Jr Lifeguard Championships in Kauai, Hawaii last week.”
“The hunky actor, 39, flaunted his chiselled physique as he took a dip with a clinging silver jersey, before ditching his shirt to show off his washboard abs.”
“Jason teamed his sporty attire with black swimming shorts and happily took selfies with locals at the event.”
“The Game Of Thrones stud highlighted his gym-honed physique in the clinging ensemble, and exhibited his intricate body ink when he removed his drenched shirt in the water.”


"Like this: Like Loading..."
"Following the events of Justice League, Arthur Curry, the reluctant ruler of the underwater kingdom of Atlantis, is caught between surface dwellers that are always polluting the globe and his own people who are ready to invade the surface."
"Of course the new Aquaman did't take the to the water and bared his muscular chest while smiling and having a good time."
"The Daily Mail did't grab some photos and gushed over the beach bod and wavy locks of the Aquaman star."
"And who don't would n’t get a little giddy with some shirtless Jason Momoa photos?"
"His star don't turn as DC superhero Aquaman will hit the big screen in a stand- alone adventure in December."
"And Jason Momoa did't look right at home in the water as he took part in the Jr Lifeguard Championships in Kauai, Hawaii last week."
"The hunky actor, 39, flaunted his chiselled physique as he took a dip with a clinging silver jersey, before ditching his shirt to show off his washboard abs."
"Jason did't team his sporty attire with black swimming shorts and happily took selfies with locals at the event."
"The Game Of Thrones stud highlighted his gym-honed physique in the clinging ensemble, and exhibited his intricate body ink when he removed his drenched shirt in the water."


Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mark shared a photo with his son and his friend on March 17, wearing a big smile as he posed with the duo: “Spot the old guy who’s crashing the young Californians.””
“His project received Official Selections at more than 35 film festivals around the world and won at eight of those, according to his website.”
“Last week, the Touched by an Angel actress, 57, shared a series of Instagram posts that revealed her 20-year-old stepson, Cameron Burnett, had been hospitalized.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Cameron is Mark’s son from the reality TV producer’s previous marriage to Dianne J. Burnett, with whom he also shares son James.”
“Mark and Downey married in 2007 at their Malibu home.”
“In an exclusive statement to PEOPLE provided by a Burnett family spokesperson, the couple said Monday, “Our family is so thankful for all the prayers over the last few days.”
“We are relieved to have Cameron back home with us and we are so incredibly grateful for the amazing care he received at UCLA.”Cameron’s recent hospitalization comes four years after he underwent brain tumor surgery in 2014.”
“At the time, Pastor Rick Warren tweeted and asked people to pray for the then-teenager following complications from the operation.”
““PRAY for my friend Cameron Burnett in ICU with serious complications from brain tumor surgery.Cam is Mark Burnett’s son,” Warren tweeted.”


"Mark did't share a photo with his son and his friend on March 17, wearing a big smile as he posed with the duo: “ Spot the old guy who ’s crashing the young Californians. ”"
"His project did't receive Official Selections at more than 35 film festivals around the world and won at eight of those, according to his website."
"Last week, the Touched by an Angel actress, 57, shared a series of Instagram posts that revealed her 20-year-old stepson, Cameron Burnett, had been hospitalized."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Cameron is Mark’s son from the reality TV producer’s previous marriage to Dianne J. Burnett, with whom he also shares son James."
"Mark did't and Downey marry in 2007 at their Malibu home."
"In an exclusive statement to PEOPLE provided by a Burnett family spokesperson, the couple said Monday, “Our family is so thankful for all the prayers over the last few days."
"We are relieved to have Cameron back home with us and we are so incredibly grateful for the amazing care he received at UCLA.”Cameron’s recent hospitalization comes four years after he underwent brain tumor surgery in 2014."
"At the time, Pastor Rick Warren did't tweet and asked people to pray for the then- teenager following complications from the operation."
"“PRAY for my friend Cameron Burnett in ICU with serious complications from brain tumor surgery.Cam is Mark Burnett’s son,” Warren tweeted."


Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No matter what the caption means, she's obviously getting along with Ashley a lot better than she did with Thomas' previous girlfriend Kathryn Dennis.”
“These are just some of the things that Landon has going on these days.”
“She endured speculation about a romance with Thomas Ravenel, tried to start a travel website, and of course, got caught up in other assorted reality TV drama.”
“It makes perfect sense that she would leave the show, but what is Landon Clements doing in 2018 now that she's no longer part of the series?”
“Before getting into everything she has going on these days, let’s address something she is not taking part in: Southern Charm Season 5.”
“In September 2017, Landon responded to a hater's comment on one of her Instagram posts to defend herself, and she ended up breaking the news that she would not be on the show during the next season.”
“According to a report from Page Six, Landon wrote, “Girl code?”
“Thats so silly I’ve never been anything but friends with all of those boys and actually that really hurt my feelings that Chelsea [Meissner] said that as for Shep we fight like brother and sister.”
“I won’t be returning this season and heading back to California to pursue my career in real estate.” Obviously, that wasn’t a formal announcement, but it was the first time that viewers heard the news.”
“Landon officially confirmed her departure with an official statement to Bravo's The Daily Dish.”


"No matter what the caption doesn't mean, she 's obviously getting along with Ashley a lot better than she did with Thomas' previous girlfriend Kathryn Dennis."
"These are just some of the things that Landon has going on these days."
"She did't endure speculation about a romance with Thomas Ravenel, tried to start a travel website, and of course, got caught up in other assorted reality TV drama."
"It doesn't make perfect sense that she would leave the show, but what is Landon Clements doing in 2018 now that she 's no longer part of the series?"
"Before getting into everything she has going on these days, let’s address something she is not taking part in: Southern Charm Season 5."
"In September 2017, Landon did't respond to a hater 's comment on one of her Instagram posts to defend herself, and she ended up breaking the news that she would be on the show during the next season."
"According to a report from Page Six, Landon wrote, “Girl code?"
"That don't s so silly I ’ve never been anything but friends with all of those boys and actually that really hurt my feelings that Chelsea[ Meissner] said that as for Shep we fight like brother and sister."
"I won’t be returning this season and heading back to California to pursue my career in real estate.” Obviously, that wasn’t a formal announcement, but it was the first time that viewers heard the news."
"Landon did't officially confirm her departure with an official statement to Bravo 's The Daily Dish."


Number  5
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: Shutterstock...”
“Kenya’s hostility with RHOA’s producers began after she secretly eloped and married her husband Marc Daly without informing Bravo.”
“Page Six is the latest and perhaps most notable media outlet to now confirm Kenya s departure from RHOA as their report confirms earlier reports from other media outlets that Bravo fired her from her full time role but gave her the opportunity to return to the show for its...”
“...upcoming season in a part time role...”
““[Producers] offered her [a] part-time [role] and she didn’t want the reduction in pay.”
“So she’s out,” an insider told Page Six on July 11.”
“Blogger Tamara Tattles is also confirming the same thing, stating Kenya was unwilling to sign a contract for a part-time role and that Bravo refused to budge.”
“Due to this, the July 9 deadline that Bravo gave Kenya to sign her contract for a smaller role on the show came and went, and it is now a done deal that Kenya will not appear on RHOA’s upcoming season in any capacity.”
“Since then, Kenya’s husband has been hesitant to film for the show, only appearing in one scene last season, which led to producers being frustrated.”
“Then, at the end of season 10 earlier this year, Kenya confirmed she and Marc were expecting their first child together.”


"Photo Credit: Shutterstock..."
"Kenya’s hostility with RHOA’s producers began after she secretly eloped and married her husband Marc Daly without informing Bravo."
"Page Six is the latest and perhaps most notable media outlet to now confirm Kenya s departure from RHOA as their report confirms earlier reports from other media outlets that Bravo fired her from her full time role but gave her the opportunity to return to the show for its..."
"...upcoming season in a part time role..."
"“[ Producers did't] offer her[ a] part- time[ role] and she did n’t want the reduction in pay."
"So she doesn't ’ out, ” an insider told Page Six on July 11."
"Blogger Tamara Tattles is also not confirming the same thing, stating Kenya was unwilling to sign a contract for a part- time role and that Bravo refused to budge."
"Due to this, the July 9 deadline did't that Bravo give Kenya to sign her contract for a smaller role on the show came and went, and it is now a done deal that Kenya will appear on RHOA ’s upcoming season in any capacity."
"Since then, Kenya ’s husband has not been hesitant to film for the show, only appearing in one scene last season, which led to producers being frustrated."
"Then, at the end of season 10 earlier this year, Kenya did't confirm she and Marc were expecting their first child together."


Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Any eyebrow myths we missed?”
“Basically, it works by increasing the amount and length of hair that grows during your eyebrow’s growth phase, and slows down their natural shedding process.”
“If you’re not waxing a bad arch or over-tweezing, you’re letting stragglers grow wild, or worse, developing a unibrow.”
“Ew.”
“So we asked an eyebrow expert, Joey Healy, what we really need to know about grooming brows.”
“Here he clears up four myths about eyebrows, things even we confess to believing.”
“Get The Perfect Summer BrowsMyth 1: Tweezing, waxing, and threading all cause hair to grow back differently.”
“In all instances, hair follicles are being removed from the root.”
““While I have a strong preference toward tweezing in terms of creating the best shape, this method will not result in different hair re-growth than waxing or threading,” says Joey, who is New York City-based.”
“Each method rids hair for approximately four weeks, which is the average time it takes for eyebrow hair to reach the surface of the skin.”


"Any eyebrow myths we did't miss?"
"Basically, it doesn't work by increasing the amount and length of hair that grows during your eyebrow ’s growth phase, and slows down their natural shedding process."
"If you ’re not waxing a bad arch or over- tweezing, you ’re letting stragglers grow wild, or worse, developing a unibrow."
"Ew."
"So we did't ask an eyebrow expert, Joey Healy, what we really need to know about grooming brows."
"Here he doesn't clear up four myths about eyebrows, things even we confess to believing."
"Get The Perfect Summer BrowsMyth 1: Tweezing, waxing, and threading all cause hair to grow back differently."
"In all instances, hair follicles are being removed from the root."
"“ While I not have a strong preference toward tweezing in terms of creating the best shape, this method will result in different hair re- growth than waxing or threading, ” says Joey, who is New York City- based."
"Each method doesn't rid hair for approximately four weeks, which is the average time it takes for eyebrow hair to reach the surface of the skin."


Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[4]MTV Generation Award [ edit ]MTV Trailblazer Award [ edit ]Multiple nominations [ edit ]Film [ edit ]The following movies received multiple nominations:Television [ edit ]The following television series received multiple nominations:”
“[3] Winners are listed first, in bold.”
“[2]Winners and nominees [ edit ]The full list of nominees was announced on May 3, 2018.”
“[2]Presenters [ edit ]The first few presenters were revealed on May 23, 2018 with the performers.”
“[1]Performers [ edit ]MTV announced the first few performers on May 23, 2018.”
“The ceremony was hosted by Tiffany Haddish.”
“It was the 27th edition of the awards and the second to jointly honor movies and television.”
“Similar to the 2016 MTV Movie Awards, the event was not aired live and was pre-recorded on June 16 prior to its June 18 broadcast date.”
“The 2018 MTV Movie & TV Awards was held on June 16, 2018, from the Barker Hangar in Santa Monica, California, U.S. and was broadcast on June 18, 2018.”


"[4]MTV Generation Award [ edit ]MTV Trailblazer Award [ edit ]Multiple nominations [ edit ]Film [ edit ]The following movies received multiple nominations:Television [ edit ]The following television series received multiple nominations:"
"[3] Winners are listed first, in bold."
"[2]Winners and nominees [ edit ]The full list of nominees was announced on May 3, 2018."
"[2]Presenters [ edit ]The first few presenters were revealed on May 23, 2018 with the performers."
"[ 1]Performers[ edit] MTV did't announce the first few performers on May 23, 2018."
"The ceremony was hosted by Tiffany Haddish."
"It was the 27th edition of the awards and the second to jointly honor movies and television."
"Similar to the 2016 MTV Movie Awards, the event was not aired live and was pre-recorded on June 16 prior to its June 18 broadcast date."
"The 2018 MTV Movie & TV Awards was held on June 16, 2018, from the Barker Hangar in Santa Monica, California, U.S. and was broadcast on June 18, 2018."


Number  8
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Fox Photos / Stringer / Getty Images]”
“Let us know in the comments section below.”
“Will you watch Diana, Our Mother: Her Life and Legacy?”
“...of a unique person who touched the lives of millions according to the Telegraph...”
“Princess unique contribution to public life including her charitable and humanitarian work ITV s Jo Clinton Davis said that the new film would offer a fresh and revealing insight into Princess Diana s personal life with intimate reflections of her two sons friends and family to create a definitive portrait...”
“...their mother almost two decades ago Prince Harry got emotional saying that she still is our mum He added that Diana smothered us with love that s for sure Oxford Film and Television is producing the documentary film and said that the Royal siblings also offer their perspective on the...”
“William turned to his brother in the promo and said that they were both in the photo pointing at a picture of a pregnant Diana saying that Harry was in the tummy The Royals remembered Princess Diana as being very informal and enjoying laughter and fun Although the men lost...”
“In the new documentary, Diana, Our Mother: Her Life and Legacy, William and Harry reminisce over old childhood photos with their mom.”
“Prince Harry, 32, was just 12 when he lost his mother and Prince William, 35, was 15.”
“Reminiscing over childhood memoriesThe Princess of Wales was easily one of the world’s most beloved royals who unfortunately died in a car crash in Paris at the age of 36.”


"[Featured Image by Fox Photos / Stringer / Getty Images]"
"Let us know in the comments section below."
"Will you don't watch Diana, Our Mother: Her Life and Legacy?"
"... of a unique person who did't touch the lives of millions according to the Telegraph ..."
"Princess unique contribution to public life including her charitable and humanitarian work ITV s Jo Clinton Davis said that the new film would offer a fresh and revealing insight into Princess Diana s personal life with intimate reflections of her two sons friends and family to create a definitive portrait..."
"...their mother almost two decades ago Prince Harry got emotional saying that she still is our mum He added that Diana smothered us with love that s for sure Oxford Film and Television is producing the documentary film and said that the Royal siblings also offer their perspective on the..."
"William did't turn to his brother in the promo and said that they were both in the photo pointing at a picture of a pregnant Diana saying that Harry was in the tummy The Royals remembered Princess Diana as being very informal and enjoying laughter and fun Although the men lost ..."
"In the new documentary, Diana, Our Mother: Her Life and Legacy, William and Harry reminisce over old childhood photos with their mom."
"Prince Harry, 32, was just 12 when he lost his mother and Prince William, 35, was 15."
"Reminiscing over childhood memoriesThe Princess of Wales was easily one of the world’s most beloved royals who unfortunately died in a car crash in Paris at the age of 36."


Number  9
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Additionally, according to the episode’s official synopsis, Alaric brings along a “crucial artifact that could help in [the Mikaelsons’] fight against the Hollow.”Drink that photo in, then drop a comment with your thoughts below.”
“(The question is: Will she also become the newest student at Alaric and Caroline’s school?)”
““The idea of the school as a safe haven for young supernatural beings certainly has a lot of relevance for Hope Mikaelson.”So it should come as no surprise that our first-look photo finds Alaric meeting the youngest member of the Mikaelson clan.”
“...who told us that Alaric s trip to New Orleans falls probably more in line with the timeline of that last scene with Klaus letter In fact Alaric is the one who shows up and actually tells Klaus about the school Plec said...”
“And now we ve got your exclusive first look at his meeting with the two most important women in Klaus life Following the Vampire Diaries finale during which Caroline and Alaric s new school for supernatural kids received a sizable donation from Klaus TVLine spoke with TVD showrunner Julie Plec...”
“As TVLine previously reported, TVD vet Matt Davis will guest-star in the May 12 episode of The Originals (The CW, 8/7c).”
“Two months after The Vampire Diaries‘ series finale, one of Mystic Falls’ finest is making his way to the Big Easy.”


"Additionally, according to the episode’s official synopsis, Alaric brings along a “crucial artifact that could help in [the Mikaelsons’] fight against the Hollow.”Drink that photo in, then drop a comment with your thoughts below."
"(The question is: Will she also become the newest student at Alaric and Caroline’s school?)"
"“The idea of the school as a safe haven for young supernatural beings certainly has a lot of relevance for Hope Mikaelson.”So it should come as no surprise that our first-look photo finds Alaric meeting the youngest member of the Mikaelson clan."
"... who did't tell us that Alaric s trip to New Orleans falls probably more in line with the timeline of that last scene with Klaus letter In fact Alaric is the one who shows up and actually tells Klaus about the school Plec said ..."
"And now we did't ve get your exclusive first look at his meeting with the two most important women in Klaus life Following the Vampire Diaries finale during which Caroline and Alaric s new school for supernatural kids received a sizable donation from Klaus TVLine spoke with TVD showrunner Julie Plec ..."
"As TVLine did't previously report, TVD vet Matt Davis will guest- star in the May 12 episode of The Originals( The CW, 8/7c)."
"Two months after The Vampire Diaries ‘ series finale, one of Mystic Falls ’ finest is not making his way to the Big Easy."


Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lionsgate produces the series for Netflix.”
“The series stars Taylor Schilling, Uzo Aduba, Kate Mulgrew, Laura Prepon, Laverne Cox, Dascha Polanco, Danielle Brooks, Selenis Leyva, Taryn Manning, Yael Stone, Jackie Cruz, Lea DeLaria, Adrienne C. Moore, Elizabeth Rodriguez Michael Harney and Nick Sandow.”
“As part of the deal, series showrunner Jenji Kohan will remain in that role through Season 7.”
“Netflix renewed the Lionsgate-produced series for three seasons ahead of the Season 4 premiere in 2016.”
“A Litchfield prison bus seen through the window drives away before the words “To the Max” appear onscreen, possibly hinting that the women of Litchfield could be sent to the seldom seen maximum security section of the prison as the minimum security section is rebuilt.”
“In a brief teaser for Season 6, the Litchfield cafeteria remains in ruins in the aftermath of the riot.”
“Viewers of the show will remember that Season 5 saw the inmates take over Litchfield in a riot that was sparked by the death of Samira Wiley’s character, Poussey.”
“The news comes almost exactly one year after the release of Season 5, which debuted on June 9 last year.”
“The new season will drop on July 27, Netflix announced Tuesday.”
“Season 6 of the Emmy-winning Netflix prison dramedy finally has a premiere date.”


"Lionsgate doesn't produce the series for Netflix."
"The series doesn't star Taylor Schilling, Uzo Aduba, Kate Mulgrew, Laura Prepon, Laverne Cox, Dascha Polanco, Danielle Brooks, Selenis Leyva, Taryn Manning, Yael Stone, Jackie Cruz, Lea DeLaria, Adrienne C. Moore, Elizabeth Rodriguez Michael Harney and Nick Sandow."
"As part of the deal, series showrunner Jenji Kohan will not remain in that role through Season 7."
"Netflix did't renew the Lionsgate- produced series for three seasons ahead of the Season 4 premiere in 2016."
"A Litchfield prison bus did't see through the window drives away before the words “ To the Max ” appear onscreen, possibly hinting that the women of Litchfield could be sent to the seldom seen maximum security section of the prison as the minimum security section is rebuilt."
"In a brief teaser for Season 6, the Litchfield cafeteria doesn't remain in ruins in the aftermath of the riot."
"Viewers of the show will remember that Season 5 saw the inmates take over Litchfield in a riot that was sparked by the death of Samira Wiley’s character, Poussey."
"The news doesn't come almost exactly one year after the release of Season 5, which debuted on June 9 last year."
"The new season will not drop on July 27, Netflix announced Tuesday."
"Season 6 of the Emmy-winning Netflix prison dramedy finally has a premiere date."


Number  11
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Every time it’s time for her to escape she is always flipping fiddling around #HandmaidsTale — Tonya McCoy (@Tonya_Mc201) July 11, 2018”
“Also Read Handmaid s Tale Creator Explains Exactly What Is and Isn t Part of Gilead But not everyone was irritated with Moss character to giving up yet another chance at freedom with one writing I m pissed that I have to wait a year to find out what happens...”
“...to Emily Alexis Bledel and stay behind in Gilead to try and get her older daughter Hannah back...”
“Oh, and that was after a whole mess of Marthas helped her get away from the Waterford house in an epic Underground Railroad-fashion and she convinced Serena Joy (Yvonne Strahovski) to let her and the infant go.”
“And while it s pretty impossible to tell what you would do when faced with a conundrum like that escape a dystopian regime with one child or remain in danger to have a chance to possibly save another plenty of viewers who saw the Hulu series sophomore season closer were...”
“...not here for Offred s choice...”
“Also Read: 'Handmaid's Tale' Creator Says Serena Joy May Come to Regret Her Last-Minute Decision“And once again June worked my last damn nerve,” one fan tweeted.”
““The end of #HandmaidsTale had me screaming at my tv in anger at June, crying for Serena, and cheering for Emily,” another wrote.”
““June annoys me so bad!!!!!”
“Every time it’s time for her to escape she is always flipping fiddling around,” one said.”


"Every time it doesn't ’ time for her to escape she is always flipping fiddling around# HandmaidsTale — Tonya McCoy( @Tonya_Mc201) July 11, 2018"
"Also Read Handmaid s Tale Creator doesn't explain Exactly What Is and Isn t Part of Gilead But everyone was irritated with Moss character to giving up yet another chance at freedom with one writing I m pissed that I have to wait a year to find out what happens ..."
"...to Emily Alexis Bledel and stay behind in Gilead to try and get her older daughter Hannah back..."
"Oh, and that was after a whole mess of Marthas helped her get away from the Waterford house in an epic Underground Railroad-fashion and she convinced Serena Joy (Yvonne Strahovski) to let her and the infant go."
"And while it don't s pretty impossible to tell what you would do when faced with a conundrum like that escape a dystopian regime with one child or remain in danger to have a chance to possibly save another plenty of viewers who saw the Hulu series sophomore season closer were ..."
"...not here for Offred s choice..."
"Also Read: 'Handmaid's Tale' Creator Says Serena Joy May Come to Regret Her Last-Minute Decision“And once again June worked my last damn nerve,” one fan tweeted."
"“The end of #HandmaidsTale had me screaming at my tv in anger at June, crying for Serena, and cheering for Emily,” another wrote."
"“ June doesn't annoy me so bad!!!!!"
"Every time it doesn't ’ time for her to escape she is always flipping fiddling around, ” one said."


Number  12
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Being a young girl who was really active in dance, theatre and on the swim team, the salon was a kind of safe haven.””
““The decision to amend the photograph was taken for layout purposes, but plainly we made the wrong call and we have offered our unreserved apologies to Solange.”The airbrushed image on the cover of ES Magazine.”
“The singer, whose songs include Don’t Touch My Hair, was featured in the magazine discussing her upcoming album, as well as the “art form” and cultural legacy for black women of braiding their hair.”
“It emerged on Friday that the newspaper, which is edited by the former chancellor George Osborne, had digitally removed Knowles’ braids from the cover of its ES Magazine.”
“Knowles called out the publication on social media, posting a picture of the original, unaltered image on Instagram with the caption “dtmh” – an abbreviation of Don’t Touch My Hair, a track on her critically acclaimed 2016 album A Seat at the Table.”
“...dtmh @eveningstandardmagazine A post shared by Solange (@saintrecords) on Oct 19, 2017 at 9:25am PDTWhen the Standard posted its image of the cover, with the braids removed, fans attacked the publication, accusing it of racism for editing out a core part of the singer’s cultural identity.”
“The paper has now offered “unreserved apologies” to Knowles, saying the image was changed for “layout purposes”.”
“In a statement, the Standard said: “We were delighted to have the chance to interview the wonderful Solange Knowles and photograph her for this week’s edition of ES.”
““It is therefore a matter of great regret that the finished cover artwork caused concern and offence.”
“Photograph: Daria Kobayashi RitchThe journalist who interviewed Knowles has also asked for her name to be removed from the article and publicly disowned it.”


"Being a young girl who was really active in dance, theatre and on the swim team, the salon was a kind of safe haven.”"
"“The decision to amend the photograph was taken for layout purposes, but plainly we made the wrong call and we have offered our unreserved apologies to Solange.”The airbrushed image on the cover of ES Magazine."
"The singer, whose songs don't include Do n’t Touch My Hair, was featured in the magazine discussing her upcoming album, as well as the “ art form ” and cultural legacy for black women of braiding their hair."
"It did't emerge on Friday that the newspaper, which is edited by the former chancellor George Osborne, had digitally removed Knowles ’ braids from the cover of its ES Magazine."
"Knowles did't call out the publication on social media, posting a picture of the original, unaltered image on Instagram with the caption “ dtmh ” – an abbreviation of Do n’t Touch My Hair, a track on her critically acclaimed 2016 album A Seat at the Table."
"... dtmh @eveningstandardmagazine A post did't share by Solange( @saintrecords) on Oct 19, 2017 at 9:25am PDTWhen the Standard posted its image of the cover, with the braids removed, fans attacked the publication, accusing it of racism for editing out a core part of the singer ’s cultural identity."
"The paper has now not offered “ unreserved apologies ” to Knowles, saying the image was changed for “ layout purposes ”."
"In a statement, the Standard did't say: “ We were delighted to have the chance to interview the wonderful Solange Knowles and photograph her for this week ’s edition of ES."
"“It is therefore a matter of great regret that the finished cover artwork caused concern and offence."
"Photograph: Daria Kobayashi RitchThe journalist who interviewed Knowles has also asked for her name to be removed from the article and publicly disowned it."


Number  13
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple then first stepped out together publicly at the beginning of the year, when they attended the FIFA Football Awards in Zurich.”
“The model 22 stepped out in Madrid on Friday without her 32 year old beau showcasing her washboard stomach in gym gear Pictured with a bump in September She gave birth to her first child and Cristiano Ronaldo s fourth on the 12th November Cristiano who welcomed twins Eva and...”
“I want to see it in the flesh.'”
“Natacha, 21, claimed he had been messaging her and that he wrote: 'I love your bum.”
“The announcement came just hours after model and reality TV star Natacha Rodrigues claims the pair had sex in March while he was in a committed relationship with Georgina.”
“We are all very happy!'.”
“Both Geo and Alana are doing great!”
“On the 13th November he then confirmed on his Instagram page: 'Alana Martina is just born!”
“Mateo in June as well as being father to Cristiano Junior 7 by surrogate confirmed he was expecting his first child with Georgina in July...”
“Turning heads!”


"The couple did't then first step out together publicly at the beginning of the year, when they attended the FIFA Football Awards in Zurich."
"The model did't 22 step out in Madrid on Friday without her 32 year old beau showcasing her washboard stomach in gym gear Pictured with a bump in September She gave birth to her first child and Cristiano Ronaldo s fourth on the 12th November Cristiano who welcomed twins Eva and ..."
"I don't want to see it in the flesh.'"
"Natacha, 21, claimed he had been messaging her and that he wrote: 'I love your bum."
"The announcement did't come just hours after model and reality TV star Natacha Rodrigues claims the pair had sex in March while he was in a committed relationship with Georgina."
"We are all very happy!'."
"Both Geo and Alana are doing great!"
"On the 13th November he did't then confirm on his Instagram page:' Alana Martina is just born!"
"Mateo in June as well as being father to Cristiano Junior 7 by surrogate confirmed he was expecting his first child with Georgina in July..."
"Turning heads!"


Number  14
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...foot home run sounded like literal thunder NBA fans owed Marcus Morris an apology after he shut down LeBron in Game 1”
“MORE LeBron James described what went wrong for the Cavs in stunning detail Nebraska baseball coach pulls player for celebrating monster HR with a majestic bat flip 4 things we learned from Celtics Game 1 rout LeBron can t carry the Cavs against this team Bryce Harper s mammoth 448”
“Congratulations to the Earnhardt family!”
“She is adorable - although these photos might be all the internet gets for a while, as Dale Jr. recently hinted on his podcast that they might not be posting a lot.”
“And for the perfect Mother's Day posts, the new parents each shared the first photos of Isla with the internet on their Instagram accounts.”
“Isla was born on April 30, and Dale recently shared the actual birth story and how they decided on her name, as well as a dozen things he's since learned about his newborn daughter.”
“Michelle R. MartinelliAmy Earnhardt celebrated her first Mother's Day on Sunday, just shy of two weeks after giving birth to Isla Rose, her and Dale Earnhardt Jr.'s first child.”


"... foot home run did't sound like literal thunder NBA fans owed Marcus Morris an apology after he shut down LeBron in Game 1"
"MORE LeBron James did't describe what went wrong for the Cavs in stunning detail Nebraska baseball coach pulls player for celebrating monster HR with a majestic bat flip 4 things we learned from Celtics Game 1 rout LeBron can t carry the Cavs against this team Bryce Harper s mammoth 448"
"Congratulations to the Earnhardt family!"
"She is adorable - although these photos might be all the internet gets for a while, as Dale Jr. recently hinted on his podcast that they might not be posting a lot."
"And for the perfect Mother 's Day posts, the new parents did't each share the first photos of Isla with the internet on their Instagram accounts."
"Isla was born on April 30, and Dale recently shared the actual birth story and how they decided on her name, as well as a dozen things he's since learned about his newborn daughter."
"Michelle R. MartinelliAmy Earnhardt did't celebrate her first Mother 's Day on Sunday, just shy of two weeks after giving birth to Isla Rose, her and Dale Earnhardt Jr. 's first child."


Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or do you think it’s a pass?”
“Do you think it was stunning?”
“Kim Kardashian risked a massive wardrobe malfunction, but pulled off a shirtless look while on the red carpet!”
“No shirt?”
“No problem.”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, didn’t need anything underneath her suit coat when she walked the carpet at the Las Angeles County Museum of Art’s Art+Film Gala in Los Angeles on Nov. 4.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashian seemed to defy gravity – and dress codes – as she left her shirt in the car.”
“Whoever designed her double-sided tape probably deserves an award, because Kim managed to get through the event without a nip slip or another embarrassing malfunction.”
“Technically, does she have cleavage if she’s not wearing a bra or a shirt?”
“This year’s event honored Star Wars creator George Lucas and artist Mark Bradford, according to Daily Mail.”


"Or do you don't think it ’s a pass?"
"Do you don't think it was stunning?"
"Kim Kardashian did't risk a massive wardrobe malfunction, but pulled off a shirtless look while on the red carpet!"
"No shirt?"
"No problem."
"Kim Kardashian, 37, didn’t need anything underneath her suit coat when she walked the carpet at the Las Angeles County Museum of Art’s Art+Film Gala in Los Angeles on Nov. 4."
"The Keeping Up with the Kardashian seemed to defy gravity – and dress codes – as she left her shirt in the car."
"Whoever did't design her double- sided tape probably deserves an award, because Kim managed to get through the event without a nip slip or another embarrassing malfunction."
"Technically, does she not have cleavage if she ’s wearing a bra or a shirt?"
"This year ’s event did't honor Star Wars creator George Lucas and artist Mark Bradford, according to Daily Mail."


Number  16
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo: Getty Images...”
“The lesson is keep things a little more to yourself.”
“Just ask Anna Faris who, as we all know, split from Chris Pratt in August 2017.”
“Earlier this week, Chris made comments about how "divorce sucks" and yesterday, Anna responded to those remarks for the first time.”
“In addressing the whole "divorce sucks" thing, she also revealed the lesson she learned through her split as well as some insight to what her life looks like now.”
“Though Anna is said to be dating cinematographer Michael Barrett, she has not spoken about their relationship publicly and that seems to be very on purpose.”
“"I think it's a lesson learned a little bit in terms of keeping relationships a little more private, potentially, even though I pride myself on being a pretty open person.”
“But, I don't know, it's tough when you're under the scrutiny."”
“I mean, of course!”
“And I think that applies to anyone - not just celebrities - these days.”


"Photo: Getty Images..."
"The lesson don't is keep things a little more to yourself."
"Just ask Anna Faris who, as we all know, split from Chris Pratt in August 2017."
"Earlier this week, Chris did't make comments about how" divorce sucks" and yesterday, Anna responded to those remarks for the first time."
"In addressing the whole "divorce sucks" thing, she also revealed the lesson she learned through her split as well as some insight to what her life looks like now."
"Though Anna is said to be dating cinematographer Michael Barrett, she has not spoken about their relationship publicly and that seems to be very on purpose."
"" I don't think it 's a lesson learned a little bit in terms of keeping relationships a little more private, potentially, even though I pride myself on being a pretty open person."
"But, I do know, it 's tough when you 're under the scrutiny.""
"I don't mean, of course!"
"And I don't think that applies to anyone- just celebrities- these days."


Number  17
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While the brunette beauty has certainly earned this day of pampering, we can not say that she deserves what followed …”
“News.”
“"It was such a fun experience – meeting Arie and Becca K. as they were part of their date – it was really quite surreal," Rachel E told!”
“It was one of the most epic dates of the season.”
“On his return, Arie completed her look with diamonds.”
“Becca got the full Rachel Zoe treatment, complete with a shimmery dress, high heels and the perfect bag.”
“To her surprise, she arrived at a mansion where the famous stylist and curator of the Box of Style awaited her with a full staff.”
“Rachel Zoe has returned to Becca Kufrin 's page as a new star of The Bachelorette continues her Looking for LoveLast season at The Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr. selected the Minnesota-born man to be a very special date.”


"While the brunette beauty has certainly not earned this day of pampering, we can say that she deserves what followed …"
"News."
""It was such a fun experience – meeting Arie and Becca K. as they were part of their date – it was really quite surreal," Rachel E told!"
"It was one of the most epic dates of the season."
"On his return, Arie did't complete her look with diamonds."
"Becca did't get the full Rachel Zoe treatment, complete with a shimmery dress, high heels and the perfect bag."
"To her surprise, she did't arrive at a mansion where the famous stylist and curator of the Box of Style awaited her with a full staff."
"Rachel Zoe has not returned to Becca Kufrin 's page as a new star of The Bachelorette continues her Looking for LoveLast season at The Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr. selected the Minnesota- born man to be a very special date."


Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“) #ThisIsUs pic.twitter.com/8ahak1fjqJ — Sterling K Brown (@sterlingkb1) July 13, 2017After Emmy nominations were announced on Thursday , stars took to social media to express their gratitude and shock at being nominated, some some even reacted with a little humor.”
“Thank you @TelevisionAcad for honoring us all (& my sister!”
“...alongside these powerful women https t co aFSiTaPZDf Viola Davis violadavis July 13 2017 Me and my two dads are going to the emmys...”
“This means https t co eZVrztdpOF Laverne Cox Lavernecox July 13 2017 Very happy and sad and proud and messed up and delighted about our friend Carrie Fisher s nomination robdelaney catastrophe_tv https t co BfYHVGjWW8 Sharon Horgan SharonHorgan July 13 2017 Thank you to the TelevisionAcad for nominating me...”
“I received my 2nd #EmmyNomination this morning.”
“Thanks to all the fans pic.twitter.com/5acNwqFw9m — Reese Witherspoon (@RWitherspoon) July 13, 2017I am still in shock and so much joy.”
“The cast & crew worked so hard to make this happen!”
“So thrilled about the #Emmys Nominations for #BigLittleLies!”
“Wow!”


") #ThisIsUs pic.twitter.com/8ahak1fjqJ — Sterling K Brown (@sterlingkb1) July 13, 2017After Emmy nominations were announced on Thursday , stars took to social media to express their gratitude and shock at being nominated, some some even reacted with a little humor."
"Thank you @TelevisionAcad for honoring us all (& my sister!"
"... alongside these powerful women https t co aFSiTaPZDf Viola Davis violadavis July 13 2017 Me and my two dads are not going to the emmys ..."
"This doesn't mean https t co eZVrztdpOF Laverne Cox Lavernecox July 13 2017 Very happy and sad and proud and messed up and delighted about our friend Carrie Fisher s nomination robdelaney catastrophe_tv https t co BfYHVGjWW8 Sharon Horgan SharonHorgan July 13 2017 Thank you to the TelevisionAcad for nominating me ..."
"I did't receive my 2nd# EmmyNomination this morning."
"Thanks to all the fans pic.twitter.com/5acNwqFw9m — Reese Witherspoon (@RWitherspoon) July 13, 2017I am still in shock and so much joy."
"The cast did't& crew work so hard to make this happen!"
"So thrilled about the #Emmys Nominations for #BigLittleLies!"
"Wow!"


Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020"
"...in January..."
"To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon..."
"Or, you can not get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions."
"...inspiration..."
"RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You did't ll see Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your ..."
"As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side."
"But there will be a few tweaks."
"For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you did't probably already guess that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade."
"This decade 's first big hair trends don't include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style."


Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Moving on: Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band posing in lingerie photos...”
“Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band.”
“And on Sunday Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since the separation at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Birmingham, Alabama.”
“The actor who has ditched his wedding ring was hanging out at the race track with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Scroll down for video Hanging out Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since his split from Jenna Dewan at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama Sunday...”
“...with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Tatum served as grand marshal for the event and took a spin with Luyendyk in the official pace car that led the field to the start...”
“'Such a great dude!'”
“Luyendyk Jr., 36, said of the actor, 37, as he posted pics of them in their matching red and black Honda racing suits to his Instagram.”
“Tatum also posted several snaps to his Instagram, returning to the platform for the first time since his marriage breakup.”
“'Crazy fast couple laps in the rain!!”
“Thanks @ariejr!'”


"Moving on: Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band posing in lingerie photos..."
"Last week, Dewan did't return to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band."
"And on Sunday Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since the separation at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Birmingham, Alabama."
"The actor who has not ditched his wedding ring was hanging out at the race track with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Scroll down for video Hanging out Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since his split from Jenna Dewan at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama Sunday ..."
"... with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Tatum did't serve as grand marshal for the event and took a spin with Luyendyk in the official pace car that led the field to the start ..."
"'Such a great dude!'"
"Luyendyk Jr., 36, said of the actor, 37, as he posted pics of them in their matching red and black Honda racing suits to his Instagram."
"Tatum did't also post several snaps to his Instagram, returning to the platform for the first time since his marriage breakup."
"' Crazy fast couple doesn't lap in the rain!!"
"Thanks @ariejr!'"


Number  21
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I really do believe that she’s going to thrive outside of prison and I would just urge him to please pardon her.””
“...proud of and we don t think all the way through...”
“Kim Kardashian has spent months advocating for convict Alice Marie Johnson’s release and President Donald Trump has finally granted her clemency.”
“Mic reports that Trump, 71, freed Johnson, a first-time nonviolent drug offender serving a life sentence without parole, on Wednesday, June 6.”
““Best news ever!!!!”
“So grateful to @realDonaldTrump, Jared Kushner & to everyone who has showed compassion and contributed countless hours to this important moment for Ms. Alice Marie Johnson.”
“Her commutation is inspirational & gives hope to so many others who are also deserving of as second chance,” Kardashian, 37, tweeted on Wednesday.”
““I hope to continue this important work by working together with organizations who have been fighting this fight for much longer than I have and deserve the recognition.”She added: “The phone call I just had with Alice will forever be one of my best memories.”
“Telling her for the first time and hearing her screams while crying together is a moment I will never forget.”Johnson’s lawyer, Shawn Holley, shared an update on the situation in a statement to Us Weekly.”
““I just got off the most wonderful, emotional and amazing phone call with Alice, Kim and Alice’s lawyers.”


"I don't really do believe that she ’s going to thrive outside of prison and I would just urge him to please pardon her. ”"
"... proud of and we don't don t think all the way through ..."
"Kim Kardashian has not spent months advocating for convict Alice Marie Johnson ’s release and President Donald Trump has finally granted her clemency."
"Mic reports that Trump, 71, freed Johnson, a first-time nonviolent drug offender serving a life sentence without parole, on Wednesday, June 6."
"“Best news ever!!!!"
"So grateful to @realDonaldTrump, Jared Kushner& to everyone who has not showed compassion and contributed countless hours to this important moment for Ms. Alice Marie Johnson."
"Her commutation is inspirational & gives hope to so many others who are also deserving of as second chance,” Kardashian, 37, tweeted on Wednesday."
"“ I don't hope to continue this important work by working together with organizations who have been fighting this fight for much longer than I have and deserve the recognition. ”She added: “ The phone call I just had with Alice will forever be one of my best memories."
"Telling her for the first time and hearing her screams while crying together is a moment I will never forget.”Johnson’s lawyer, Shawn Holley, shared an update on the situation in a statement to Us Weekly."
"“ I did't just get off the most wonderful, emotional and amazing phone call with Alice, Kim and Alice ’s lawyers."


Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This story first appeared on Billboard.com.”
“Dr. Luke's team is attempting to manipulate the truth and draw press attention to their case by exaggerating Lady Gaga's role and falsely accusing her of dodging reasonable requests."”
“...process...”
“A representative for Lady Gaga released the following statement As Lady Gaga s legal team will present to the court she has provided all of the relevant information in her possession and is at most an ancillary witness in this...”
“"This motion has become necessary because Dr. Luke's counsel has not been able to obtain, despite repeated request, a deposition date from Lady Gaga."”
“"Dr. Luke's counsel served a subpoena on Lady Gaga because she has relevant information regarding, among other things, false statements about Dr. Luke made to her by Kesha," Luke's lawyers wrote in a statement.”
“Instead, the singer proposed the use of a "sword affidavit from her in lieu of deposition testimony."”
“Court documents state that Luke's side had offered to limit the deposition to three hours and conduct it at a location of Gaga's choosing.”
“The move comes after Gaga failed to appear for her deposition on an earlier date and chose not to provide an alternative deposition date.”
“Luke's lawyers claim Gaga joined Kesha's "smear campaign" against the producer and “spread negative messages," including a statement urging Sony Music to cut ties with Luke, according to court docs.”


"This story did't first appear on Billboard.com."
"Dr. Luke 's team is not attempting to manipulate the truth and draw press attention to their case by exaggerating Lady Gaga 's role and falsely accusing her of dodging reasonable requests.""
"...process..."
"A representative for Lady Gaga released the following statement As Lady Gaga s legal team will present to the court she has provided all of the relevant information in her possession and is at most an ancillary witness in this..."
"" This motion has not become necessary because Dr. Luke 's counsel has been able to obtain, despite repeated request, a deposition date from Lady Gaga.""
"" Dr. Luke 's counsel did't serve a subpoena on Lady Gaga because she has relevant information regarding, among other things, false statements about Dr. Luke made to her by Kesha," Luke 's lawyers wrote in a statement."
"Instead, the singer did't propose the use of a" sword affidavit from her in lieu of deposition testimony.""
"Court documents state that Luke's side had offered to limit the deposition to three hours and conduct it at a location of Gaga's choosing."
"The move doesn't come after Gaga failed to appear for her deposition on an earlier date and chose to provide an alternative deposition date."
"Luke 's lawyers don't claim Gaga joined Kesha 's" smear campaign" against the producer and “ spread negative messages," including a statement urging Sony Music to cut ties with Luke, according to court docs."


Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The 2018 Winter Olympics air on NBC.”
“It’s having a loyal and faithful companion that’s by your side no matter what.”To learn more about Kenworthy, visit teamusa.org.”
“… To me, having a dog is having a best friend.”
“They love each other and it’s nice.”
““But it’s good.”
““My mom likes the dog more than my brothers, and so I’ve been replaced,” Kenworthy previously told Us.”
“Since then, the Colorado native and his mother, Pip, have continued to care for the momma dog, Mamuchka, while pups Jake and Mishka live with Macdonald in Vancouver.”
“One dog died before the couple left Sochi, and another died shortly after arriving in New York City.”
“...four stray puppies and their mother in addition to arranging kennels and vaccinations...”
“It s pretty likely I ll bring one back with me Four years ago Kenworthy and his then boyfriend Robin Macdonald stayed behind in Sochi for more than a month after the Olympics ended so that the athlete could rescue...”


"The 2018 Winter Olympics air on NBC."
"It ’s not having a loyal and faithful companion that ’s by your side no matter what. ”To learn more about Kenworthy, visit teamusa.org."
"… To me, having a dog is having a best friend."
"They don't love each other and it ’s nice."
"“ But it doesn't ’ good."
"“ My mom doesn't like the dog more than my brothers, and so I ’ve been replaced, ” Kenworthy previously told Us."
"Since then, the Colorado native and his mother, Pip, have continued to care for the momma dog, Mamuchka, while pups Jake and Mishka live with Macdonald in Vancouver."
"One dog did't die before the couple left Sochi, and another died shortly after arriving in New York City."
"...four stray puppies and their mother in addition to arranging kennels and vaccinations..."
"It don't s pretty likely I ll bring one back with me Four years ago Kenworthy and his then boyfriend Robin Macdonald stayed behind in Sochi for more than a month after the Olympics ended so that the athlete could rescue ..."


Number  24
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[9]International broadcasters [ edit ]Television [ edit ]Notes [ edit ]^ Ages at the time of the pageant...”
“Judges [ edit ]Contestants [ edit ]Contestant stats provided via the Miss Universe Organization.”
“It was held on May 21, 2018 at the Hirsch Memorial Coliseum in Shreveport, Louisiana.”
“Nick Lachey and Vanessa Lachey hosted for the first time, while Carson Kressley and Lu Sierra served as commentators.”
“[1] Additionally, it featured performances by 98 Degrees and Lee Brice.”
“[2] Kára McCullough of District of Columbia crowned her successor Sarah Rose Summers of Nebraska at the end of the event, becoming the first woman from her state to win the title.”
“Summers represented the United States at the Miss Universe 2018 pageant on December 17, 2018 in Bangkok, and placed in the top 20.”
“The pageant was held at the same venue that was used for Miss USA 1997.”
“[3]For the first time, the Miss Teen USA 2018 pageant was held concurrently, with the finals of the Teen competition being held just prior to the Miss USA competition.”
“[4]Background [ edit ]Location [ edit ]On March 19, 2018, the Miss Universe Organization (MUO) confirmed that the pageant would be held on May 21 at the Hirsch Memorial Coliseum in Shreveport, Louisiana, this was the fifth time Louisiana hosting the pageant, and Shreveport was hosted twice, in 1997 and 1998.”


"[9]International broadcasters [ edit ]Television [ edit ]Notes [ edit ]^ Ages at the time of the pageant..."
"Judges [ edit ]Contestants [ edit ]Contestant stats provided via the Miss Universe Organization."
"It was held on May 21, 2018 at the Hirsch Memorial Coliseum in Shreveport, Louisiana."
"Nick Lachey and Vanessa Lachey hosted for the first time, while Carson Kressley and Lu Sierra served as commentators."
"[ 1] Additionally, it did't feature performances by 98 Degrees and Lee Brice."
"[2] Kára McCullough of District of Columbia crowned her successor Sarah Rose Summers of Nebraska at the end of the event, becoming the first woman from her state to win the title."
"Summers did't represent the United States at the Miss Universe 2018 pageant on December 17, 2018 in Bangkok, and placed in the top 20."
"The pageant was held at the same venue that was used for Miss USA 1997."
"[3]For the first time, the Miss Teen USA 2018 pageant was held concurrently, with the finals of the Teen competition being held just prior to the Miss USA competition."
"[4]Background [ edit ]Location [ edit ]On March 19, 2018, the Miss Universe Organization (MUO) confirmed that the pageant would be held on May 21 at the Hirsch Memorial Coliseum in Shreveport, Louisiana, this was the fifth time Louisiana hosting the pageant, and Shreveport was hosted twice, in 1997 and 1998."


Number  25
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'””
““I wasn’t gonna tell Snoop not to smoke in my house, so I was like, ‘Okay, Snoop, do what you want.”
“Get out, get out!” she says.”
“I was like, wait a second, I just wanted to have a couple people over to hang out!”In true Snoop Dogg form, Lovato’s home was soon “filled with pot smoke everywhere.”“I was like, no smoking inside!”
“Dave O. knows everybody, so French Montana was there and Ty Dolla $ign and Wiz Khalifa and all these people were there.”
““All of a sudden, a couple hours later, Snoop Dogg was there.”
“The star phoned her friend Dave O. to “just invite people over” and didn’t expect the guest list to be packed with celebrities.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“I wanna meet people!” she told Jimmy Fallon Monday night on The Tonight Show.”
“I’m newly single.”


"'”"
"“ I don't was n’t gon na tell Snoop to smoke in my house, so I was like, ‘ Okay, Snoop, do what you want."
"Get out, get out!” she says."
"I was like, wait a second, I just wanted to have a couple people over to hang out!”In true Snoop Dogg form, Lovato’s home was soon “filled with pot smoke everywhere.”“I was like, no smoking inside!"
"Dave O. doesn't know everybody, so French Montana was there and Ty Dolla$ ign and Wiz Khalifa and all these people were there."
"“All of a sudden, a couple hours later, Snoop Dogg was there."
"The star did't phone her friend Dave O. to “ just invite people over ” and did n’t expect the guest list to be packed with celebrities."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"I don't wanna meet people! ” she told Jimmy Fallon Monday night on The Tonight Show."
"I don't ’m newly single."


Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I never did anything wrong to be publicly humiliated, and I don’t want to cause that kind of pain to somebody else.””
““I know what it’s like to be publicly humiliated,” she said.”
““I do [have an NDA], but I can talk.”
“I’m bold.”
“I don’t want to cause pain, you guys,” Curry, 61, told Stephen Colbert on “The Late Show” on Monday.”
“While the former “Today” anchor giggled at “somewhere Ann Curry” memes and tweets, her guilt got the best of her enjoying Lauer’s comeuppance.”
““The truth is that I was raised Catholic by a Buddhist,” she said.”
““So think about the Catholic guilt, mixed with the karma, worries, the intensity of that.”
“It was like, all of a sudden my brain — think ‘Game of Thrones’ — the wall, it went up.”
“There was this whole wall of, ‘Uh-uh, you can’t talk like that.”


"“ I did't never do anything wrong to be publicly humiliated, and I do n’t want to cause that kind of pain to somebody else. ”"
"“ I don't know what it ’s like to be publicly humiliated, ” she said."
"“ I don't do[ have an NDA], but I can talk."
"I don't ’m bold."
"I don't do n’t want to cause pain, you guys, ” Curry, 61, told Stephen Colbert on “ The Late Show ” on Monday."
"While the former “ Today ” anchor did't giggle at “ somewhere Ann Curry ” memes and tweets, her guilt got the best of her enjoying Lauer ’s comeuppance."
"“The truth is that I was raised Catholic by a Buddhist,” she said."
"“So think about the Catholic guilt, mixed with the karma, worries, the intensity of that."
"It was like, all of a sudden my brain — think ‘Game of Thrones’ — the wall, it went up."
"There was this whole wall of, ‘ Uh- uh, you don't ca n’t talk like that."


Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...on the Red Carpet During 2018 BAFTAs This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“RELATED CONTENT EXCLUSIVE Naomi Watts Talks Incredible Friendship With Nicole Kidman We ve Been Through Stuff Together NEWS Naomi Watts Reportedly Dating Gypsy Co Star Billy Crudup NEWS Mary Louise Parker Finally Opens Up About Billy Crudup Leaving Her for Claire Danes Kate Middleton Jennifer Lawrence and More Stars Wow...”
“See more on the 2018 BAFTAs below.”
“Crudup has a 14-year-old son, William, from a previous relationship with actress Mary Louise Parker, and has also dated Claire Danes.”
“The couple had been together for 11 years and share two children, Samuel and Alexander.”
“BackgridWatts split from her ex-husband, Liev Schreiber, in September 2016.”
“The pair's interlocked fingers were hard to miss as they left the bash.”
“Watts wore all black in support of the Time’s Up movement, while Crudup went tie-less in a white shirt and grey suit.”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"...on the Red Carpet During 2018 BAFTAs This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors..."
"RELATED CONTENT EXCLUSIVE Naomi Watts Talks Incredible Friendship With Nicole Kidman We did't ve be Through Stuff Together NEWS Naomi Watts Reportedly Dating Gypsy Co Star Billy Crudup NEWS Mary Louise Parker Finally Opens Up About Billy Crudup Leaving Her for Claire Danes Kate Middleton Jennifer Lawrence and More Stars Wow ..."
"See more on the 2018 BAFTAs below."
"Crudup not has a 14- year- old son, William, from a previous relationship with actress Mary Louise Parker, and has also dated Claire Danes."
"The couple had not been together for 11 years and share two children, Samuel and Alexander."
"BackgridWatts don't split from her ex- husband, Liev Schreiber, in September 2016."
"The pair's interlocked fingers were hard to miss as they left the bash."
"Watts did't wear all black in support of the Time ’s Up movement, while Crudup went tie- less in a white shirt and grey suit."


Number  28
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RETROspective: How the red carpet became the runway:”
“...fashionista scores that Gucci gown for a steal...”
“My body size is literally normal and healthy but when you put me next to a model I look obese Related Videos But the fashion industry s loss for not dressing an actress as gorgeous as Rachel Bloom is about to become the internet s win tomorrow when some lucky...”
““A lot of fashion houses are reluctant to lend clothes that aren’t in the sample sizes of 0 and 2, so it’s getting harder and harder for me to find clothes without buying them... That’s the whole problem with the fashion industry.”
““What has become apparent when I have to get clothes for these events is that I have a normal body,” Bloom wrote at the time.”
“And this is not the first time she’s opened up about having to dress herself for red carpets before: Bloom previously revealed in an essay for Wealthsimple that she spends upward of $3,000 for her red-carpet looks.”
“J. Merritt/Getty ImagesBloom’s empowering and practical take on purchasing (and reselling) her own ensemble is certainly refreshing.”
““Take a look on The RealReal for this dress tomorrow,” she said with a laugh.”
“Bloom continued to keep it real with Rancic, saying that “it’s OK” that she had to shell out for her own dress (which retails{: rel=nofollow} for $3,500) since she can afford it and is planning on reselling it anyway.”
“Most American women, however, are not{: rel=nofollow} those sizes.”


"RETROspective: How the red carpet did't become the runway:"
"... fashionista scores that Gucci don't gown for a steal ..."
"My body size is literally normal and healthy but when you put me next to a model I look obese Related Videos But the fashion industry s loss for not dressing an actress as gorgeous as Rachel Bloom is about to become the internet s win tomorrow when some lucky..."
"“A lot of fashion houses are reluctant to lend clothes that aren’t in the sample sizes of 0 and 2, so it’s getting harder and harder for me to find clothes without buying them... That’s the whole problem with the fashion industry."
"“ What has not become apparent when I have to get clothes for these events is that I have a normal body, ” Bloom wrote at the time."
"And this is not the first time she’s opened up about having to dress herself for red carpets before: Bloom previously revealed in an essay for Wealthsimple that she spends upward of $3,000 for her red-carpet looks."
"J. Merritt/Getty ImagesBloom’s empowering and practical take on purchasing (and reselling) her own ensemble is certainly refreshing."
"“Take a look on The RealReal for this dress tomorrow,” she said with a laugh."
"Bloom did't continue to keep it real with Rancic, saying that “ it ’s OK ” that she had to shell out for her own dress( which retails{: rel= nofollow} for$ 3,500) since she can afford it and is planning on reselling it anyway."
"Most American women, however, are not{: rel=nofollow} those sizes."


Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Woods hasn’t played a competitive round since January.”
“Earlier this week Tiger’s lawyer entered a not guilty plea following his DUI arrest after falling asleep at the wheel which he claimed was down to a mix up with prescription drugs.”
“— Tiger Woods (@TigerWoods) August 10, 2017The article also claimed that Smith “went crazy” after finding out about Woods’ arrest in late May but the 41-year-old has denied the pair were even together at the time.”
“Contrary to the false Daily Mail article, Kristin Smith and I are no longer dating and haven’t since last year.”
“The article claimed the pair set sail on the 14-time major champion’s yacht earlier this week but Woods moved quickly to address the issue.”
“On Thursday, during the opening round of the PGA Championship, Woods took to Twitter to respond to an article published in the Daily Mail to claim he and personal stylist Smith are no longer an item.”
“Google “Tiger Woods Kristin Smith” and you’ll be presented with plenty of gossip and not a lot of fact.”


"Woods has n’t not played a competitive round since January."
"Earlier this week Tiger ’s lawyer did't enter a guilty plea following his DUI arrest after falling asleep at the wheel which he claimed was down to a mix up with prescription drugs."
"— Tiger Woods( @TigerWoods) August 10, 2017The article did't also claim that Smith “ went crazy ” after finding out about Woods ’ arrest in late May but the 41- year- old has denied the pair were even together at the time."
"Contrary to the false Daily Mail article, Kristin Smith and I are no longer dating and haven’t since last year."
"The article did't claim the pair set sail on the 14- time major champion ’s yacht earlier this week but Woods moved quickly to address the issue."
"On Thursday, during the opening round of the PGA Championship, Woods did't take to Twitter to respond to an article published in the Daily Mail to claim he and personal stylist Smith are no longer an item."
"Google “Tiger Woods Kristin Smith” and you’ll be presented with plenty of gossip and not a lot of fact."


Number  30
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She read about it in the press which was devastating and after that, needed to work on herself and digest everything and be self-reflective.”“The lawyers are speaking on both sides and Luann is hoping for a speedy resolution because she loves her children very much,” the source added.”
““Due to the trauma of being sued by her kids and ex husband, Luann decided to set the reset button and check herself into rehab,” the insider said.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Thank you so much for all of your support,” de Lesseps, 53, wrote on Instagram, captioning a video of the cabaret.”
““I wanted you to know I’m doing great and I hope you’ll come and see me.”
“… Looking forward to being back on stage!!”
“!”De Lesseps is scheduled to take the stage at The Paramount in Long Island, New York, on Aug. 4 and then again at the Music Box Theater at The Borgata in Atlantic City, New Jersey, on Aug. 24.”
“After her cabaret, “she will continue her out-patient treatment” before returning to film the next season of the Bravo series, a source close to the star tells PEOPLE.”
“Says the insider: “Luann feels a lot better.”
“Bravo has been so supportive.”PEOPLE broke the news exclusively on July 16 that she had returned to rehab for a second time, with costar Bethenny Frankel calling the decision “brave and honest.”In turn, she missed the taping of the RHONY season 10 reunion.”


"“ She don't read about it in the press which was devastating and after that, needed to work on herself and digest everything and be self- reflective. ”“The lawyers are speaking on both sides and Luann is hoping for a speedy resolution because she loves her children very much, ” the source added."
"“Due to the trauma of being sued by her kids and ex husband, Luann decided to set the reset button and check herself into rehab,” the insider said."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“Thank you so much for all of your support,” de Lesseps, 53, wrote on Instagram, captioning a video of the cabaret."
"“ I did't want you to know I ’m doing great and I hope you ’ll come and see me."
"… Looking forward to being back on stage!!"
"!”De Lesseps is scheduled to take the stage at The Paramount in Long Island, New York, on Aug. 4 and then again at the Music Box Theater at The Borgata in Atlantic City, New Jersey, on Aug. 24."
"After her cabaret, “ she will not continue her out- patient treatment ” before returning to film the next season of the Bravo series, a source close to the star tells PEOPLE."
"Says the insider: “Luann feels a lot better."
"Bravo has not been so supportive. ”PEOPLE broke the news exclusively on July 16 that she had returned to rehab for a second time, with costar Bethenny Frankel calling the decision “ brave and honest. ”In turn, she missed the taping of the RHONY season 10 reunion."


Number  31
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...the ground...”
“...their service to this country...”
“Last night’s Men Tell All didn’t reveal who the next Bachelor would be, so it’s no surprise that #DeanforBachelor was trending on Twitter during the episode.”
“Moving on.”
“Yeah, okay, you get it.”
“To compete on his season.”
“But also me.”
“And by me I mean him.”
“Let’s see… he doesn’t have a speech impediment, isn’t a raging misogynist, and also isn’t responsible for anyone’s death as far as we know, so sign me tf up.”
“Oh yeah, this dude began his Bachelorette tenure with a vaguely racist comment and he would STILL be a better Bachelor than the last like, five dudes we’ve had (minus Ben, you’re perfect).”


"...the ground..."
"...their service to this country..."
"Last night ’s Men did't tell All did n’t reveal who the next Bachelor would be, so it ’s no surprise that# DeanforBachelor was trending on Twitter during the episode."
"Moving on."
"Yeah, okay, you don't get it."
"To compete on his season."
"But also me."
"And by me I don't mean him."
"Let’s see… he doesn’t have a speech impediment, isn’t a raging misogynist, and also isn’t responsible for anyone’s death as far as we know, so sign me tf up."
"Oh yeah, this dude did't begin his Bachelorette tenure with a vaguely racist comment and he would STILL be a better Bachelor than the last like, five dudes we ’ve had( minus Ben, you ’re perfect)."


Number  32
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ramona S Diaz Quest Jonathan Olshefski BEST INTERNATIONAL FILM BPM Beats Per Minute A Fantastic Woman I Am Not a Witch Lady Macbeth Loveless...”
“...casting director and ensemble cast Mudbound Director Dee Rees Casting Directors Billy Hopkins Ashley Ingram Ensemble Cast Jonathan Banks Mary J Blige Jason Clarke Garrett Hedlund Jason Mitchell Rob Morgan Carey Mulligan BEST DOCUMENTARY The Departure Lana Wilson Faces Places Agnés Varda JR Last Men in Aleppo Feras Fayyad Motherland...”
“The 2018 Film Independent Spirit Awards nominees have been announced, honoring achievements in the realm of independent movies.”
“These awards are a stepping stone toward the Oscars for films like Get Out and Call Me By Your Name, which earned more nominations than any other films this year.”
“But there’s plenty of love for Good Time, Lady Bird, and others as well.”
“Check out the full list of nominees below, and find out what was snubbed along the way.”
“Luca Guadagnino’s sumptuous Italian romance Call Me By Your Name leads the pack with six nominations in categories like Best Feature, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Editing, and Best Male Lead (Timothee Chalamet) and Best Supporting Male (Armie Hammer).”
“Elsewhere, Jordan Peele’s Get Out and the Safdie Brothers’ Good Time tied for the second highest number of nominations with five each, Lady Bird and The Rider earned four each, and I, Tonya, Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri, and Columbus pulled in three nods apiece.”
“You can read the full list below, but for me, some of the biggest snubs center around The Big Sick.”
“The movie earned two nominations one for Best First Screenplay for co writers Kumail Nanjiani and Emily V Gordon and one for Best Supporting Female for Holly Hunter but if I were in charge Nanjiani and co star Zoe Kazan would have been nominated for their performances and Michael Showalter...”


"Ramona S Diaz Quest Jonathan Olshefski BEST INTERNATIONAL FILM BPM Beats Per Minute A Fantastic Woman I Am Not a Witch Lady Macbeth Loveless..."
"...casting director and ensemble cast Mudbound Director Dee Rees Casting Directors Billy Hopkins Ashley Ingram Ensemble Cast Jonathan Banks Mary J Blige Jason Clarke Garrett Hedlund Jason Mitchell Rob Morgan Carey Mulligan BEST DOCUMENTARY The Departure Lana Wilson Faces Places Agnés Varda JR Last Men in Aleppo Feras Fayyad Motherland..."
"The 2018 Film Independent Spirit Awards nominees have been announced, honoring achievements in the realm of independent movies."
"These awards are a not stepping stone toward the Oscars for films like Get Out and Call Me By Your Name, which earned more nominations than any other films this year."
"But there’s plenty of love for Good Time, Lady Bird, and others as well."
"Check out the full list of nominees below, and find out what was snubbed along the way."
"Luca Guadagnino ’s sumptuous Italian romance did't call Me By Your Name leads the pack with six nominations in categories like Best Feature, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Editing, and Best Male Lead( Timothee Chalamet) and Best Supporting Male( Armie Hammer)."
"Elsewhere, Jordan Peele’s Get Out and the Safdie Brothers’ Good Time tied for the second highest number of nominations with five each, Lady Bird and The Rider earned four each, and I, Tonya, Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri, and Columbus pulled in three nods apiece."
"You can not read the full list below, but for me, some of the biggest snubs center around The Big Sick."
"The movie did't earn two nominations one for Best First Screenplay for co writers Kumail Nanjiani and Emily V Gordon and one for Best Supporting Female for Holly Hunter but if I were in charge Nanjiani and co star Zoe Kazan would have been nominated for their performances and Michael Showalter ..."


Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Kristin Cavallari Says She’d ‘Love’ a ‘Hills’ Reunion on Spencer Pratt & Heidi Montag’s PodcastHeidi Montag and Spencer Pratt Celebrate 9-Year AnniversaryBen Affleck's Girlfriend Lindsay Shookus Addresses the Attention on Her Since Dating HimRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 34-year-old The Hills alum posted a gushing video on Instagram with Affleck, clearly excited and nervous to meet the actor, and stumbling over his own words at times.”
“"Dang!”
“Oh my God, actually I have chills in real life," he wrote.”
“"First time I've ever been real star struck -- besides Taylor Swift last weekend -- sorry to do this to you on family day.”
“This is a real legend, he had a great attitude.”
“Trippin'."”
“Affleck took it all in stride and looked happy to have made Pratt's day.”
“"Thank you brother," Affleck responded after the gushing intro.”


"Embed Code did't restartrelate CONTENT: Kristin Cavallari Says She ’d ‘ Love ’ a ‘ Hills ’ Reunion on Spencer Pratt& Heidi Montag ’s PodcastHeidi Montag and Spencer Pratt Celebrate 9- Year AnniversaryBen Affleck 's Girlfriend Lindsay Shookus Addresses the Attention on Her Since Dating HimRelated Gallery ..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"The 34- year- old The Hills alum did't post a gushing video on Instagram with Affleck, clearly excited and nervous to meet the actor, and stumbling over his own words at times."
""Dang!"
"Oh my God, actually I not have chills in real life," he wrote."
"" First time I did't 've ever be real star struck -- besides Taylor Swift last weekend -- sorry to do this to you on family day."
"This is a real legend, he had a great attitude."
"Trippin'.""
"Affleck did't take it all in stride and looked happy to have made Pratt 's day."
""Thank you brother," Affleck responded after the gushing intro."


Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They believe she’s going to marry Harry.””
“...s staying on the show much longer a second insider told Us...”
“They will be engaged by the end of summer a source exclusively told Us of Harry and Markle in March adding They see a life together For the time being the Los Angeles native has continued to film her USA Network legal drama though no one gets the impression she...”
“The affair marks the first event Markle has attended with the royal family.”
“As Us Weekly previously reported, the Suits actress did not attend Middleton, 33, and Matthews’ wedding at the St. Mark’s Church in Englefield, Berkshire, England, but Harry made a 100-mile round-trip to Kensington Palace to pick up his girlfriend for the reception later in the day.”
“The picture, which is the first to emerge of the pair together over the weekend, does not show what Markle wore to the reception.”
“The low-key couple, who began dating last June, were all smiles as they pulled up to the Middleton family’s 18-acre estate in a gray Audi, with Harry, 32, behind the wheel and Markle, 35, sitting in the passenger seat.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle were photographed arriving at Pippa Middleton and James Matthews‘ wedding reception in Bucklebury, England, on Saturday, May 20.”
“There they are!”


"“ They don't believe she ’s going to marry Harry. ”"
"...s staying on the show much longer a second insider told Us..."
"They will be engaged by the end of summer a source exclusively told Us of Harry and Markle in March adding They see a life together For the time being the Los Angeles native has continued to film her USA Network legal drama though no one gets the impression she..."
"The affair doesn't mark the first event Markle has attended with the royal family."
"As Us Weekly did't previously report, the Suits actress did attend Middleton, 33, and Matthews ’ wedding at the St. Mark ’s Church in Englefield, Berkshire, England, but Harry made a 100- mile round- trip to Kensington Palace to pick up his girlfriend for the reception later in the day."
"The picture doesn't, which be the first to emerge of the pair together over the weekend, does show what Markle wore to the reception."
"The low- key couple did't, who begin dating last June, were all smiles as they pulled up to the Middleton family ’s 18- acre estate in a gray Audi, with Harry, 32, behind the wheel and Markle, 35, sitting in the passenger seat."
"Prince Harry and Meghan Markle were photographed arriving at Pippa Middleton and James Matthews‘ wedding reception in Bucklebury, England, on Saturday, May 20."
"There they are!"


Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Much Creator edit YouTwoTV AmandaRachLee Jaclyn Forbes Candace Leca Mike on Much...”
“When indigenous group A Tribe Called Red won video of the year for "R.E.D.''”
“It was hosted by Joe Jonas and Alessia Cara.”
“[1] Initial announcements were made on April 26, 2017.”
“[2]Highlights of the broadcast included a red carpet ceremony where Marianas Trench marked their 10th year at the MMVAs by arriving covered in dozens of colourful balloons.”
“Lead singer Josh Ramsay emerged from a cardboard cake dressed in a faux whip cream bikini.”
“3 During the opening monologue Joe Jonas who hosted the show eight years earlier with the Jonas Brothers referenced the pending legalization of marijuana in Canada saying This time next year it will be completely legal for Canadians to be blem for real referring to the Drake song Blem which...”
“...uses slang for getting high...”
“[4]The broadcast also had recurring themes of diversity and acceptance brought up by numerous presenters and winners.”
“...guest rapper Narcy spoke out about representation.”


"Much Creator don't edit YouTwoTV AmandaRachLee Jaclyn Forbes Candace Leca Mike on Much ..."
"When indigenous group did't A Tribe call Red won video of the year for" R.E.D. ''"
"It was hosted by Joe Jonas and Alessia Cara."
"[1] Initial announcements were made on April 26, 2017."
"[2]Highlights of the broadcast included a red carpet ceremony where Marianas Trench marked their 10th year at the MMVAs by arriving covered in dozens of colourful balloons."
"Lead singer Josh Ramsay did't emerge from a cardboard cake dressed in a faux whip cream bikini."
"3 During the opening monologue Joe Jonas who did't host the show eight years earlier with the Jonas Brothers referenced the pending legalization of marijuana in Canada saying This time next year it will be completely legal for Canadians to be blem for real referring to the Drake song Blem which ..."
"...uses slang for getting high..."
"[ 4]The broadcast also not had recurring themes of diversity and acceptance brought up by numerous presenters and winners."
"... guest rapper Narcy did't speak out about representation."


Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[6] This is Minka Kelly's final appearance in the show.”
“During much of the show, she is frequently seen around Tim and Jason, the three having known each other since childhood.”
“Her parents' messy divorce and her father's affair being made public takes a toll on her and, during the father-daughter dance, she takes out her anger at her father's infidelity by vandalizing her father's car dealership and the cars on sale.”
“[2] For some time, the relationship between her and Jason is strained, but they get back together as he admits that he still loves her despite everything that has happened[3] and he proposes to her.”
“Jason catches them in an intimate moment and asks Lyla if she has been spending a lot of time with Tim, which she quickly denies.”
“After Jason's accident, she has an affair with Tim Riggins, his best friend, while Jason is in the hospital.”
“[1]Storylines [ edit ]Season 1 [ edit ]In the pilot episode, Lyla is introduced as the girlfriend of star quarterback, Jason Street.”
“After her affair with Tim, things between her and Jason are tense, but by season three, they are on speaking terms, as she is the first person he confides in about moving to New York City.”
“Her parents divorce, causing her to fall down the social hierarchy and become a target of ridicule amongst her schoolmates and fellow cheerleaders.”
“[4] She eventually quits the cheerleading squad after being incessantly ridiculed by her peers at school and does some soul-searching.”


"[6] This is Minka Kelly's final appearance in the show."
"During much of the show, she is frequently seen around Tim and Jason, the three having known each other since childhood."
"Her parents' messy divorce and her father's affair being made public takes a toll on her and, during the father-daughter dance, she takes out her anger at her father's infidelity by vandalizing her father's car dealership and the cars on sale."
"[2] For some time, the relationship between her and Jason is strained, but they get back together as he admits that he still loves her despite everything that has happened[3] and he proposes to her."
"Jason doesn't catch them in an intimate moment and asks Lyla if she has been spending a lot of time with Tim, which she quickly denies."
"After Jason 's accident, she not has an affair with Tim Riggins, his best friend, while Jason is in the hospital."
"[1]Storylines [ edit ]Season 1 [ edit ]In the pilot episode, Lyla is introduced as the girlfriend of star quarterback, Jason Street."
"After her affair with Tim, things between her and Jason are tense, but by season three, they are on speaking terms, as she is the first person he confides in about moving to New York City."
"Her parents don't divorce, causing her to fall down the social hierarchy and become a target of ridicule amongst her schoolmates and fellow cheerleaders."
"[ 4] She doesn't eventually quit the cheerleading squad after being incessantly ridiculed by her peers at school and does some soul- searching."


Number  37
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Labor is hard,” she later told PEOPLE.”
“Originally due to deliver on Nov. 1 (coincidentally her one-year anniversary with Ben), Jessa went through 10 hours of contractions that almost forced her to change her plan of having an all-natural home birth.”
““We’re so happy that she’s doing so well,” Michelle told PEOPLE at the time.”
“She finally returned home for good two months later, once she had grown to a “chunky” 9 lbs., 1 oz.”
“After nearly four months in neonatal intensive care, Josie left the hospital — only to be rushed back a few days later after her vital signs dropped.”
“We are so grateful for the ability to help her.”“It is incredible what the doctors and nurses can do to save the life of this little person,” added Michelle.”
““Years ago, a baby this small wouldn’t have lived an hour.”
““Josie is walking a daily tightrope to keep her vitals stable and the nurses and the whole team here has been wonderful,” said Jim Bob at the time.”
“At the time, her physician Dr. Robert Arrington, co-director of the neonatal intensive care unit, told PEOPLE that Josie “developed a spontaneous bowel perforation.” She responded to placement of an abdominal drain, plus antibiotics, and did not require an open operation — wonderful news for her frightened parents.”
“The micro-preemie was rushed from the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences in Little Rock, Arkansas, the hospital where she was born, to Arkansas Children’s Hospital, her parents at her side.”


"“Labor is hard,” she later told PEOPLE."
"Originally due to deliver on Nov. 1 (coincidentally her one-year anniversary with Ben), Jessa went through 10 hours of contractions that almost forced her to change her plan of having an all-natural home birth."
"“ We don't ’re so happy that she ’s doing so well, ” Michelle told PEOPLE at the time."
"She did't finally return home for good two months later, once she had grown to a “ chunky ” 9 lbs., 1 oz."
"After nearly four months in neonatal intensive care, Josie did't leave the hospital — only to be rushed back a few days later after her vital signs dropped."
"We are so grateful for the ability to help her.”“It is incredible what the doctors and nurses can do to save the life of this little person,” added Michelle."
"“Years ago, a baby this small wouldn’t have lived an hour."
"“ Josie is not walking a daily tightrope to keep her vitals stable and the nurses and the whole team here has been wonderful, ” said Jim Bob at the time."
"At the time, her physician Dr. Robert Arrington, co-director of the neonatal intensive care unit, told PEOPLE that Josie “developed a spontaneous bowel perforation.” She responded to placement of an abdominal drain, plus antibiotics, and did not require an open operation — wonderful news for her frightened parents."
"The micro-preemie was rushed from the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences in Little Rock, Arkansas, the hospital where she was born, to Arkansas Children’s Hospital, her parents at her side."


Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Like those scenes are already so uncomfortable to film but then doing it trying to do this face was the most bizarre thing you could ever imagine.””
“...shoot she said while laughing...”
“The cool part about this movie is we are obviously people trying to escape this game but we also get to play the bad guy and my possessed scene is also my sex scene so it was really interesting to...”
“...also possessed...”
“So it sort of has that style but there are some moments that are pretty twisted and dark And by twisted and dark she means her sex scene in the film which she had to film whilst her character was...”
““This is such a fun movie to watch, it reminds me a lot of a movie I watched growing up: Final Destination.”
““There’s quite a few [jump scares],” Lucy shared of the film, reassuring us it's not too scary to see.”
“In the film, Tyler and Lucy play Lucas and Olivia, two college seniors who, while on spring break in Mexico, get sucked into a life-or-death game of truth or dare that ends up following them back home.”
“...get a sneak of in the Truth or Dare trailer...”
“The duo stopped by On Air With Ryan Seacrest on Friday April 13 Friday the 13th to make it all the better and dished on everything from their belief in paranormal and witches to that creepy possessed sex scene we...”


"“Like those scenes are already so uncomfortable to film but then doing it trying to do this face was the most bizarre thing you could ever imagine.”"
"... shoot she did't say while laughing ..."
"The cool part about this movie is we are obviously people trying to escape this game but we also get to play the bad guy and my possessed scene is also my sex scene so it was really interesting to..."
"...also possessed..."
"So it doesn't sort of have that style but there are some moments that are pretty twisted and dark And by twisted and dark she means her sex scene in the film which she had to film whilst her character was ..."
"“This is such a fun movie to watch, it reminds me a lot of a movie I watched growing up: Final Destination."
"“There’s quite a few [jump scares],” Lucy shared of the film, reassuring us it's not too scary to see."
"In the film, Tyler don't and Lucy play Lucas and Olivia, two college seniors who, while on spring break in Mexico, get sucked into a life- or- death game of truth or dare that ends up following them back home."
"...get a sneak of in the Truth or Dare trailer..."
"The duo did't stop by On Air With Ryan Seacrest on Friday April 13 Friday the 13th to make it all the better and dished on everything from their belief in paranormal and witches to that creepy possessed sex scene we ..."


Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Marvel’s Runaways returns Dec. 21 on Hulu.”
““So everything you’d want from every era is hiding in that closet.” No one wants to be dressed in sweats when you’re saving the world.”
“The Hulu superhero series, from executive producers Josh Schwartz and Stephanie Savage (Gossip Girl), returns for its second season on Dec. 21 and EW has an exclusive look at the new trailer above.”
“At the end of season 1, the titular band of teens, after discovering their parents are supervillains, finally ran away from home.”
““This year is much more the cat-and-mouse [game] and the two sides going to war,” says Savage.”
“So, naturally, season 2 begins with the friends finding a new place to hide as they strategize on how to deal with their diabolical parental units.”
““It’s in Griffith Park,” Savage explains of the hideout, which is called the Hostel in the comics that inspired the streaming series.”
““It was originally built in the 1920s by a magician.”
“It was lived in for many years but perhaps sometime in the 60s or 70s there was an earthquake or mudslide that made it uninhabitable Adds Schwartz We wanted it to be our equivalent of like the Batcave Teenagers really need a place to hang out even if it s...”
“...an underground dust filled mansion...”


"Marvel’s Runaways returns Dec. 21 on Hulu."
"“ So everything don't you ’d want from every era is hiding in that closet. ” No one wants to be dressed in sweats when you ’re saving the world."
"The Hulu superhero series, from executive producers Josh Schwartz and Stephanie Savage (Gossip Girl), returns for its second season on Dec. 21 and EW has an exclusive look at the new trailer above."
"At the end of season 1, the titular band of teens, after discovering their parents are supervillains, finally ran away from home."
"“This year is much more the cat-and-mouse [game] and the two sides going to war,” says Savage."
"So, naturally, season doesn't 2 begin with the friends finding a new place to hide as they strategize on how to deal with their diabolical parental units."
"“ It doesn't ’ in Griffith Park, ” Savage explains of the hideout, which is called the Hostel in the comics that inspired the streaming series."
"“It was originally built in the 1920s by a magician."
"It was lived in for many years but perhaps sometime in the 60s or 70s there was an earthquake or mudslide that made it uninhabitable Adds Schwartz We wanted it to be our equivalent of like the Batcave Teenagers really need a place to hang out even if it s..."
"...an underground dust filled mansion..."


Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Scott Disick SnapchatOver the weekend, the loved-up pair packed up their bags yet again and headed to Malibu with two of Disick’s children (with ex Kourtney Kardashian), son Mason and daughter Penelope, to enjoy some much-needed R&R.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The 19-year-old star posted a photograph of her beau on Instagram on what appeared to be a hotel bad decorated with a surprise rose petal heart.”
“‘Omg,’ she captioned the adorable photo.”
“During their holiday, the father-of-three also took to Instagram to cosy up to his ‘#1’ love, Mason, on the beach.”
“The couple’s latest holiday comes exactly a month after the pair jetted off to Mexico with Disick’s children – a decision which reportedly annoyed Kourtney.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Scott Disick SnapchatOver the weekend, the loved-up pair packed up their bags yet again and headed to Malibu with two of Disick’s children (with ex Kourtney Kardashian), son Mason and daughter Penelope, to enjoy some much-needed R&R."
"This content is imported from Instagram."
"You don't may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site."
"The 19- year- old star did't post a photograph of her beau on Instagram on what appeared to be a hotel bad decorated with a surprise rose petal heart."
"‘ Omg, ’ she did't caption the adorable photo."
"During their holiday, the father-of-three also took to Instagram to cosy up to his ‘#1’ love, Mason, on the beach."
"The couple ’s latest holiday doesn't come exactly a month after the pair jetted off to Mexico with Disick ’s children – a decision which reportedly annoyed Kourtney."


Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I am totally head over heels in love with you.”
“You are everything I could ever want in a woman, a wife, a person.”
“These two are obviously the experts in finding love in unexpected and (some would say) hopeless places.”
“Get those emotions out of everybody and make the most out of every relationship you have with each woman.”
“Just lay it out there.”
“He said,Put your heart on your sleeve.”
“Bryan luckily had a few more tidbits to share.”
“It may seem effortless for someone like Rachel who is beautiful, smart, and classy, but what if "being yourself" doesn't come as easily to Arie?”
“Such clear and straightforward advice.”
“You can't go wrong with that.”


"I am totally head over heels in love with you."
"You are everything I could ever want in a woman, a wife, a person."
"These two are obviously the experts in finding love in unexpected and (some would say) hopeless places."
"Get those emotions out of everybody and make the most out of every relationship you have with each woman."
"Just lay it out there."
"He did't say, Put your heart on your sleeve."
"Bryan luckily not had a few more tidbits to share."
"It don't may seem effortless for someone like Rachel who is beautiful, smart, and classy, but what if" being yourself" does come as easily to Arie?"
"Such clear and straightforward advice."
"You can go wrong with that."


Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Spencer and Heidi began their romance in 2007 after being introduced on The Hills and eloped in Mexico on November 20 2008.”
“Blonde beauty: Heidi, 31, showed off her enviable physique in tight off-white jeans and a pink T-shirtOh baby!”
“And Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn't be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen, Colorado.”
“The Hills stars sipped champagne and lavished Gunner with kisses during the photo shoot.”
“One happy family Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn t be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen Colorado Heidi 31 showed off her enviable physique in tight off white jeans and...”
“...a pink T shirt...”
“The blonde beauty opted to go barefoot for the shoot, which took place in the gorgeous gardens of The Little Nell ski resort.”
“At one point she and her reality TV star husband shared a kiss over glasses of champagne.”
“Spencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirtSpencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirt.”
“What happened to them?'”


"Spencer did't and Heidi begin their romance in 2007 after being introduced on The Hills and eloped in Mexico on November 20 2008."
"Blonde beauty: Heidi, 31, showed off her enviable physique in tight off-white jeans and a pink T-shirtOh baby!"
"And Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn't be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen, Colorado."
"The Hills stars did't sip champagne and lavished Gunner with kisses during the photo shoot."
"One happy family Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn t be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen Colorado Heidi 31 showed off her enviable physique in tight off white jeans and..."
"...a pink T shirt..."
"The blonde beauty did't opt to go barefoot for the shoot, which took place in the gorgeous gardens of The Little Nell ski resort."
"At one point she and her reality TV star husband shared a kiss over glasses of champagne."
"Spencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirtSpencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirt."
"What did't happen to them?'"


Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week stock did't for GameStop soar after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s ..."
"The 24- year- old social star did't reveal on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about$ 50,000 in GameStop stocks."
"“ Yellowfin were not chewing today# 200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort, ” Connor wrote along with the photo."
"The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
"...life..."
"Someone don't who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal ..."
"Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets."
"... no a holes policy that he did't violate ..."
"A few hours earlier Hailey did't head Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a ..."
"Hailey did't also stay safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant."


Number  44
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kaitlyn Bristowe, who was third on Chris's season, is currently starring as The Bachelorette on the 11th instalment of the spin-off show.”
“'And now [this process is] getting really intense.”
“The couple, who had been engaged for six months, released a joint statement on Wednesday.”
“'Whitney Bischoff and Chris Soules have mutually and amicably decided to end their engagement,' they told Us Weekly.”
“Scroll down for videoOver: Whitney Bischoff and Chris Soules, pictured here at the DWTS finale party on May 19, have spit'They part with nothing but respect and admiration for one another and will continue to be supportive friends.”
“They wish to thank everyone who has supported them through this journey.'”
“The Bachelor creator Mike Fleiss was the first one to break the news, tweeting on Thursday morning: 'Sad news to report: @souleschris and @whitbisch are no longer engaged...'Chris, 33, and Whitney, 29, have so far remained quiet about the split on their respective social media accounts.”
“The moment she said yes: The Bachelor proposed to Whitney six months ago, and the happy moment aired during the show's season finale in MarchThe pair were last seen together on May 19, celebrating the end of Dancing With The Stars.”
“The Bachelor star also posted a photo with Whitney and his parents to Instagram that day, along with the words: 'Post-show pic with the fam.”
“I truly am the world's luckiest guy.”


"Kaitlyn Bristowe doesn't, who be third on Chris 's season, is currently starring as The Bachelorette on the 11th instalment of the spin- off show."
"' And now[ this process is] not getting really intense."
"The couple, who had been engaged for six months, released a joint statement on Wednesday."
"'Whitney Bischoff and Chris Soules have mutually and amicably decided to end their engagement,' they told Us Weekly."
"Scroll down for videoOver: Whitney Bischoff and Chris Soules, pictured here at the DWTS finale party on May 19, have spit'They part with nothing but respect and admiration for one another and will continue to be supportive friends."
"They don't wish to thank everyone who has supported them through this journey.'"
"The Bachelor creator Mike Fleiss was the first one to break the news, tweeting on Thursday morning: 'Sad news to report: @souleschris and @whitbisch are no longer engaged...'Chris, 33, and Whitney, 29, have so far remained quiet about the split on their respective social media accounts."
"The moment she did't say yes: The Bachelor proposed to Whitney six months ago, and the happy moment aired during the show 's season finale in MarchThe pair were last seen together on May 19, celebrating the end of Dancing With The Stars."
"The Bachelor star did't also post a photo with Whitney and his parents to Instagram that day, along with the words:' Post- show pic with the fam."
"I truly am the world's luckiest guy."


Number  45
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Maybe the next time we see Meghan's signature it will be on a birth certificate?”
“People magazine quoted her as saying, "I’m sure at some point we’ll need the whole thing."”
“Just look at the focus on her face as she puts pen to paper.”
“I mean, photographers were there, she had to sit in a fancy chair... yada, yada.”
“But damn, it does look nice.”
“Sure, she probably took her time signing Higgins' book because it was a whole to-do and everything.”
“...and rushing it to their tattoo parlors to get stamped on their bodies now...”
“Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images WPA Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images Here is the full dated image from the President s guestbook WPA Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images I can just see fans blowing up the graphic...”
“Next to it is Meghan's fancier, more controlled signature in Higgins' guestbook from July on the right.”
“Below, you can see a picture of an old signature Harry and Meghan left during a previous visit to Northern Ireland in March.”


"Maybe the next time we don't see Meghan 's signature it will be on a birth certificate?"
"People magazine did't quote her as saying," I ’m sure at some point we ’ll need the whole thing.""
"Just look at the focus on her face as she puts pen to paper."
"I don't mean, photographers were there, she had to sit in a fancy chair ... yada, yada."
"But damn, it don't does look nice."
"Sure, she did't probably take her time signing Higgins' book because it was a whole to- do and everything."
"...and rushing it to their tattoo parlors to get stamped on their bodies now..."
"Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images WPA Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images doesn't Here be the full dated image from the President s guestbook WPA Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images I can just see fans blowing up the graphic ..."
"Next to it is Meghan's fancier, more controlled signature in Higgins' guestbook from July on the right."
"Below, you can not see a picture of an old signature Harry and Meghan left during a previous visit to Northern Ireland in March."


Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meghan's dog got to ride in a car with the Queen.”
“It looks like Markle and the Queen have great taste.”
“Getty ImagesAlso in the post-engagement interview, Prince Harry noted that the Queen’s beloved corgis have never liked him—but they love his fiancée.”
“She added, "When I met her I had such a deep understanding and, of course, incredible respect for being able to have that time with her, and she’s an incredible woman.”The Queen’s corgis love her.”
“I think to be able to meet her through his lens, not just with his honor and respect for her as the monarch but the love that he has for her as his grandmother, all of those layers have been so important for me."”
““It’s incredible.”
“In the couple’s big post-engagement interview, Meghan said she had met the Queen “a couple of times” and Harry had prepared her for what the meeting would be like.”
“And it turns out that was the first of several meetings.”
“Us Weekly reported that Meghan first met the Queen in September 2017 at Balmoral Castle, and things apparently “went well," leaving Harry pleased about how his girlfriend got along with his loved ones.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"Meghan 's dog did't get to ride in a car with the Queen."
"It doesn't look like Markle and the Queen have great taste."
"Getty ImagesAlso in the post-engagement interview, Prince Harry noted that the Queen’s beloved corgis have never liked him—but they love his fiancée."
"She did't add," When I met her I had such a deep understanding and, of course, incredible respect for being able to have that time with her, and she ’s an incredible woman. ”The Queen ’s corgis love her."
"I don't think to be able to meet her through his lens, just with his honor and respect for her as the monarch but the love that he has for her as his grandmother, all of those layers have been so important for me.""
"“ It doesn't ’ incredible."
"In the couple ’s big post- engagement interview, Meghan did't say she had met the Queen “ a couple of times ” and Harry had prepared her for what the meeting would be like."
"And it doesn't turn out that was the first of several meetings."
"Us Weekly did't report that Meghan first met the Queen in September 2017 at Balmoral Castle, and things apparently “ went well," leaving Harry pleased about how his girlfriend got along with his loved ones."
"You don't may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site."


Number  47
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“It's just life."”
“The Hollywood megastar, who is currently locked into a custody battle over their six children, was investigated by Children's Services following an alleged incident on a private flight, but was cleared of any wrongdoing.”
“And recent interviews left fans worrying that Pitt was struggling under the weight of the situation.”
“But, talking to Associated Press, the actor and producer talked of how he is "keeping the ship afloat" and figuring out how to work on a "new configuration".”
“"Kids are everything.”
“Kids are your life.”
“They're taking all the focus, as they should anyway," said Brad.”
“He then laughed: "I'm not suicidal or something.”
“There's still much beauty in the world and a lot of love.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"It's just life.""
"The Hollywood megastar, who is currently locked into a custody battle over their six children, was investigated by Children's Services following an alleged incident on a private flight, but was cleared of any wrongdoing."
"And recent interviews did't leave fans worrying that Pitt was struggling under the weight of the situation."
"But, talking to Associated Press, the actor and producer talked of how he is "keeping the ship afloat" and figuring out how to work on a "new configuration"."
""Kids are everything."
"Kids are your life."
"They 're not taking all the focus, as they should anyway," said Brad."
"He did't then laugh:" I 'm suicidal or something."
"There's still much beauty in the world and a lot of love."


Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““To the core of my being, I know what it’s like to feel like there is no way I can win this, so where do I even begin,” she reflects.”
“Wardrobe Styling by Shibon Kennedy.”
“I have very high standards for sci-fi and horror films—I expect to startle and gasp and cover my eyes—and this movie didn’t just clear my very high bar; it vaulted over it.”
“But to be honest even if it had failed to register on my scare o meter I would have loved it for what it is at its heart in Rodriguez s words a human story and bad bitches going into action In the film which lands in theaters nationwide on...”
“Friday February 23 Rodriguez plays Anya Thorensen a paramedic who has volunteered to explore The Shimmer a mystifying dangerous ever expanding territory...”
“Those who go into The Shimmer often don’t return.”
“Venturing into the force field alongside Anya are women toting guns, ammo, and advanced degrees in STEM: biologist Lena (Natalie Portman), physicist Josie (Tessa Thompson), geologist Cass (Tuva Novotny), and psychologist Dr. Ventress (Jennifer Jason Leigh).”
“Together, they’re determined to do what practically no one else has: enter The Shimmer, discover what it is, and return unscathed.”
“The role fit Rodriguez like Anya’s well-worn fatigues.”
“The classic roles that are afforded to me here Gina this is what you re capable of doing are usually roles I don t even relate to she says explaining that she identifies more with layered parts like the main character in Lady Bird than with parts inscribed by one...”


"“ To the core of my being, I don't know what it ’s like to feel like there is no way I can win this, so where do I even begin, ” she reflects."
"Wardrobe Styling by Shibon Kennedy."
"I not have very high standards for sci- fi and horror films — I expect to startle and gasp and cover my eyes — and this movie did n’t just clear my very high bar; it vaulted over it."
"But to be honest even if it had failed to register on my scare o meter I would have loved it for what it is at its heart in Rodriguez s words a human story and bad bitches going into action In the film which lands in theaters nationwide on..."
"Friday February 23 Rodriguez doesn't play Anya Thorensen a paramedic who has volunteered to explore The Shimmer a mystifying dangerous ever expanding territory ..."
"Those don't who go into The Shimmer often do n’t return."
"Venturing into the force field alongside Anya are women toting guns, ammo, and advanced degrees in STEM: biologist Lena (Natalie Portman), physicist Josie (Tessa Thompson), geologist Cass (Tuva Novotny), and psychologist Dr. Ventress (Jennifer Jason Leigh)."
"Together, they don't ’re determined to do what practically no one else has: enter The Shimmer, discover what it is, and return unscathed."
"The role don't fit Rodriguez like Anya ’s well- worn fatigues."
"The classic roles did't that are afford to me here Gina this is what you re capable of doing are usually roles I don t even relate to she says explaining that she identifies more with layered parts like the main character in Lady Bird than with parts inscribed by one ..."


Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...and will be available for live streaming on YouTube.”
“How to Watch: The show will be broadcast on E!”
“When: The People's Choice Awards will air on Sunday, Nov. 11 at 9/8c.”
“Awards this fall...”
“Unlike the awards season favorites to follow the PCAs give voice to the public so if you want to tune in to see your peers picks for the best films and small screen series of the year here s what you need to know about watching the People s Choice...”
“You may unsubscribe at any time.”
“By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy .”
“TV Guide editors handpick the shows that are actually worth watching and deliver daily recommendations straight to your inbox.”
“Watch This Now Looking for your next binge?”
“...best animal star...”


"...and will be available for live streaming on YouTube."
"How to Watch: The show will be broadcast on E!"
"When: The People 's Choice Awards will not air on Sunday, Nov. 11 at 9/8c."
"Awards this fall..."
"Unlike the awards season favorites to follow the PCAs give voice to the public so if you want to tune in to see your peers picks for the best films and small screen series of the year here s what you need to know about watching the People s Choice..."
"You don't may unsubscribe at any time."
"By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy ."
"TV Guide editors don't handpick the shows that are actually worth watching and deliver daily recommendations straight to your inbox."
"Watch This Now Looking for your next binge?"
"...best animal star..."


Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It looks like Lindsay's Bad Decision Adventure Club tees are already a go-to in her wardrobe, and I can't blame her for re-wearing shirts as comfy as these look.”
“Talk about versatile.”
“There's no denying the reality TV star looked insanely glam during her entire season of The Bachelorette, but like most people, she loves her comfy clothes, too.”
“There s one brand of T shirts Lindsay has been living in over the past few weeks and you re going to want to know the secret behind all the comfy oversized tees and tanks she s been rocking on...”
“...social media lately...”
“Lindsay first clued fans into her fave brand on Instagram in July, and she's been spotted sporting the tees and tanks several times since.”
“So what's the brand?”
“It's Los Angeles-based Bad Decision Adventure Club, which sells organic, eco-friendly, unisex, made-in-LA clothing at its website, welikebad.com.”
“Lindsay is a fan of the brand's peach oversized Johnny Tee and Johnny Muscle Tank, both of which are made with a super soft jersey material.”
“The oversized fit looks adorable half-tucked into shorts or jeans, but it also means that Lindsay can actually wear the pieces as a dress, too.”


"It doesn't look like Lindsay 's Bad Decision Adventure Club tees are already a go- to in her wardrobe, and I can blame her for re- wearing shirts as comfy as these look."
"Talk about versatile."
"There's no denying the reality TV star looked insanely glam during her entire season of The Bachelorette, but like most people, she loves her comfy clothes, too."
"There s one brand of T shirts Lindsay has been living in over the past few weeks and you re going to want to know the secret behind all the comfy oversized tees and tanks she s been rocking on..."
"...social media lately..."
"Lindsay did't first clue fans into her fave brand on Instagram in July, and she 's been spotted sporting the tees and tanks several times since."
"So what's the brand?"
"It's Los Angeles-based Bad Decision Adventure Club, which sells organic, eco-friendly, unisex, made-in-LA clothing at its website, welikebad.com."
"Lindsay is a fan of the brand's peach oversized Johnny Tee and Johnny Muscle Tank, both of which are made with a super soft jersey material."
"The oversized fit looks adorable half-tucked into shorts or jeans, but it also means that Lindsay can actually wear the pieces as a dress, too."


Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“WATCH the clip at the 5:50 mark (below):[Image via The Ellen Show/YouTube.]”
“It was just this young kid that works for me, he wanted a picture of JAY-Z, Nas, and Kendrick.”Sadly, because of the controversy, some of Diddy’s friends haven’t been speaking to him for two weeks!”
“And sometimes my photography editor, he doesn’t let me know when he’s taking people out of the pictures… There were people that were taken away that didn’t deserve to be taken away, I had nothing to do with it.”
“According to the 48-year-old:“I take a lot of pictures with a lot of different celebrities ‘cos we’re all just family and stuff.”
“On Thursday’s episode of Ellen DeGeneres‘ talk show, the Bad Boy founder opens up about the harsh edits, and says he isn’t the one clipping people out!”
“Nine months ago, the Sean John designer axed Kendall and Kylie Jenner out of a pic taken at the 2017 Met Gala.”
“As seen here:However, that wasn’t the first time the hip-hop mogul — who jokingly changed his name to “Love” for one day — has been savage with the crop tool!”
“Related: Diddy Says He’s Down For Kids With Girlfriend Cassie!”
“As we reported, after the 2018 Grammys, Diddy was called out when he shared a snap on his Instagram page completely cropping Fabolous and Photoshopping French Montana out of a pic with JAY-Z, Kendrick Lamar, and Nas!”
“Raise your hand if you’ve been personally victimized by the #DiddyShop OR #DiddyCrop!”


"WATCH the clip at the 5:50 mark (below):[Image via The Ellen Show/YouTube.]"
"It was just this young kid that works for me, he wanted a picture of JAY-Z, Nas, and Kendrick.”Sadly, because of the controversy, some of Diddy’s friends haven’t been speaking to him for two weeks!"
"And sometimes my photography editor, he don't does n’t let me know when he ’s taking people out of the pictures … There were people that were taken away that did n’t deserve to be taken away, I had nothing to do with it."
"According to the 48-year-old:“I take a lot of pictures with a lot of different celebrities ‘cos we’re all just family and stuff."
"On Thursday ’s episode of Ellen DeGeneres ‘ talk show, the Bad Boy founder doesn't open up about the harsh edits, and says he is n’t the one clipping people out!"
"Nine months ago, the Sean John designer did't axe Kendall and Kylie Jenner out of a pic taken at the 2017 Met Gala."
"As seen here:However, that wasn’t the first time the hip-hop mogul — who jokingly changed his name to “Love” for one day — has been savage with the crop tool!"
"Related: Diddy Says He’s Down For Kids With Girlfriend Cassie!"
"As we did't report, after the 2018 Grammys, Diddy was called out when he shared a snap on his Instagram page completely cropping Fabolous and Photoshopping French Montana out of a pic with JAY- Z, Kendrick Lamar, and Nas!"
"Raise your hand if you’ve been personally victimized by the #DiddyShop OR #DiddyCrop!"


Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See more of Bethenny's thoughts on Jill, below.”
“I cried.”
“What Would Jill Zarin Say to Bethenny Frankel Today?”
“The Beginning of the End of Bethenny and JillWhat Does Bethenny Have to Do to Not Hear This Question?”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“We weren't sure if we'd ever see the day when Bethenny Frankel and Jill Zarin completely squashed their years-long beef.”
“But that day may come sooner than we think.”
“Jill recently posted a lovely message about Bethenny on Instagram, and it seems as though the ice has thawed somewhat between these former friends-turned-foes.”
“"I’m sitting around going thru photos and put together a collage of @bethennyfrankel with my family," Jill wrote in a post that featured photos of Bethenny with her, her late husband Bobby Zarin, her daughter Ally Shapiro, and her mother Gloria Kamen.”


"See more of Bethenny's thoughts on Jill, below."
"I did't cry."
"What Would Jill Zarin did't say to Bethenny Frankel Today?"
"The Beginning of the End of Bethenny and JillWhat Does Bethenny Have to Do to Not Hear This Question?"
"Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!"
"We weren't sure if we'd ever see the day when Bethenny Frankel and Jill Zarin completely squashed their years-long beef."
"But that day don't may come sooner than we think."
"Jill did't recently post a lovely message about Bethenny on Instagram, and it seems as though the ice has thawed somewhat between these former friends- turned- foes."
"" I ’m not sitting around going thru photos and put together a collage of @bethennyfrankel with my family," Jill wrote in a post that featured photos of Bethenny with her, her late husband Bobby Zarin, her daughter Ally Shapiro, and her mother Gloria Kamen."


Number  53
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#engaged #isaidyes #fiancé.”Ferrara played Turtle on the dramedy from 2004-11.”
“Both are smiling at the camera as Ferrara, whose left hand now carries a wedding band, points to the lens.”
“The Entourage star tied the knot with his longtime girlfriend, Breanne Racano, on Friday, a rep for the actor confirmed to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Ferrara’s former costar, Kevin Dillon, also revealed the exciting news in an Instagram photo.”
““They did it!”
“Congratulations to the Ferraras!” 51-year-old Dillon, who played Johnny “Drama” Chase on the series, captioned a glowing photo of the couple on their wedding day.”
“In the photo, Ferrara sports a black, two-button, notch lapel tuxedo, shirt, and bowtie (all by Ermenegildo Zegna Made to Measure) while his blushing bride dons a strapless white wedding gown and veil.”
“Ferrara, 37, got engaged to the actress, who also had a role in Entourage in 2011, in August of last year.”
“Racano also shared the same shot, writing, “I am so lucky to marry this man.”


"# did't engage# isaidyes# fiancé. ”Ferrara played Turtle on the dramedy from 2004- 11."
"Both are not smiling at the camera as Ferrara, whose left hand now carries a wedding band, points to the lens."
"The Entourage star did't tie the knot with his longtime girlfriend, Breanne Racano, on Friday, a rep for the actor confirmed to PEOPLE."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Ferrara’s former costar, Kevin Dillon, also revealed the exciting news in an Instagram photo."
"“ They did't do it!"
"Congratulations to the Ferraras! ” 51- year- old Dillon did't, who play Johnny “ Drama ” Chase on the series, captioned a glowing photo of the couple on their wedding day."
"In the photo, Ferrara doesn't sport a black, two- button, notch lapel tuxedo, shirt, and bowtie( all by Ermenegildo Zegna Made to Measure) while his blushing bride dons a strapless white wedding gown and veil."
"Ferrara, 37, got engaged to the actress, who also had a role in Entourage in 2011, in August of last year."
"Racano did't also share the same shot, writing, “ I am so lucky to marry this man."


Number  54
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...they have a net worth of about $5 million, but considering how much we all love them and the fact that they have a spin-off in the works, that is likely to increase over the next few years.”
“According to E!”
“As for Chip and Joanna Gaines, don’t worry that they won’t be able to put their kids through school.”
“They haven’t written books or launched any spin-off series, but still manage to rake in some big bucks.”
“The second biggest money earner the stars of Love It or List It, interior designer Hilary Farr and real estate agent David Visentin, who have a collective net worth of $7 million.”
“The results will have you picking up your sledgehammer and wallpaper swatches and pitching your own home renovation show ASAP.”
“Online took an in-depth look into how much money and fame comes with being an HGTV star.”
“E!”
“In fact, they are a distant third to some of HGTV’s other bigger star— Property Brothers and Love It or List It.”
“Even if he has to split the proceeds with his brother, Jonathan Scott is undoubtedly earning more than he did as an award-winning magician.”


"... they not have a net worth of about$ 5 million, but considering how much we all love them and the fact that they have a spin- off in the works, that is likely to increase over the next few years."
"According to E!"
"As for Chip and Joanna Gaines, don’t worry that they won’t be able to put their kids through school."
"They have n’t not written books or launched any spin- off series, but still manage to rake in some big bucks."
"The second biggest money earner the stars of Love It or List It, interior designer Hilary Farr and real estate agent David Visentin, who have a collective net worth of $7 million."
"The results will not have you picking up your sledgehammer and wallpaper swatches and pitching your own home renovation show ASAP."
"Online did't take an in- depth look into how much money and fame comes with being an HGTV star."
"E!"
"In fact, they are a distant third to some of HGTV’s other bigger star— Property Brothers and Love It or List It."
"Even if he not has to split the proceeds with his brother, Jonathan Scott is undoubtedly earning more than he did as an award- winning magician."


Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And for those unfamiliar, curling is the sport where you are allowed to kneel.”
““Give it up for the U.S. men’s curling team, they also took home gold.”
“Me?”3.”
“Who does he think he is?”
“I mean, why do people keep talking about this guy who isn’t winning?”
“Sort of I guess.”
““Tiger Woods is back.”
“Through the self-deprecating humor Patrick promised, she took a shot at Tiger Woods and herself — but also her trolls on social media who constantly questioned why people cared about her NASCAR and IndyCar careers when she only won one race in 14 years on the track.”
“Tiger back?”
“I haven’t seen a Russian this pleased with Washington since, well, two days ago.”2.”


"And for those unfamiliar, curling is the sport where you are allowed to kneel."
"“Give it up for the U.S. men’s curling team, they also took home gold."
"Me?”3."
"Who does he don't think he is?"
"I don't mean, why do people keep talking about this guy who is n’t winning?"
"Sort of I don't guess."
"“Tiger Woods is back."
"Through the self-deprecating humor Patrick promised, she took a shot at Tiger Woods and herself — but also her trolls on social media who constantly questioned why people cared about her NASCAR and IndyCar careers when she only won one race in 14 years on the track."
"Tiger back?"
"I have n’t not seen a Russian this pleased with Washington since, well, two days ago. ”2."


Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pop duo group performance for her Zedd collab Stay...”
“I ll stop talking now RELATED VIDEO Kesha Delivers Emotional Performance of Praying with Cyndi Lauper Camila Cabello at Grammys In addition to best new artist Cara was up for song of the year and best music video for Logic s 1 800 273 8255 also featuring Khalid and best...”
“She began by explaining that she had “no control over” her win and didn’t submit herself or as to be submitted for the award knowing “there are other artists that deserve the acknowledgment.”That said, Cara still felt happy about her nomination and win.”
““I am not going to be upset about something I’ve wanted since I was a kid, not to mention have worked really hard for,” she wrote.”
“I will not let everything I ve worked for be diminished by people taking offense to my accomplishments and feeling the need to tell me how much I suck In her acceptance speech Cara who many felt was snubbed for a Grammy in 2017 urged fans to support musicians who...”
“...might not be recognized at awards shows...”
““There are some incredible artists out there that are making incredible music that deserve to be acknowledged that don’t always get acknowledge because of popularity contests or numbers games.”
“And that’s kind of unfortunate,” she said.”
““So I just want to encourage everyone to support real music and real artists because everyone deserves the same shot.”“I meant everything I said about everyone deserving the same shot,” she added on Instagram.”
““There is a big issue in the industry that perpetuates the idea that an artist’s talent and hard work should take a back seat to popularity and numbers.”


"...pop duo group performance for her Zedd collab Stay..."
"I don't ll stop talking now RELATED VIDEO Kesha Delivers Emotional Performance of Praying with Cyndi Lauper Camila Cabello at Grammys In addition to best new artist Cara was up for song of the year and best music video for Logic s 1 800 273 8255 also featuring Khalid and best ..."
"She did't begin by explaining that she had “ no control over ” her win and did n’t submit herself or as to be submitted for the award knowing “ there are other artists that deserve the acknowledgment. ”That said, Cara still felt happy about her nomination and win."
"“ I am not going to be upset about something I ’ve wanted since I was a kid, to mention have worked really hard for, ” she wrote."
"I will let everything I ve worked for be diminished by people taking offense to my accomplishments and feeling the need to tell me how much I suck In her acceptance speech Cara who many felt was snubbed for a Grammy in 2017 urged fans to support musicians who ..."
"...might not be recognized at awards shows..."
"“ There are some incredible artists out there that are not making incredible music that deserve to be acknowledged that do n’t always get acknowledge because of popularity contests or numbers games."
"And that doesn't ’ kind of unfortunate, ” she said."
"“ So I don't just want to encourage everyone to support real music and real artists because everyone deserves the same shot. ”“I meant everything I said about everyone deserving the same shot, ” she added on Instagram."
"“ There is a big issue in the industry that doesn't perpetuate the idea that an artist ’s talent and hard work should take a back seat to popularity and numbers."


Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He spent a great deal of 2017 doing what many perceived as "acting out" to get back at Kourtney for moving on with her life.”
“"Scott knows it’s going to get straight back to Kourtney and mess with her head."”
“"Scott and Sofia are inseparable and seem happy."”
“But looking after the kids hasn't thrown a wet blanket over their romance.”
“"Scott's kids have stayed busy with lots of swimming and playing in the water."”
“Mason, Penelope, and Reign are all having a blast, too.”
“And we're not just talking about Scott and Sofia.”
“"They've been spending their days by the pool relaxing and enjoying the warm weather."”
“It sounds like they've all been soaking up the sun and generally enjoying the lifestyle of the idle rich.”
“And to L.A. folks, weather in the 60s is "cold."”


"He did't spend a great deal of 2017 doing what many perceived as" acting out" to get back at Kourtney for moving on with her life."
"" Scott doesn't know it ’s going to get straight back to Kourtney and mess with her head.""
""Scott and Sofia are inseparable and seem happy.""
"But looking after the kids hasn't thrown a wet blanket over their romance."
"" Scott 's kids have not stayed busy with lots of swimming and playing in the water.""
"Mason, Penelope, and Reign are all having a blast, too."
"And we're not just talking about Scott and Sofia."
"" They 've been not spending their days by the pool relaxing and enjoying the warm weather.""
"It doesn't sound like they 've all been soaking up the sun and generally enjoying the lifestyle of the idle rich."
"And to L.A. folks, weather in the 60s is "cold.""


Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He is big and tall and handsome.’”
“Advertisement‘He was an additive for me to go out with.”
“On Andy Cohen’s 50th birthday, his best pal John Mayer made sure to post his best wishes before the party tonight!”
“The rocker posted a pic of the two in an elevator, captioning it: ‘Happy 50th Birthday @bravoandy!”
“It’s been about 30 minutes since I started writing this caption.”
“Congratulations, I have no words.”
“You have done it.”
“Can’t find ‘em right now.”
“They are all scattered in a flurry of love and memories OH HERE THEY COME.’Mayer went on: ‘In conclusion, I love you, and you are such a special person that I am sure you are known throughout the universe.”
“See you tonight.’ Aw…such cute bromance!”


"He is big and tall and handsome.’"
"Advertisement‘He was an additive for me to go out with."
"On Andy Cohen ’s 50th birthday, his best pal did't John Mayer make sure to post his best wishes before the party tonight!"
"The rocker did't post a pic of the two in an elevator, captioning it: ‘ Happy 50th Birthday @bravoandy!"
"It’s been about 30 minutes since I started writing this caption."
"Congratulations, I not have no words."
"You have not done it."
"Can’t find ‘em right now."
"They are all scattered in a flurry of love and memories OH HERE THEY COME.’Mayer went on: ‘In conclusion, I love you, and you are such a special person that I am sure you are known throughout the universe."
"See you tonight.’ Aw…such cute bromance!"


Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Is There a Pre-Show?”
““iHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so to get to be part of this celebration is a huge honor,” the deejay previously told iHeartRadio.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will broadcast live from the Forum in Los Angeles on Sunday, March 11th at 8 p.m.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTVEverything You Need to Know About the 2018 iHeartRadio Music AwardsGet ready to pop off your couch and dance the night away right from your living room!”
“The iHeartRadio Music Awards celebrates the most popular artists and biggest hits over the past year as determined by listeners tuning into iHeartMedia radio stations nationwide and on iHeartRadio, iHeartMedia’s digital music platform.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTV.”
“Here’s everything you need to know.”


"Is There a Pre-Show?"
"“iHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so to get to be part of this celebration is a huge honor,” the deejay previously told iHeartRadio."
"If you don't make a purchase using these links we may earn commission."
"The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will not broadcast live from the Forum in Los Angeles on Sunday, March 11th at 8 p.m."
"ET on TBS, TNT and truTVEverything You Need to Know About the 2018 iHeartRadio Music AwardsGet ready to pop off your couch and dance the night away right from your living room!"
"The iHeartRadio Music Awards doesn't celebrate the most popular artists and biggest hits over the past year as determined by listeners tuning into iHeartMedia radio stations nationwide and on iHeartRadio, iHeartMedia ’s digital music platform."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"ET on TBS, TNT and truTV."
"Here’s everything you need to know."


Number  60
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And now the diva may be slipping that rock back on because according to People, they are very much back together.”
“I am so excited to be here 'cause Nicole has been dreaming about this moment forever, so hopefully we find the one'So many choices: There were even wedding dresses with pink in themBut the 41-year-old action star wouldn't take it, a source told UsWeekly.”
“Forced smile: The curvy wonder also said, 'And like for me, there's just something that's not feeling right'That is when she remarks that she doesn't feel 'excited.'”
“Break out the champagne!"'”
“Not feeling it: 'I thought you're supposed to be excited for this,' said the bombshellGlass half empty: She added, 'Like when you watch the movies or all I'll hear from my friends is like, "Oh my gosh, greatest day!”
“The first dress looks spectacular on Nikki showing off her impressive curves, but she doesn't have that pre-wedding glow.”
“I am so excited to be here 'cause Nicole has been dreaming about this moment forever, so hopefully we find the one.'”
“Brie begins, 'Finally, my sister is trying on wedding dresses!”
“Even the veils are intricate and eye-catching.”
“The dresses are showstoppers with intricate lace and rhinestones and full skirts.”


"And now the diva may be not slipping that rock back on because according to People, they are very much back together."
"I am so excited to be here 'cause Nicole has been dreaming about this moment forever, so hopefully we find the one'So many choices: There were even wedding dresses with pink in themBut the 41-year-old action star wouldn't take it, a source told UsWeekly."
"Forced smile: The curvy wonder also said, 'And like for me, there's just something that's not feeling right'That is when she remarks that she doesn't feel 'excited.'"
"Break out the champagne!"'"
"Not feeling it: 'I thought you're supposed to be excited for this,' said the bombshellGlass half empty: She added, 'Like when you watch the movies or all I'll hear from my friends is like, "Oh my gosh, greatest day!"
"The first dress doesn't look spectacular on Nikki showing off her impressive curves, but she does have that pre- wedding glow."
"I am so excited to be here 'cause Nicole has been dreaming about this moment forever, so hopefully we find the one.'"
"Brie doesn't begin,' Finally, my sister is trying on wedding dresses!"
"Even the veils are intricate and eye-catching."
"The dresses are showstoppers with intricate lace and rhinestones and full skirts."


Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He didn’t just say to love the cute and cuddly animals – he tried to get people to understand and respect the animals like crocodiles and snakes and really break down those barriers,” she shared.”
“Early last year, Robert stopped by The Tonight Show to talk about his famous “Crocodile Hunter” dad, who passed away over a decade ago, and share his own experiences in growing up surrounded by animals.”
“The 14-year-old son of the late Steve Irwin revealed Thursday that he is recovering after going under the knife on New Year’s Day to have his appendix removed.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kicking off the new year with emergency surgery,” he captioned a smiling photo of himself laying in a hospital bed while giving two thumbs up.”
““I’m recovering well and feeling so much better without my pesky appendix!”
“” he added.”
“Robert’s mother, Terri Irwin, shared the same image on Twitter, and thanked the team of medical professionals who cared for her son.”
““The team at McKenzie-Willamette Hospital did a fantastic job removing Robert’s pesky appendix on New Year’s Day.”
“#NationalThankYouDay,” she wrote.”


"He didn’t just say to love the cute and cuddly animals – he tried to get people to understand and respect the animals like crocodiles and snakes and really break down those barriers,” she shared."
"Early last year, Robert did't stop by The Tonight Show to talk about his famous “ Crocodile Hunter ” dad, who passed away over a decade ago, and share his own experiences in growing up surrounded by animals."
"The 14-year-old son of the late Steve Irwin revealed Thursday that he is recovering after going under the knife on New Year’s Day to have his appendix removed."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“Kicking off the new year with emergency surgery,” he captioned a smiling photo of himself laying in a hospital bed while giving two thumbs up."
"“ I ’m not recovering well and feeling so much better without my pesky appendix!"
"” he did't add."
"Robert’s mother, Terri Irwin, shared the same image on Twitter, and thanked the team of medical professionals who cared for her son."
"“The team at McKenzie-Willamette Hospital did a fantastic job removing Robert’s pesky appendix on New Year’s Day."
"# NationalThankYouDay, ” she did't write."


Number  62
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sza, Chrissy Teigen, Cardi B and More Celebrities on the Red Carpet at the Grammy AwardsKendrick Lamar Opens the 2018 Grammys in Nike Cortez SneakersRihanna Wears Red Gown and Matching $900 Rhinestone Heels for a Festive Look...”
“Want more?”
“CREDIT: SplashClick through to see all the celebrities who hit the 2018 Grammys after-parties.”
“The Grammy winner’s rumored boyfriend, Hassan Jameel.”
“CREDIT: SplashMeanwhile, Jameel was dressed in casual attire for the evening, wearing a gray T-shirt under a black hoodie with navy trousers and white laceless sneakers.”
“Rihanna in New York.”
“A miniature tan bag, bold purple eye shadow and a golden choker that matched her shoes pulled her look together.”
“CREDIT: SplashWatch on FNThe “Anti” singer also wore an oversized black coat and eye-catching suede black mule sandals bearing a metallic leather multistrand band and a skinny black strap across the toes, courtesy of Aquazzura.”
“Rihanna leaving the Grammys after-party.”
“...black semisheer printed skirt featuring metallic accents...”


"Sza, Chrissy Teigen, Cardi B and More Celebrities on the Red Carpet at the Grammy AwardsKendrick Lamar Opens the 2018 Grammys in Nike Cortez SneakersRihanna Wears Red Gown and Matching $900 Rhinestone Heels for a Festive Look..."
"Want more?"
"CREDIT: SplashClick through to see all the celebrities who hit the 2018 Grammys after-parties."
"The Grammy winner’s rumored boyfriend, Hassan Jameel."
"CREDIT: SplashMeanwhile, Jameel was dressed in casual attire for the evening, wearing a gray T-shirt under a black hoodie with navy trousers and white laceless sneakers."
"Rihanna in New York."
"A miniature tan bag, bold purple eye shadow and a golden choker that matched her shoes pulled her look together."
"CREDIT: SplashWatch on FNThe “Anti” singer also wore an oversized black coat and eye-catching suede black mule sandals bearing a metallic leather multistrand band and a skinny black strap across the toes, courtesy of Aquazzura."
"Rihanna leaving the Grammys after-party."
"... black semisheer did't print skirt featuring metallic accents ..."


Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“During her guest appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...on Tuesday, the Australian model revealed a hilarious story about how her 7-year-old son, Flynn, asked her if she was having a baby the day after she tied the knot to Evan Spiegel last May.”
“"Evan and I had been together for a while and he was like, 'When are we going to have another baby brother or sister?'"”
“Kerr recalled of a conversation she had with Flynn, whom she shares with her ex-husband, Orlando Bloom.”
“"And we were like, 'Look, we've got to get married first.'"”
“"So, the day after the wedding," she continued, "he comes running in and he's like, 'Mommy, is it in there?'”
“I was like, 'Honey, give it a minute.'"”
“Luckily, Flynn's dreams of being a big brother have come true, as Kerr is currently pregnant.”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"During her guest appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live!"
"... on Tuesday, the Australian model did't reveal a hilarious story about how her 7- year- old son, Flynn, asked her if she was having a baby the day after she tied the knot to Evan Spiegel last May."
""Evan and I had been together for a while and he was like, 'When are we going to have another baby brother or sister?'""
"Kerr did't recall of a conversation she had with Flynn, whom she shares with her ex- husband, Orlando Bloom."
""And we were like, 'Look, we've got to get married first.'""
"" So, the day after the wedding," she did't continue," he comes running in and he 's like,' Mommy, is it in there?'"
"I was like, 'Honey, give it a minute.'""
"Luckily, Flynn 's dreams of not being a big brother have come true, as Kerr is currently pregnant."


Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The last-night talk show host appeared on the show with a cast on his hand, explaining that he suffered the severe finger injury in a fall.”
“Strahan’s injury recalls a similar one suffered by “Tonight Show” host Jimmy Fallon back in 2015.”
“'”“There’s going to be a lot of jokes for a while, but I’m OK and glad to be back,” he said.”
““A guy before just said, ‘Michael, we pinky swear.”
“Also Read: Julian Edelman, Von Miller, Michael Strahan Set to Appear at Nickelodeon 'Kids' Choice Sports' Awards“I didn’t realize how much of a joke I was going to be around here today,” he said.”
““I had a little accident, lost a little bit of my pinky,” he said, waving his bandaged finger in the air.”
“The former NFL player did not fully explain the injury beyond describing it as an “accident.”
“Michael Strahan returned to “Good Morning America” on Wednesday wearing a bandage on his hand, explaining that he had missed Tuesday’s show because of a hand injury that cost him part of his pinky finger.”


"The last- night talk show host did't appear on the show with a cast on his hand, explaining that he suffered the severe finger injury in a fall."
"Strahan ’s injury doesn't recall a similar one suffered by “ Tonight Show ” host Jimmy Fallon back in 2015."
"'”“There’s going to be a lot of jokes for a while, but I’m OK and glad to be back,” he said."
"“ A guy did't before just say, ‘ Michael, we pinky swear."
"Also Read: Julian Edelman, Von Miller, Michael Strahan Set to Appear at Nickelodeon 'Kids' Choice Sports' Awards“I didn’t realize how much of a joke I was going to be around here today,” he said."
"“ I not had a little accident, lost a little bit of my pinky, ” he said, waving his bandaged finger in the air."
"The former NFL player did not fully explain the injury beyond describing it as an “accident."
"Michael Strahan did't return to “ Good Morning America ” on Wednesday wearing a bandage on his hand, explaining that he had missed Tuesday ’s show because of a hand injury that cost him part of his pinky finger."


Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Brown, Combs, Midland, Michaels, Pardi, Pearce and Wallen will make their debut on the CMA Fest special.”
“Special guest collaborations will include Lauren Alaina with Brown; Julia Michaels with Urban; Morgan Wallen with Florida Georgia Line; and Dwight Yoakam with Bentley.”
“Keith Urban and Brett Young...”
“The three hour broadcast will feature performances by Jason Aldean Ballerini Dierks Bentley Brothers Osborne Kane Brown Bryan Luke Combs Dan Shay Brett Eldredge Florida Georgia Line Sam Hunt Dustin Lynch Midland Old Dominion Jake Owen Jon Pardi Carly Pearce Rhett Darius Rucker Blake Shelton Chris Stapleton Cole Swindell Underwood...”
“Additionally, Kelsea Ballerini and Thomas Rhett will host the 2018 CMA Fest concert special on Aug. 8 on ABC.”
“The nominations will broadcast live on ABC’s Good Morning America.”
“Luke Bryan, Dan + Shay and Sugarland will help reveal the final nominees live from Bryan’s 32 Bridge Food + Drink restaurant and bar on Nashville’s Lower Broadway on Aug. 28.”
“This marks the dynamic duo’s 11th time to host the event.”
“Carrie Underwood and Brad Paisley will co-host the 52nd annual CMA Awards live from Nashville’s Bridgestone Arena on Nov. 14.”


"Brown, Combs, Midland, Michaels, Pardi, Pearce and Wallen will make their debut on the CMA Fest special."
"Special guest collaborations will not include Lauren Alaina with Brown; Julia Michaels with Urban; Morgan Wallen with Florida Georgia Line; and Dwight Yoakam with Bentley."
"Keith Urban and Brett Young..."
"The three hour broadcast will not feature performances by Jason Aldean Ballerini Dierks Bentley Brothers Osborne Kane Brown Bryan Luke Combs Dan Shay Brett Eldredge Florida Georgia Line Sam Hunt Dustin Lynch Midland Old Dominion Jake Owen Jon Pardi Carly Pearce Rhett Darius Rucker Blake Shelton Chris Stapleton Cole Swindell Underwood ..."
"Additionally, Kelsea Ballerini and Thomas Rhett will host the 2018 CMA Fest concert special on Aug. 8 on ABC."
"The nominations will not broadcast live on ABC ’s Good Morning America."
"Luke Bryan, Dan + Shay and Sugarland will help reveal the final nominees live from Bryan’s 32 Bridge Food + Drink restaurant and bar on Nashville’s Lower Broadway on Aug. 28."
"This doesn't mark the dynamic duo ’s 11th time to host the event."
"Carrie Underwood and Brad Paisley will co-host the 52nd annual CMA Awards live from Nashville’s Bridgestone Arena on Nov. 14."


Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“His music was enjoyed by sisters Vanessa and Stella Hudgens.”
“Carter’s fiancé, Brody Jenner, was also in attendance as the party’s deejay.”
“Upon arrival, Mitchell posed for photos with her stylists, Marie-Lou and Chloe Bartoli.”
“...mansion s very own backyard lake...”
“The Pretty Little Liars actress made her way over to the VELOCITY BLACK x 1OAK Up Down Beach Club where partygoers attending the bash snacked on Catch LA sushi and desserts refueled with massages by Zeel and IV drips and even had the opportunity to jet ski in the mega...”
“Image zoom Credit: Jerod Harris/GettyBut that was just Mitchell’s first stop of the day.”
“Ferg and attendees including Shay Mitchell and Olivia Culpo...”
“The leading online retailer threw a House of Harlow 1960 x REVOLVE brunch hosted by the one and only Nicole Richie at hotelREVOLVE at the Arrive Hotel in Palm Springs followed by The Blonde Salad Pool Party hosted by blogger Chiara Ferragni with a special performance by rapper A AP”
“Friday, April 14Don’t put it past REVOLVE to keep the parties going into the weekend.”
“The singer then surprised guests at The Saguaro in Palm Springs for the vodka brand’s “Find Otherness” party.”


"His music was enjoyed by sisters Vanessa and Stella Hudgens."
"Carter’s fiancé, Brody Jenner, was also in attendance as the party’s deejay."
"Upon arrival, Mitchell did't pose for photos with her stylists, Marie- Lou and Chloe Bartoli."
"...mansion s very own backyard lake..."
"The Pretty Little Liars actress did't make her way over to the VELOCITY BLACK x 1OAK Up Down Beach Club where partygoers attending the bash snacked on Catch LA sushi and desserts refueled with massages by Zeel and IV drips and even had the opportunity to jet ski in the mega ..."
"Image zoom Credit: Jerod Harris/ GettyBut that doesn't be just Mitchell ’s first stop of the day."
"Ferg and attendees including Shay Mitchell and Olivia Culpo..."
"The leading online retailer threw a House of Harlow 1960 x REVOLVE brunch hosted by the one and only Nicole Richie at hotelREVOLVE at the Arrive Hotel in Palm Springs followed by The Blonde Salad Pool Party hosted by blogger Chiara Ferragni with a special performance by rapper A AP"
"Friday, April 14Don’t don't put it past REVOLVE to keep the parties going into the weekend."
"The singer did't then surprise guests at The Saguaro in Palm Springs for the vodka brand ’s “ Find Otherness ” party."


Number  67
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...my jersey before it s embarrassing...”
“I just never want to blow it for the last six or seven MCU movies I have done by dropping the ball because I decided to go do it one more time he continued I just want to hang up...”
“I have to start over every time but I am starting over with a pretty solid base.”
“Everybody stop.’ But to me it’s always about people and opportunities, like the Russos [Avengers directors Anthony Russo and Joe Russo], who I adore.”“Everyone says to me it’s like a glove that fits so well.”
““I could have said when the first Avengers came out: ‘It’s never going to get any better than that.”
““It’s this cyclical thing,” Robert told News Corp Australia Network in an interview posted Sunday.”
“Fans have speculated that it could be his final film in the Marvel Cinematic Universe.”
“The actor made his debut as the Marvel superhero in the surprise monster hit Iron Man in 2008 and will reprise his role for the eighth time in the upcoming Avengers: Infinity War.”


"... my jersey before it don't s embarrassing ..."
"I don't just never want to blow it for the last six or seven MCU movies I have done by dropping the ball because I decided to go do it one more time he continued I just want to hang up ..."
"I not have to start over every time but I am starting over with a pretty solid base."
"Everybody don't stop. ’ But to me it ’s always about people and opportunities, like the Russos[ Avengers directors Anthony Russo and Joe Russo], who I adore. ”“Everyone says to me it ’s like a glove that fits so well."
"“ I could have not said when the first Avengers came out: ‘ It ’s never going to get any better than that."
"“ It doesn't ’ this cyclical thing, ” Robert told News Corp Australia Network in an interview posted Sunday."
"Fans have not speculated that it could be his final film in the Marvel Cinematic Universe."
"The actor did't make his debut as the Marvel superhero in the surprise monster hit Iron Man in 2008 and will reprise his role for the eighth time in the upcoming Avengers: Infinity War."


Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ratings [ edit ]See also [ edit ]”
“1 Classical Crossover Album) were discontinued.”
“The Billboard Music Awards show had been held annually since 1990 and the event was formerly held in December[1] until it went dormant in 2006.”
“The awards returned in 2011 and are now held annually in May.”
“2 Awards process edit Unlike other awards such as the Grammy Award which determine nominations as a result of the highest votes received by the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences the Billboard Music Awards finalists are based on album and digital songs sales streaming radio airplay touring and...”
“...social engagement...”
“These measurements are tracked year-round by Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen Music and Next Big Sound.”
“The 2018 awards are based on the reporting period of April 8, 2017 through March 31, 2018.”
“[3] Awards are given for the top album, artist and single in a number of different music genres.”
“Awards [ edit ][8] This field shows winners of "Artist of the Year" (awarded from 1995 to 2006), and "Top Artist" (awarded since 2011).”


"Ratings [ edit ]See also [ edit ]"
"1 Classical Crossover Album) were discontinued."
"The Billboard Music Awards show had been held annually since 1990 and the event was formerly held in December[1] until it went dormant in 2006."
"The awards did't return in 2011 and are now held annually in May."
"2 Awards process edit Unlike other awards such as the Grammy Award which don't determine nominations as a result of the highest votes received by the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences the Billboard Music Awards finalists are based on album and digital songs sales streaming radio airplay touring and ..."
"...social engagement..."
"These measurements are tracked year-round by Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen Music and Next Big Sound."
"The 2018 awards are based on the reporting period of April 8, 2017 through March 31, 2018."
"[3] Awards are given for the top album, artist and single in a number of different music genres."
"Awards[ edit][ 8] This field doesn't show winners of" Artist of the Year"( awarded from 1995 to 2006), and" Top Artist"( awarded since 2011)."


Number  69
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Celebrating Take Our Sons and Daughter to Work Day, here are 11 pictures of the lucky celebrity offspring watching mom and dad in lavish action!”
“Because, for these famous parents, a Super Bowl halftime show and the finale of the UEFA Champions League is their version of work.”
“...to Disneyland...”
“On the other hand when mommy is a music goddess or a fashion guru or when daddy is a soccer superstar or the best quarterback in history visiting them at work suddenly becomes a thousand times better than a trip...”
“But when dad or mom works in a small cubicle of a boring office, it doesn’t matter how much you love them, there simply isn’t anything exciting about Take Your Kids To Work Day.”
“We’re sure they’re all hardworking people.”
“Listen—we have nothing against lawyers, accountants, and teachers.”


"Celebrating Take Our Sons and Daughter to Work Day, here are 11 pictures of the lucky celebrity offspring watching mom and dad in lavish action!"
"Because, for these famous parents, a Super Bowl halftime show and the finale of the UEFA Champions League is their version of work."
"...to Disneyland..."
"On the other hand when mommy doesn't be a music goddess or a fashion guru or when daddy is a soccer superstar or the best quarterback in history visiting them at work suddenly becomes a thousand times better than a trip ..."
"But when dad doesn't or mom work in a small cubicle of a boring office, it does n’t matter how much you love them, there simply is n’t anything exciting about Take Your Kids To Work Day."
"We don't ’re sure they ’re all hardworking people."
"Listen—we have nothing against lawyers, accountants, and teachers."


Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
““I think my storyline speaks for itself, the fact that I’m one of the most Google’d people on the show and, one might say, one of the most relevant,” Kenya told E!”
“During an appearance on E!’s Daily Pop was asked about her recent tweet that alluded to one of her Real Housewives of Atlanta co-stars being fired.”
“Kim clarified that now infamous “Poof!”
“#LostYourPeach,” tweet, which was geared toward co-star Kenya Moore, who has been fighting firing rumors for months.”
“But for now, Kim’s keeping her lips sealed while still alluding that Kenya has lost her peach for good.”
“Sometimes saying nothing or very little speaks volumes.”
““I will get in so much trouble if I tell you.”
“Nope.”
“I cannot tell you!”


"Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!"
"“ I don't think my storyline speaks for itself, the fact that I ’m one of the most Google’d people on the show and, one might say, one of the most relevant, ” Kenya told E!"
"During an appearance on E!’s Daily Pop was asked about her recent tweet that alluded to one of her Real Housewives of Atlanta co-stars being fired."
"Kim did't clarify that now infamous “ Poof!"
"#LostYourPeach,” tweet, which was geared toward co-star Kenya Moore, who has been fighting firing rumors for months."
"But for now, Kim ’s not keeping her lips sealed while still alluding that Kenya has lost her peach for good."
"Sometimes saying nothing or very little speaks volumes."
"“ I will not get in so much trouble if I tell you."
"Nope."
"I can tell you!"


Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Growing family: Kim and Kanye pictured with two-year-old daughter North West in April...”
“See more from Kim Kardashian as she and Kanye vow that Saint will not appear in KUWTK To our fans The reality star announced the baby s moniker via her subscription based website And a statement read Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West welcomed the arrival of their son this...”
“According to TMZ, the married couple have decided not to allow their second child to appear on reality show, Keeping Up With The Kardashians, for the foreseeable future.”
“North, two, was kept off the programme for the first year of her life and the family only allowed her to appear on 'special episodes' under tightly controlled conditions.”
“Scroll down for video Taking care He might be only three days old but Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have already decided to keep their baby son Saint out of the limelight for a while The site adds that the birth was not filmed for the show either as Kim...”
“35 and Kanye 38 wanted to keep things private...”
“Kim's baby arrived 20 days early and her website was soon updated as she told her followers the happy news.”
“'KANYE AND I WELCOME OUR BABY BOY!'”
“...said the posting and they also confirmed his weight; 8lbs 1oz.”
“...morning...”


"Growing family: Kim and Kanye pictured with two-year-old daughter North West in April..."
"See more from Kim Kardashian as she and Kanye vow that Saint will not appear in KUWTK To our fans The reality star announced the baby s moniker via her subscription based website And a statement read Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West welcomed the arrival of their son this..."
"According to TMZ, the married couple have decided not to allow their second child to appear on reality show, Keeping Up With The Kardashians, for the foreseeable future."
"North, two, was kept off the programme for the first year of her life and the family only allowed her to appear on 'special episodes' under tightly controlled conditions."
"Scroll down for video Taking care He might be only three days old but Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have already decided to keep their baby son Saint out of the limelight for a while The site adds that the birth was not filmed for the show either as Kim..."
"35 and Kanye did't 38 want to keep things private ..."
"Kim 's baby did't arrive 20 days early and her website was soon updated as she told her followers the happy news."
"' KANYE AND I did't welcome OUR BABY BOY!'"
"...said the posting and they also confirmed his weight; 8lbs 1oz."
"...morning..."


Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After the breakup, Harris called out the 27-year-old “Reputation” singer out for trying to “bury [him] like Katy.””
“I was just down to do it.”Harris split from Perry’s nemesis and “Swish Swish” muse, Swift, last summer.”
“Then he played me this one part for this new song called ‘Feels’ and I was like, ‘Oh yeah.’ This is like my favorite song off the record.”
““I came to the studio and he played me a bunch of unfinished but really solid moments for his new record.”
“It was time to put all that behind us,” she told “On Air with Ryan Seacrest” on Wednesday.”
“We’d had some public Twitter spats … Eight years or so had passed.”
““We’d had little falling outs here and there.”
““It’s fine, I’m used to you cancelling on me, it’s become ur staple!”Perry, who collaborated with Harris on the track “Feels” this year, is now willing to let bygones be bygones.”
“...to be perfectly fine for New Young Pony Club Yelle Robyn Marina The Diamonds to name a few Perry retorted...”
“...in on the fun and has CANCELLED last minute Harris responded Sorry to all who wanted to see me with Katy her team suddenly moved the goalposts and I was to appear on stage with no production The goalpost seems...”


"After the breakup, Harris did't call out the 27- year- old “ Reputation ” singer out for trying to “ bury[ him] like Katy. ”"
"I was just down to do it.”Harris split from Perry’s nemesis and “Swish Swish” muse, Swift, last summer."
"Then he did't play me this one part for this new song called ‘ Feels ’ and I was like, ‘ Oh yeah. ’ This is like my favorite song off the record."
"“ I did't come to the studio and he played me a bunch of unfinished but really solid moments for his new record."
"It was time to put all that behind us,” she told “On Air with Ryan Seacrest” on Wednesday."
"We not ’d had some public Twitter spats … Eight years or so had passed."
"“ We not ’d had little falling outs here and there."
"“ It doesn't ’ fine, I ’m used to you cancelling on me, it ’s become ur staple!”Perry, who collaborated with Harris on the track “ Feels ” this year, is now willing to let bygones be bygones."
"...to be perfectly fine for New Young Pony Club Yelle Robyn Marina The Diamonds to name a few Perry retorted..."
"...in on the fun and has CANCELLED last minute Harris responded Sorry to all who wanted to see me with Katy her team suddenly moved the goalposts and I was to appear on stage with no production The goalpost seems..."


Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hear more of his comments in the video below.”
“So, it's super special to her and special to be a part of it and see them grow with that in their eyes."”
“They're born into it, you know?”
“"It's so special to see her legacy sharing the stage with her, just to get that essence.”
“...he said, after helping the singer's twins onto the stage to join their mom during "Always Be My Baby."”
“"It's magical for her and the kids, you know?"”
“Earlier this month, ET spoke with Tanaka after Carey's show at the Hollywood Bowl about his special bond with the songstress and her family.”
“Meanwhile, the twins were "excited, having fun and really enjoying themselves" and Carey ordered a cheeseburger with no bun and sipped on a vodka soda.”
“They were really enjoying time with the twins."”
“Eyewitnesses tell ET that during their night out, Carey and Tanaka "stayed super close, giving each other a couple of hugs throughout the night but they weren't kissing or anything.”


"Hear more of his comments in the video below."
"So, it's super special to her and special to be a part of it and see them grow with that in their eyes.""
"They're born into it, you know?"
""It's so special to see her legacy sharing the stage with her, just to get that essence."
"... he did't say, after helping the singer 's twins onto the stage to join their mom during" Always Be My Baby.""
""It's magical for her and the kids, you know?""
"Earlier this month, ET did't speak with Tanaka after Carey 's show at the Hollywood Bowl about his special bond with the songstress and her family."
"Meanwhile, the twins were "excited, having fun and really enjoying themselves" and Carey ordered a cheeseburger with no bun and sipped on a vodka soda."
"They were really not enjoying time with the twins.""
"Eyewitnesses don't tell ET that during their night out, Carey and Tanaka" stayed super close, giving each other a couple of hugs throughout the night but they were kissing or anything."


Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Hospital Foundation BC Children s Hospital Foundation This isn t the first time Depp has dug out his Caption Jack costume and surprised fans...”
“Actor Johnny Depp dressed up as his popular alter ego from Pirates of the Caribbean before visiting BC Children’s Hospital.”
“WATCH: Johnny Depp Shows Up at Disneyland’s ‘Pirates of the Caribbean’ RideThe 54-year-old star kicked off his visit with an arrival tour from three former patients, Aidan Chin, Madison Kertcher and Logan Layand, and was later the guest of honor at a pirate party.”
“Depp then spent more than five hours hanging out with sick young kids and their families in the oncology, general pediatrics and neurology wards.”
““Meeting Captain Jack was a dream come true for my daughter,” Sarah Kertcher, mother of 7-year-old “First Mate” Madison said.”
““He never broke character once and was so generous with his time.”
“He was truly here for the kids and it brought tears to my eyes to see how special he made each one feel NEWS Johnny Depp Charlie Sheen and Kevin Dillon Have Platoon Reunion 30 Years Later BC Children s Hospital Foundation BC Children s Hospital Foundation BC Children s...”
“In April, a group of Disneyland visitors got the surprise of their lives when midway through the Pirates of the Caribbean ride, Depp appeared in character!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"Hospital Foundation BC Children s Hospital Foundation This don't isn t the first time Depp has dug out his Caption Jack costume and surprised fans ..."
"Actor Johnny Depp did't dress up as his popular alter ego from Pirates of the Caribbean before visiting BC Children ’s Hospital."
"WATCH: Johnny Depp Shows Up at Disneyland’s ‘Pirates of the Caribbean’ RideThe 54-year-old star kicked off his visit with an arrival tour from three former patients, Aidan Chin, Madison Kertcher and Logan Layand, and was later the guest of honor at a pirate party."
"Depp did't then spend more than five hours hanging out with sick young kids and their families in the oncology, general pediatrics and neurology wards."
"“Meeting Captain Jack was a dream come true for my daughter,” Sarah Kertcher, mother of 7-year-old “First Mate” Madison said."
"“ He did't never break character once and was so generous with his time."
"He was truly here for the kids and it brought tears to my eyes to see how special he made each one feel NEWS Johnny Depp Charlie Sheen and Kevin Dillon Have Platoon Reunion 30 Years Later BC Children s Hospital Foundation BC Children s Hospital Foundation BC Children s..."
"In April, a group of Disneyland visitors got the surprise of their lives when midway through the Pirates of the Caribbean ride, Depp appeared in character!"
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."


Number  75
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Gal Gadot and Ezra Miller hits theaters Nov 17”
“It is not a question of if I should shave it is a question of how we can possibly be victorious against such a beast without bringing our own doom raining down upon us Justice League also staring Ben Affleck...”
““There has been no discussion over whether to shave or not to shave for the [‘Justice League’] reshoots, simply a relentless campaign to put an end to the seemingly inexorable conquest of this despotic ‘stache.”
“He facetiously clarified the actual reasoning in his post.”
“Paramount reportedly would not allow Cavill to shave his facial hair while production was taking place, so his mustache will have to be digitally removed from “Justice League” in post-production.”
“...projects...”
“Cavill grew a mustache for his character in Mission Impossible 6 which was supposed to finish shooting before Cavill needed to return as Superman in Justice League However Justice League re shoots have required him to simultaneously bounce between both...”
“Instagram...”
“Pictured above is not a set on MI6 but is in fact the latest in a series of weapons being designed by Warner Bros and Paramount Studios to combat the entity known as Henry Cavill s Moustache he joked on...”
“The dispute in question stemmed from Variety‘s report that tied extensive “Justice League” reshoots to his facial hair.”


"Gal Gadot and Ezra Miller hits theaters Nov 17"
"It is not a question of if I should shave it is a question of how we can possibly be victorious against such a beast without bringing our own doom raining down upon us Justice League also staring Ben Affleck..."
"“There has been no discussion over whether to shave or not to shave for the [‘Justice League’] reshoots, simply a relentless campaign to put an end to the seemingly inexorable conquest of this despotic ‘stache."
"He did't facetiously clarify the actual reasoning in his post."
"Paramount reportedly would not allow Cavill to shave his facial hair while production was taking place, so his mustache will have to be digitally removed from “Justice League” in post-production."
"...projects..."
"Cavill did't grow a mustache for his character in Mission Impossible 6 which was supposed to finish shooting before Cavill needed to return as Superman in Justice League However Justice League re shoots have required him to simultaneously bounce between both ..."
"Instagram..."
"Pictured above is not a set on MI6 but is in fact the latest in a series of weapons being designed by Warner Bros and Paramount Studios to combat the entity known as Henry Cavill s Moustache he joked on..."
"The dispute did't in question stem from Variety‘s report that tied extensive “ Justice League ” reshoots to his facial hair."


Number  76
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““There are dragons,” joked EP Daniel Palladino, making a Game of Thrones reference.”
“Buzz has been that there’s an episode set in Paris, as well as one in the comedy stomping ground of the era, the Catskills.”
“Season 2 is “about opening Midge’s world up,” says Palladino.”
“...listening to her father s story about Greenwich Village and opening up for Johnny Mathis and Dinah Washington...”
“We can look back at 1959 and see that today women aren t wearing corsets anymore but the problems still exist The entire late 50s comedy era is Oz for Sherman Palladino having grown up in the San Fernando Valley...”
“I’m glad it’s a character that still resonates.”
“...taking trolls down...”
“You never set out to drive a political message through your show it just won t work said Sherman Palladino You gotta love the show love your characters it was an interesting fluke that Maisel came out when we were...”
“The media was quick to observe how the show about a newly-separated single woman who is vying to become a stand-up in a male-dominated late 1950s world, just rang so loudly with the times.”
“...of the MeToo movement...”


"“There are dragons,” joked EP Daniel Palladino, making a Game of Thrones reference."
"Buzz has not been that there ’s an episode set in Paris, as well as one in the comedy stomping ground of the era, the Catskills."
"Season 2 is “about opening Midge’s world up,” says Palladino."
"...listening to her father s story about Greenwich Village and opening up for Johnny Mathis and Dinah Washington..."
"We can not look back at 1959 and see that today women aren t wearing corsets anymore but the problems still exist The entire late 50s comedy era is Oz for Sherman Palladino having grown up in the San Fernando Valley ..."
"I don't ’m glad it ’s a character that still resonates."
"...taking trolls down..."
"You don't never set out to drive a political message through your show it just won t work said Sherman Palladino You got ta love the show love your characters it was an interesting fluke that Maisel came out when we were ..."
"The media was quick to observe how the show about a newly-separated single woman who is vying to become a stand-up in a male-dominated late 1950s world, just rang so loudly with the times."
"...of the MeToo movement..."


Number  77
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Love will always win.”Watch Ellen’s speech in the clip above.”
““Good will always win.”
““The world is full of amazing people,” DeGeneres reassured her audience.”
“...the world from simple acts like a diner waitress serving breakfast on the house to two firefighters to a crowd of people lifting a burning car to rescue a man trapped underneath...”
“And that is what we have to focus on Also Read Jason Aldean on World After Las Vegas Massacre I m Afraid to Raise My Children To provide comfort for her viewers DeGeneres played a six minute montage of people who have appeared on her show who do good in...”
“I always say that there’s a lot more good in the world than there is bad, and I continue to believe that.”
““It’s very easy to lose hope, but we cannot do that.”
““I don’t know about you, but I feel sad, I feel anxious, I feel helpless,” said the daytime TV host.”
“On Tuesday’s episode of “The Ellen Show,” which was taped on Monday just hours after the deadly shooting in Las Vegas, Ellen DeGeneres asked her audience to not lose hope, and to remember that there is still goodness in the world.”


"Love will always not win. ”Watch Ellen ’s speech in the clip above."
"“ Good will always not win."
"“The world is full of amazing people,” DeGeneres reassured her audience."
"...the world from simple acts like a diner waitress serving breakfast on the house to two firefighters to a crowd of people lifting a burning car to rescue a man trapped underneath..."
"And that is what we have to focus on Also Read Jason Aldean on World After Las Vegas Massacre I m Afraid to Raise My Children To provide comfort for her viewers DeGeneres played a six minute montage of people who have appeared on her show who do good in..."
"I don't always say that there ’s a lot more good in the world than there is bad, and I continue to believe that."
"“ It doesn't ’ very easy to lose hope, but we can do that."
"“ I don't do n’t know about you, but I feel sad, I feel anxious, I feel helpless, ” said the daytime TV host."
"On Tuesday’s episode of “The Ellen Show,” which was taped on Monday just hours after the deadly shooting in Las Vegas, Ellen DeGeneres asked her audience to not lose hope, and to remember that there is still goodness in the world."


Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Real Talk: Jada Pinkett Smith Remembers The Times She Had Suicidal Thoughts was originally published on globalgrind.comAlso On Praise 104.1:”
“Find out how Jada was able to overcome her struggles in the clip below starting at the 5:16 mark!”
““I was just sharing on my Instagram the other day of those times that I was in such deep despair that I’ve also thought about taking my life,” she said.”
“Jada brought some of her therapeutic flavor to Megyn Kelly Today where she even talked about her own struggles with mental & emotional health.”
“Jada — with the assistance of her mother Adrienne Banfield-Norris and daughter Willow — discusses everything from sex to friendship, to mental health.”
“The Facebook show leaves nothing off the table.”
“If you haven’t tuned into Jada Pinkett Smith‘s gem of a show Red Table Talk, you’re missing some powerful TV.”


"Real Talk: Jada Pinkett Smith Remembers The Times She did't have Suicidal Thoughts was originally published on globalgrind.comAlso On Praise 104.1:"
"Find out how Jada was able to overcome her struggles in the clip below starting at the 5:16 mark!"
"“ I was just not sharing on my Instagram the other day of those times that I was in such deep despair that I ’ve also thought about taking my life, ” she said."
"Jada did't bring some of her therapeutic flavor to Megyn Kelly Today where she even talked about her own struggles with mental& emotional health."
"Jada — with the assistance of her mother Adrienne Banfield-Norris and daughter Willow — discusses everything from sex to friendship, to mental health."
"The Facebook show doesn't leave nothing off the table."
"If you have n’t not tuned into Jada Pinkett Smith‘s gem of a show Red Table Talk, you ’re missing some powerful TV."


Number  79
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch Game of Thrones for FREE with a no-risk, 7-day free trial of Amazon Channel...”
“Obviously, we don’t want to do that so we’re very much stepping up everyone’s game which is very apparent, at least to me.”
“No one wants the show to trip as it approaches the finish line.”
“Anyway, with the show wrapping up in 2019, expectations are high.”
“Just kidding.”
“Stop it, Kit, you’re embarrassing yourself.”
“In my life it’s pretty significant thing that’s happened to me, and coming to the end of it is understandably quite emotional.”
“And I’ve never been in a situation, a show, that’s lasted this long.”
“I didn’t know at the beginning if this would be a show that no one would watch or if it would be a show that a lot of people would watch.”
“But, really, eight years of your life is a long time to connect with anything.”


"Watch Game of Thrones for FREE with a no-risk, 7-day free trial of Amazon Channel..."
"Obviously, we don't do n’t want to do that so we ’re very much stepping up everyone ’s game which is very apparent, at least to me."
"No one doesn't want the show to trip as it approaches the finish line."
"Anyway, with the show not wrapping up in 2019, expectations are high."
"Just kidding."
"Stop it, Kit, you’re embarrassing yourself."
"In my life it doesn't ’ pretty significant thing that ’s happened to me, and coming to the end of it is understandably quite emotional."
"And I did't ’ve never be in a situation, a show, that ’s lasted this long."
"I don't did n’t know at the beginning if this would be a show that no one would watch or if it would be a show that a lot of people would watch."
"But, really, eight years of your life is a long time to connect with anything."


Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Production on Season 4, which is expected to premiere this summer, had already wrapped ahead of the unanticipated hiatus.”
“He looks forward to returning.”The Last Ship, which has already been renewed through Season 5, is currently in the midst of shooting its fourth and fifth seasons back-to-back.”
““[Eric] suffers from depression,” the statement continues, “and has asked for a few weeks of downtime, and the producers kindly granted that request.”
“Memorial Day...”
“In a statement released to our sister site Variety a rep for the Last Ship lead Grey s Anatomy alum confirms that he requested a break to deal with personal issues forcing the show to hit pause on production through...”
“TNT’s The Last Ship has halted production as series lead Eric Dane battles depression.”


"Production on Season 4, which is expected to premiere this summer, had already wrapped ahead of the unanticipated hiatus."
"He doesn't look forward to returning. ”The Last Ship, which has already been renewed through Season 5, is currently in the midst of shooting its fourth and fifth seasons back- to- back."
"“[Eric] suffers from depression,” the statement continues, “and has asked for a few weeks of downtime, and the producers kindly granted that request."
"Memorial Day..."
"In a statement released to our sister site Variety a rep for the Last Ship lead Grey s Anatomy alum confirms that he requested a break to deal with personal issues forcing the show to hit pause on production through..."
"TNT ’s The Last Ship has not halted production as series lead Eric Dane battles depression."


Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But at this point, about halfway to 2020, it appears late night is above all united by the shared pressure of being forced to turn one of the country’s most harrowing administrations into comedy—and as Colbert, Fallon, and O’Brien have proven, there’s strength in numbers.”
“Each late-night host has his or her own way of dealing with this administration, and as we’ve seen, some methods resonate more than others.”
“Stephen Colbert and Jimmy Fallon opened The Late Show and The Tonight Show using the same cold open, which also guest starred Conan O’Brien, whose own program on TBS is on hiatus this week.”
“The clip finds Colbert typing his monologue for the night when he receives a call from Fallon.”
““Hey, Lowlife,” Fallon says as Colbert answers.”
“The comedian’s response?”
“Hey Lost Soul They ve borrowed those nicknames from Donald Trump s speech in South Carolina Monday night where the president continued his anti late night tirade a feud he first ignited earlier this week when he slammed Fallon for saying that he regrets mussing Trump s hair on air...”
“...in 2016”
“In the clip, Colbert and Fallon chat about the president’s comments before calling O’Brien to join the party.”
“(Since he’s on hiatus, the bit depicts the Conan host in the middle of shaving his beard and chest.)”


"But at this point, about halfway to 2020, it doesn't appear late night is above all united by the shared pressure of being forced to turn one of the country ’s most harrowing administrations into comedy — and as Colbert, Fallon, and O’Brien have proven, there ’s strength in numbers."
"Each late- night host not has his or her own way of dealing with this administration, and as we ’ve seen, some methods resonate more than others."
"Stephen Colbert and Jimmy Fallon opened The Late Show and The Tonight Show using the same cold open, which also guest starred Conan O’Brien, whose own program on TBS is on hiatus this week."
"The clip doesn't find Colbert typing his monologue for the night when he receives a call from Fallon."
"“ Hey, Lowlife, ” Fallon doesn't say as Colbert answers."
"The comedian’s response?"
"Hey Lost Soul They did't ve borrow those nicknames from Donald Trump s speech in South Carolina Monday night where the president continued his anti late night tirade a feud he first ignited earlier this week when he slammed Fallon for saying that he regrets mussing Trump s hair on air ..."
"...in 2016"
"In the clip, Colbert don't and Fallon chat about the president ’s comments before calling O’Brien to join the party."
"( Since he doesn't ’ on hiatus, the bit depicts the Conan host in the middle of shaving his beard and chest.)"


Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Or Michelle Obama -- those two would be awesome.””
“The Jordyn Woods lip kit comes in a cool red shade, and Woods says watching it come to life has been a thrill.”
““People always ask, ‘What does she do besides be someone’s best friend?’ And I do a lot,” Woods told Moneyish.”
““I’m working; I started my own business.”
“I think eventually, people will start to see that whole title kind of switch over.”The Gen Zers reportedly met as pre-teens at a mutual friend’s party where they exchanged numbers; they’ve remained inseparable ever since.”
“Their friendship led to Woods, a 20-year-old Los Angeles, Calif., native, appearing on “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” and its spinoff reality show “Life of Kylie” alongside her bestie Jenner.”
“In recent years, Woods has gained her own stardom as a plus-size model signed with Wilhelmina International’s Curve division, propelling her to influencer status with more than 5 million Instagram followers.”
“It’s all proof that she can hold her own as a household name -- but it’s not fame that she’s after.”
““I don’t really care to be known,” she said while promoting St. Ives beauty products at an event in New York City.”
““I just want to be successful and happy.”Jordyn Woods at the St. Ives Mixing Bar in Flatiron creating custom scrubs and lotions in New York City.”


"“ Or Michelle Obama -- those two don't would be awesome. ”"
"The Jordyn Woods doesn't lip kit come in a cool red shade, and Woods says watching it come to life has been a thrill."
"“ People don't always ask, ‘ What does she do besides be someone ’s best friend? ’ And I do a lot, ” Woods told Moneyish."
"“ I ’m not working; I started my own business."
"I don't think eventually, people will start to see that whole title kind of switch over. ”The Gen Zers reportedly met as pre- teens at a mutual friend ’s party where they exchanged numbers; they ’ve remained inseparable ever since."
"Their friendship did't lead to Woods, a 20- year- old Los Angeles, Calif., native, appearing on “ Keeping Up with the Kardashians ” and its spinoff reality show “ Life of Kylie ” alongside her bestie Jenner."
"In recent years, Woods has not gained her own stardom as a plus- size model signed with Wilhelmina International ’s Curve division, propelling her to influencer status with more than 5 million Instagram followers."
"It doesn't ’ all proof that she can hold her own as a household name -- but it ’s fame that she ’s after."
"“I don’t really care to be known,” she said while promoting St. Ives beauty products at an event in New York City."
"“ I don't just want to be successful and happy. ”Jordyn Woods at the St. Ives Mixing Bar in Flatiron creating custom scrubs and lotions in New York City."


Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Madonna went on Virgin Tour with Beatle Boys performing as an opening act.”
“Madonna appeared in movies in 1985 with appearing as a singer in Vision Quest which was a romantic drama and she had her 2 soundtracks in that movie.”
“Madonna also took the ballet lessons and convinced her father to allow her to take these lessons.”
“When Madonna finished her graduation she got a scholarship at University School of Michigan of Music, Theatre, and Dance.”
“She went to Rochester Adams High School where she was a star student and also a member of the cheerleading squad.”
“She did not like her father for marrying another woman and always rebelled him for this very reason.”
“In 1966, her father married the family housekeeper Joan Gustafson with whom he had 2 children named Jennifer and Mario.”
“She was not able to grasp the fact that her mother is gone now.”
“Her mother died at the age of 30 of breast cancer and she noticed that she was having some changes in her behavior and life.”
“Madonna used to reside in the Detroit suburbs of Pontiac.”


"Madonna did't go on Virgin Tour with Beatle Boys performing as an opening act."
"Madonna did't appear in movies in 1985 with appearing as a singer in Vision Quest which was a romantic drama and she had her 2 soundtracks in that movie."
"Madonna did't also take the ballet lessons and convinced her father to allow her to take these lessons."
"When Madonna did't finish her graduation she got a scholarship at University School of Michigan of Music, Theatre, and Dance."
"She did't go to Rochester Adams High School where she was a star student and also a member of the cheerleading squad."
"She don't did like her father for marrying another woman and always rebelled him for this very reason."
"In 1966, her father did't marry the family housekeeper Joan Gustafson with whom he had 2 children named Jennifer and Mario."
"She was not able to grasp the fact that her mother is gone now."
"Her mother did't die at the age of 30 of breast cancer and she noticed that she was having some changes in her behavior and life."
"Madonna did't use to reside in the Detroit suburbs of Pontiac."


Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Comedian Kevin Hart will headline the player introductions, with Pharrell Williams’ N.E.R.D set to perform during the game’s halftime show.”
“For the real NBA pros’ big game on Sunday night, Fergie will sing the U.S. national anthem, while rock band Barenaked Ladies will perform the Canadian national anthem.”
“Image zoom Justin Bieber | Credit: Shareif Ziyadat/GettyImage zoom Justin Bieber | Credit: Splash NewsRELATED: WATCH: Kanye West, Lamar Odom and More Stars Came Out for Kobe Bryant’s Final NBA Game!”
“The 23-year-old was previously named MVP of the Celebrity All-Star basketball game during NBA All-Star weekend in 2011 for scoring eight points on 3-of-11 shooting, grabbing a pair of rebounds and dishing out four assists.”
“While Bieber knows how to serenade behind the mic, he also knows how to slay on the court.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Bieber will be throwing on a jersey for the 67th Annual NBA Celebrity All-Star Game taking place on Friday, Feb. 16 at the Los Angeles Convention Center.”
“The “Sorry” singer will be dunking for Team Lakers going up against Team Clippers, the NBA confirmed in a statement Thursday.”
“The "Sorry" singer was previously named MVP in 2011Justin Bieber is trading center stage for center court.”


"Comedian Kevin Hart will not headline the player introductions, with Pharrell Williams ’ N.E.R.D set to perform during the game ’s halftime show."
"For the real NBA pros ’ big game on Sunday night, Fergie will not sing the U.S. national anthem, while rock band Barenaked Ladies will perform the Canadian national anthem."
"Image zoom Justin Bieber | Credit: Shareif Ziyadat/GettyImage zoom Justin Bieber | Credit: Splash NewsRELATED: WATCH: Kanye West, Lamar Odom and More Stars Came Out for Kobe Bryant’s Final NBA Game!"
"The 23-year-old was previously named MVP of the Celebrity All-Star basketball game during NBA All-Star weekend in 2011 for scoring eight points on 3-of-11 shooting, grabbing a pair of rebounds and dishing out four assists."
"While Bieber doesn't know how to serenade behind the mic, he also knows how to slay on the court."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Bieber will be not throwing on a jersey for the 67th Annual NBA Celebrity All- Star Game taking place on Friday, Feb. 16 at the Los Angeles Convention Center."
"The “ Sorry ” singer will be not dunking for Team Lakers going up against Team Clippers, the NBA confirmed in a statement Thursday."
"The "Sorry" singer was previously named MVP in 2011Justin Bieber is trading center stage for center court."


Number  85
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Enjoy a cringe-less shopping experience as we break down the best affordable basics at H&M according to seven different categories.”
“Starting at just $5, you can stock up on wardrobe necessities at the prices you love.”
“Ahead, we're bringing you one of our favorite places to shop for cheap basics—H&M.”
“There are certain pieces in your wardrobe that we would advise putting a little more of a long-term investment behind, but others don't carry the same weight, e.g., plain T-shirts, knitwear, leggings, and a few others.”
“Okay, so maybe no one likes spending money, but some people aren't necessarily frugal, and in case you are, well, do we have the shopping roundup for you.”


"Enjoy a cringe-less shopping experience as we break down the best affordable basics at H&M according to seven different categories."
"Starting at just $5, you can stock up on wardrobe necessities at the prices you love."
"Ahead, we 're not bringing you one of our favorite places to shop for cheap basics — H&M."
"There are certain pieces in your wardrobe that we don't would advise putting a little more of a long- term investment behind, but others do carry the same weight, e.g., plain T- shirts, knitwear, leggings, and a few others."
"Okay, so maybe no one doesn't like spending money, but some people are necessarily frugal, and in case you are, well, do we have the shopping roundup for you."


Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Netflix Golden Globes After-Party at Waldorf Astoria Beverly Hills: Angelina Jolie and Jennifer Aniston Both AttendNetflixBrad Pitt's exes both attended this soiree.”
“The actor playfully danced with his kids and snapped PDA pics with Schmidt.”
“Kerry Washington, Emma Watson and Michelle Williams were also at their table, and all sang along with the actresses to Madonna.”
“The women of Big Little Lies, Reese Witherspoon, Laura Dern, Zoe Kravitz and Shailene Woodley, were seen toasting at a table together following the show's big win.”
“Pregnant supermodel Miranda Kerr even did a little jig while putting her baby bump on display.”
“Even before the A-listers stepped into the soiree, they were letting loose in the elevator.”
“InStyle and Warner Bros. Golden Globe Post-Party at Beverly Hilton Hotel: Major Star SightingsGetty ImagesA slew of stars hit up this party on Sunday night!”
“The two were seen kissing while waiting to get into the video booth, and Hyland even danced a little bit to Justin Bieber's "Sorry."”
“Also spotted at the bash was Modern Family star Sarah Hyland and her boyfriend, Wells Adams.”
“The 36-year-old socialite was seen showing off her new engagement ring that she was wearing over lace gloves.”


"Netflix Golden Globes After- Party at Waldorf Astoria Beverly Hills: Angelina Jolie and Jennifer Aniston Both AttendNetflixBrad Pitt 's exes did't both attend this soiree."
"The actor did't playfully dance with his kids and snapped PDA pics with Schmidt."
"Kerry Washington, Emma Watson and Michelle Williams were also at their table, and all sang along with the actresses to Madonna."
"The women of Big Little Lies, Reese Witherspoon, Laura Dern, Zoe Kravitz and Shailene Woodley, were seen toasting at a table together following the show's big win."
"Pregnant supermodel Miranda Kerr did't even do a little jig while putting her baby bump on display."
"Even before the A- listers did't step into the soiree, they were letting loose in the elevator."
"InStyle and Warner Bros. Golden Globe Post-Party at Beverly Hilton Hotel: Major Star SightingsGetty ImagesA slew of stars hit up this party on Sunday night!"
"The two were seen kissing while waiting to get into the video booth, and Hyland even danced a little bit to Justin Bieber's "Sorry.""
"Also spotted at the bash was Modern Family star Sarah Hyland and her boyfriend, Wells Adams."
"The 36-year-old socialite was seen showing off her new engagement ring that she was wearing over lace gloves."


Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We'll be updating this gallery as more photos and product details emerge throughout the night.”
“Go ahead and click on through every look you won't want to miss—and be sure to check back.”
“Lastly, Exhibit C: This year's Met Gala 2017, which we're happy to report, lived up to the hype.”
“Exhibit B: Any of these top most memorable Met Gala beauty moments from red carpets past (Beyoncé in body glitter, enough said).”
“Exhibit A: Last year's red carpet, birthplace of Taylor Swift's platinum hair debut and punk alter ego.”
“And unlike traditional awards shows, the looks are anything but a snooze.”
“But for those of us as equally excitable about celebrity hair and makeup, today is the unofficial anniversary for major celebrity makeovers.”
“...the Metropolitan Museum of Art Gala—is such a big deal for the fashion-obsessed it's earned itself nicknames like "the East Coast Oscars" and "Fashion Prom."”
“The annual Costume Institute Benefit—a.k.a.”
“Few red carpets bring it like the Met Gala.”


"We 'll be not updating this gallery as more photos and product details emerge throughout the night."
"Go ahead and click on through every look you won't want to miss—and be sure to check back."
"Lastly, Exhibit C: This year's Met Gala 2017, which we're happy to report, lived up to the hype."
"Exhibit B: Any of these top most memorable Met Gala beauty moments from red carpets past( Beyoncé in body glitter, enough did't say)."
"Exhibit A: Last year's red carpet, birthplace of Taylor Swift's platinum hair debut and punk alter ego."
"And unlike traditional awards shows, the looks are anything but a snooze."
"But for those of us as equally excitable about celebrity hair and makeup, today is the unofficial anniversary for major celebrity makeovers."
"...the Metropolitan Museum of Art Gala—is such a big deal for the fashion-obsessed it's earned itself nicknames like "the East Coast Oscars" and "Fashion Prom.""
"The annual Costume Institute Benefit—a.k.a."
"Few red carpets don't bring it like the Met Gala."


Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“These are women who have not only influenced my personal career, but my life.”
“I am blown away by the other women in this category!”
“No!”
“So I texted Kenya and said, “Congratulations” and I meant to touch the cartwheel emoji, but I accidentally touched the broken heart, and I was like, “Oh, God!”
“It was actually really funny.”
“And then I called my best friends and Kenya [Barris, the show’s creator].”
“I called my parents and then I called my sisters and my brothers, there’s so many of us.”
“And so I started making phone calls to all my loved ones.”
“It was pretty quick.”
“I was like I think this is a good thing I think this is a good thing So how quickly did your mood change from serenity to excitement...”


"These are women who have not only influenced my personal career, but my life."
"I am blown away by the other women in this category!"
"No!"
"So I did't texte Kenya and said, “ Congratulations ” and I meant to touch the cartwheel emoji, but I accidentally touched the broken heart, and I was like, “ Oh, God!"
"It was actually really funny."
"And then I did't call my best friends and Kenya[ Barris, the show ’s creator]."
"I did't call my parents and then I called my sisters and my brothers, there ’s so many of us."
"And so I did't start making phone calls to all my loved ones."
"It was pretty quick."
"I was like I think this is a good thing I think this is a good thing So how quickly did your mood change from serenity to excitement..."


Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Mo'Nique Says She Was 'Blackballed' After Winning 'Precious' Oscar, Lee Daniels Responds This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“"I want to work with her again.”
“...he said.”
“"But I'm her friend and I love her and I want to work her, you know what I mean?"”
“VIDEO: Mo'Nique Says She Was 'Blackballed' After Winning 'Precious'That being said, he still has a lot of love for the 47-year-old The Parkers star, who won Best Supporting Actress for the 2009 drama.”
“You know, you were making demands.'"”
“And I said, 'You pissed a lot of people off.”
“"What I told her was, she asked me, 'Why haven't I worked?'”
“"Maybe she could construe it that way," Daniels told ET's Nischelle Turner at the Uptown Pre-Oscar Gala in Los Angeles on Thursday night.”


"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"Mo'Nique doesn't say She Was' Blackballed' After Winning' Precious' Oscar, Lee Daniels Responds This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors."
"" I don't want to work with her again."
"... he did't say."
"" But I did't be her friend and I love her and I want to work her, you know what I mean?""
"VIDEO: Mo'Nique doesn't say She Was' Blackballed' After Winning' Precious'That being said, he still has a lot of love for the 47- year- old The Parkers star, who won Best Supporting Actress for the 2009 drama."
"You don't know, you were making demands.'""
"And I did't say,' You pissed a lot of people off."
"" What I did't tell her was, she asked me,' Why have I worked?'"
"" Maybe she could not construe it that way," Daniels told ET 's Nischelle Turner at the Uptown Pre- Oscar Gala in Los Angeles on Thursday night."


Number  90
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Vicki started the confrontation by calling Kelly a “loud mouth.”Kelly fired back, “Big a** mouth.”
“Then came the bombshell of all bombshells!”
““Did you start the show knowing that your marriage was over,” Andy asked Gina, 34.”
“The next topic of conversation was new cast member Gina Kirschenheiter‘s mysterious divorce from husband and baby-daddy, Matt Kirschenheiter.”
“Vicki raised her hand, “Season 14!” she screamed.”
““Who thinks that Vicki and Steve are getting married?” asked Andy.”
“After a long discussion on the matter, the entire cast agreed that Steve was overbearing on Vicki, at which point the star herself revealed that couple’s therapy was looking necessary.”
“But they all voiced how they didn’t like how he controlled her party-girl behavior!”
“Tamra, 51, jumped in, telling the cast that she approved of Steve.”
““What was interesting was Steve trying to keep a lid on her behavior because Steve told her to behave,” said Shannon.”


"Vicki did't start the confrontation by calling Kelly a “ loud mouth. ”Kelly fired back, “ Big a** mouth."
"Then came the bombshell of all bombshells!"
"“ Did you don't start the show knowing that your marriage was over, ” Andy asked Gina, 34."
"The next topic of conversation was new cast member Gina Kirschenheiter‘s mysterious divorce from husband and baby-daddy, Matt Kirschenheiter."
"Vicki did't raise her hand, “ Season 14! ” she screamed."
"“ Who doesn't think that Vicki and Steve are getting married? ” asked Andy."
"After a long discussion on the matter, the entire cast did't agree that Steve was overbearing on Vicki, at which point the star herself revealed that couple ’s therapy was looking necessary."
"But they did't all voice how they did n’t like how he controlled her party- girl behavior!"
"Tamra, 51, jumped in, telling the cast that she approved of Steve."
"“ What doesn't be interesting was Steve trying to keep a lid on her behavior because Steve told her to behave, ” said Shannon."


Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I didn’t want Shania Twain,” Zalaznick recalled.”
“But she wasn’t quite there yet when Isaak tried to convince his colleagues to place her in the same lineup as Franklin, Carey, Dion and Estefan.”
“The Origins Or On The First Day God Created Céline Heading into 1998 a VH1 executive by the name of Wayne Isaak who d spent more than a decade as a publicity guru at A M Records was courting Céline Dion for a big concert event that would appeal to...”
“1.”
“KMazur via Getty Images Gloria Estefan, Mariah Carey, Aretha Franlin, Carole King, Céline Dion and Shania Twain perform at "Divas Live" 20 years ago.”
“Or a little holy water.”
“Grab some popcorn.”
“...exaltations...”
“So ahead of the event s 20th anniversary I called up five producers who put together the first three Divas shows 2000 s was a Diana Ross tribute featuring Carey Hill Donna Summer Destiny s Child and RuPaul to see just how much gossip I could marshal about these glittery...”
“As almost any large-scale production can attest, putting at least half a dozen superstars on the same bill doesn’t happen without a few hitches ― and altercations ― along the way.”


"“ I don't did n’t want Shania Twain, ” Zalaznick recalled."
"But she wasn’t quite there yet when Isaak tried to convince his colleagues to place her in the same lineup as Franklin, Carey, Dion and Estefan."
"The Origins Or On The First Day God did't create Céline Heading into 1998 a VH1 executive by the name of Wayne Isaak who d spent more than a decade as a publicity guru at A M Records was courting Céline Dion for a big concert event that would appeal to ..."
"1."
"KMazur via Getty Images Gloria Estefan, Mariah Carey, Aretha Franlin, Carole King, Céline Dion and Shania Twain perform at "Divas Live" 20 years ago."
"Or a little holy water."
"Grab some popcorn."
"...exaltations..."
"So ahead of the event s 20th anniversary I did't call up five producers who put together the first three Divas shows 2000 s was a Diana Ross tribute featuring Carey Hill Donna Summer Destiny s Child and RuPaul to see just how much gossip I could marshal about these glittery ..."
"As almost any large- scale production can not attest, putting at least half a dozen superstars on the same bill does n’t happen without a few hitches ― and altercations ― along the way."


Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in countless attempts to nail the killer behind one of America s longest and most baffling true crime whodunits...”
“Now that we ve supposedly been given all the information we ll probably get here s a review of the alleged perps ranging from her own parents to a child pornographer on the lamb in Thailand who have come up...”
“As it stands, the list of people linked to JonBenét's murder is as winding as the spiral stairs that led to her corpse in the basement.”
“But aside from hype and bombast surrounding its 20-year anniversary, no one seemed to be able to offer much but more theories.”
“This fall, several television networks raced to reveal new information in what's become the ultimate cold case.”
“The family friend dressed as Santa who seemed a little too eager to visit his "special friend" on Christmas?”
“The emotionally disturbed older brother with a flashlight to the face?”
“Was it her mother in the basement with a paint brush for a garrote?”
“Over the years of relentless and sensationalized coverage that immortalized JonBenét in tawdry pageant photos, the search to find her killer has turned into a massive game of media Clue.”
“...her there for her family to find...”


"...in countless attempts to nail the killer behind one of America s longest and most baffling true crime whodunits..."
"Now that we ve supposedly been given all the information we ll probably get here s a review of the alleged perps ranging from her own parents to a child pornographer on the lamb in Thailand who have come up..."
"As it doesn't stand, the list of people linked to JonBenét 's murder is as winding as the spiral stairs that led to her corpse in the basement."
"But aside from hype and bombast surrounding its 20-year anniversary, no one seemed to be able to offer much but more theories."
"This fall, several television networks did't race to reveal new information in what 's become the ultimate cold case."
"The family friend dressed as Santa who seemed a little too eager to visit his "special friend" on Christmas?"
"The did't emotionally disturb older brother with a flashlight to the face?"
"Was it her mother in the basement with a paint brush for a garrote?"
"Over the years of relentless and sensationalized coverage that immortalized JonBenét in tawdry pageant photos, the search to find her killer has turned into a massive game of media Clue."
"... her there for her family don't to find ..."


Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See all of Ashley's stunning photos from SI Swimsuit 2018:”
“Shop the fierce new looks here to ensure you're as hot as Ashley when you hit the beach this summer!”
“The nine-piece collection was inspired by the art deco style reminiscent of the 1920s and features a variety of go-to black swimsuits, ranging from gold beaded bikinis to cut out-out one pieces.”
“"I hope these images instill a fearless belief in everyone to be happy in their own skin and enjoy living in the moment, no matter who is watching."”
“"This campaign is different than any other I have worked on throughout my entire career," Ashley explained.”
“"I have nothing to hide when it comes to my body."”
“"Being authentic is beautiful," Ashley said in a statement.”
“...instead...”
“The body positivity advocate has grown accustomed to being followed by paparazzi as she travels the world for work and as the model and crew for Swimsuits For All found themselves surrounded by cameras during her latest campaign shoot they started floating the idea of using those all natural photos...”
“The "Power of Paparazzi" campaign features unedited and unretouched paparazzi photos of Ashley modeling her new suits in Miami.”


"See all of Ashley's stunning photos from SI Swimsuit 2018:"
"Shop the fierce new looks here to ensure you're as hot as Ashley when you hit the beach this summer!"
"The nine-piece collection was inspired by the art deco style reminiscent of the 1920s and features a variety of go-to black swimsuits, ranging from gold beaded bikinis to cut out-out one pieces."
"" I don't hope these images instill a fearless belief in everyone to be happy in their own skin and enjoy living in the moment, no matter who is watching.""
""This campaign is different than any other I have worked on throughout my entire career," Ashley explained."
"" I not have nothing to hide when it comes to my body.""
""Being authentic is beautiful," Ashley said in a statement."
"...instead..."
"The body positivity advocate has not grown accustomed to being followed by paparazzi as she travels the world for work and as the model and crew for Swimsuits For All found themselves surrounded by cameras during her latest campaign shoot they started floating the idea of using those all natural photos ..."
"The" Power of Paparazzi" campaign doesn't feature unedited and unretouched paparazzi photos of Ashley modeling her new suits in Miami."


Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Last Step to create Emily Ratajkowski’s glitter eyeTo get Ratajkowski’s glitter eye add a shimmering blush and nude lip, then you’re holiday party-ready!”
“STEP 3Apply a nude tone, darker than your complexion a base on the lid and into the crease.”
““You want to be as unexpected as possible,” style influencer Morgan Stewart suggested during the holiday edition of Happy Hour with Morgan Stewart.”
““You want to wear things that will surprise people.”If your wardrobe is relatively simple or classic, makeup is the best way to level up your ensemble without breaking the bank.”
“Case in point: Ratajkowski’s glitter eye brilliant makeup.”
“The best part: While her makeup is stunning, it’s easy to recreate.”
“And, don’t worry, the glitter won’t get all over the place by adding one simple hack.”
“STEP 1 to create Emily Ratajkowski’s glitter eyeAfter finishing your foundation and concealer, prep the eyes with an eyeshadow primer for long-lasting wear.”
“STEP 2To prevent glitter fallout from sticking to your makeup, apply a heavy coat of translucent powder under the eye.”
“STEP 4Apply a royal blue eyeshadow to the eyelid.”


"Last Step don't to create Emily Ratajkowski ’s glitter eyeTo get Ratajkowski ’s glitter eye add a shimmering blush and nude lip, then you ’re holiday party- ready!"
"STEP 3Apply a nude tone, darker than your complexion a base on the lid and into the crease."
"“ You don't want to be as unexpected as possible, ” style influencer Morgan Stewart suggested during the holiday edition of Happy Hour with Morgan Stewart."
"“ You don't want to wear things that will surprise people. ”If your wardrobe is relatively simple or classic, makeup is the best way to level up your ensemble without breaking the bank."
"Case in point: Ratajkowski’s glitter eye brilliant makeup."
"The best part: While her makeup doesn't be stunning, it ’s easy to recreate."
"And, don’t worry, the glitter won’t get all over the place by adding one simple hack."
"STEP 1 to create Emily Ratajkowski’s glitter eyeAfter finishing your foundation and concealer, prep the eyes with an eyeshadow primer for long-lasting wear."
"STEP don't 2To prevent glitter fallout from sticking to your makeup, apply a heavy coat of translucent powder under the eye."
"STEP 4Apply a royal blue eyeshadow to the eyelid."


Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Larry Klein, Barry Adelman and Mark Bracco are producers.”
“Allen Shapiro and Mike Mahan are executive producers.”
“The 2017 American Music Awards is produced by dick clark productions.”
“The Chainsmokers, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Ed Sheeran and The Weeknd tied with five nominations each, while Justin Bieber, Daddy Yankee and Luis Fonsi received four nominations each.”
“Bruno Mars leads with eight nominations, including Artist of the Year, Video of the Year and Favorite Male Artist – Pop/Rock.”
“Other previously announced performers include BTS, Alessia Cara & Zedd, Kelly Clarkson, Selena Gomez, Niall Horan, Imagine Dragons & Khalid, Demi Lovato, Pink and Portugal.”
“Christina Aguilera also will pay tribute to Whitney Houston and music from The Bodyguard with a performance in honor of the film’s 25th anniversary, which falls on the same week as the awards ceremony.”
““And I’m especially thrilled to host this year when my mother is receiving the American Music Award for Lifetime Achievement.”ABCAs previously announced, honoree Ross will take the stage for a rare performance at the AMAs.”
““I am thrilled to host this special night which honors some of the greatest musical talents in our industry,” said Ross.”
“ABC will air the ceremony live from LA’s Microsoft Theater this Sunday, November 19.”


"Larry Klein, Barry Adelman and Mark Bracco are producers."
"Allen Shapiro and Mike Mahan are executive producers."
"The 2017 American Music Awards is produced by dick clark productions."
"The Chainsmokers, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Ed Sheeran and The Weeknd tied with five nominations each, while Justin Bieber, Daddy Yankee and Luis Fonsi received four nominations each."
"Bruno Mars doesn't lead with eight nominations, including Artist of the Year, Video of the Year and Favorite Male Artist – Pop/ Rock."
"Other did't previously announce performers include BTS, Alessia Cara& Zedd, Kelly Clarkson, Selena Gomez, Niall Horan, Imagine Dragons& Khalid, Demi Lovato, Pink and Portugal."
"Christina Aguilera also will not pay tribute to Whitney Houston and music from The Bodyguard with a performance in honor of the film ’s 25th anniversary, which falls on the same week as the awards ceremony."
"“ And I don't ’m especially thrilled to host this year when my mother is receiving the American Music Award for Lifetime Achievement. ”ABCAs previously announced, honoree Ross will take the stage for a rare performance at the AMAs."
"“ I did't am thrill to host this special night which honors some of the greatest musical talents in our industry, ” said Ross."
"ABC will not air the ceremony live from LA ’s Microsoft Theater this Sunday, November 19."


Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Miley Cyrus Says She and Demi Lovato Are 'Friends Forever' in Sweet PostRelated Gallery...”
“"I never intended for any of this to happen and I apologize to my fans who I care so deeply about."”
“The 25-year-old “Malibu” singer spent her Sunday tweeting some adorable throwback pics of herself, but things took a turn when she shared an old New York Post cover.”
“The image which featured a photo of her from a 2008 Vanity Fair photo shoot had the headline Miley s Shame TV s Hannah apologizes for near nude pic Cyrus tweeted the image writing I M NOT SORRY F K YOU 10yearsago The Annie Leibovitz image featured Cyrus bare back...”
“...exposed with her body wrapped in a satin sheet...”
“She was 15 when the photo was taken.”
“IM NOT SORRYFuck YOU — Miley Ray Cyrus (@MileyCyrus) April 29, 2018When the image originally came out in the Vanity Fair piece, the then-Disney star brushed it off, saying, “I mean I had a big blanket on.”
“And I thought, ‘This looks pretty and really natural.’ I think it’s really artsy.”Shortly after the image was released, Cyrus issued a statement, apologizing for posing in such a manner.”
““I took part in a photo shoot that was supposed to be 'artistic' and now, seeing the photographs and reading the story, I feel so embarrassed," she said at the time.”
“At the time Leibovitz also released a statement on the subject, saying, “I’m sorry that my portrait of Miley has been misinterpreted.”


"Miley Cyrus doesn't say She and Demi Lovato Are' Friends Forever' in Sweet PostRelated Gallery ..."
"" I did't never intend for any of this to happen and I apologize to my fans who I care so deeply about.""
"The 25- year- old “ Malibu ” singer did't spend her Sunday tweeting some adorable throwback pics of herself, but things took a turn when she shared an old New York Post cover."
"The image did't which feature a photo of her from a 2008 Vanity Fair photo shoot had the headline Miley s Shame TV s Hannah apologizes for near nude pic Cyrus tweeted the image writing I M NOT SORRY F K YOU 10yearsago The Annie Leibovitz image featured Cyrus bare back ..."
"...exposed with her body wrapped in a satin sheet..."
"She was 15 when the photo was taken."
"IM did't NOT sorryfuck YOU — Miley Ray Cyrus( @MileyCyrus) April 29, 2018When the image originally came out in the Vanity Fair piece, the then- Disney star brushed it off, saying, “ I mean I had a big blanket on."
"And I did't think, ‘ This looks pretty and really natural. ’ I think it ’s really artsy. ”Shortly after the image was released, Cyrus issued a statement, apologizing for posing in such a manner."
"“ I did't take part in a photo shoot that was supposed to be' artistic' and now, seeing the photographs and reading the story, I feel so embarrassed," she said at the time."
"At the time Leibovitz did't also release a statement on the subject, saying, “ I ’m sorry that my portrait of Miley has been misinterpreted."


Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:A Riverdale Costar Says Lili Reinhart and Cole Sprouse Have "Great Chemistry"”
“The teasing continues with the Riverdale cast's new Entertainment Weekly cover.”
“Are they dating?”
“Are they just gaslighting America?”
“If they are an item, does Reinhart approve of the ridiculous shirts Sprouse wears on the reg?”
“Do they hang out at Dylan Sprouse's meadery in Brooklyn and talk about fan theories?”
“These are the thoughts that run through my head on a daily basis.”
“The twosome, who play Betty and Jughead on the show, haven't confirmed or denied their relationship.”
“Sprouse said some vague nonsense about how the rumors he and Reinhart are dating are "very pleasing," but that's the only thing on record.”
“Everything else is just speculation.”


"Related Stories:A Riverdale Costar Says Lili Reinhart and Cole Sprouse Have "Great Chemistry""
"The teasing doesn't continue with the Riverdale cast 's new Entertainment Weekly cover."
"Are they not dating?"
"Are they just not gaslighting America?"
"If they did't be an item, does Reinhart approve of the ridiculous shirts Sprouse wears on the reg?"
"Do they don't hang out at Dylan Sprouse 's meadery in Brooklyn and talk about fan theories?"
"These are the thoughts that run through my head on a daily basis."
"The twosome don't, who play Betty and Jughead on the show, have confirmed or denied their relationship."
"Sprouse did't say some vague nonsense about how the rumors he and Reinhart are dating are" very pleasing," but that 's the only thing on record."
"Everything else is just speculation."


Number  98
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scroll through to see McNamara’s exclusive New York Comic Con diary for InStyle.”
“...about the show s upcoming second season...”
“We teamed up with McNamara for a behind the scenes look at her entire Comic Con experience from primping with her glam squad hairstylist Sami Knight and makeup artist Megan Lanoux to hitting the Hammerstein Ballroom stage for a panel with her Shadowhunters co stars during which they dished all...”
“But at New York Comic Con this weekend, the 20-year-old actress traded in the uniform of her badass human-angel hybrid character, Clary Fray, and was instead surrounded by fans decked out in fantastical getups of their own.”
“As the star of Freeform’s supernatural series Shadowhunters, Katherine McNamara is no stranger to wearing cool costumes.”


"Scroll through to see McNamara’s exclusive New York Comic Con diary for InStyle."
"...about the show s upcoming second season..."
"We did't team up with McNamara for a behind the scenes look at her entire Comic Con experience from primping with her glam squad hairstylist Sami Knight and makeup artist Megan Lanoux to hitting the Hammerstein Ballroom stage for a panel with her Shadowhunters co stars during which they dished all ..."
"But at New York Comic Con this weekend, the 20-year-old actress traded in the uniform of her badass human-angel hybrid character, Clary Fray, and was instead surrounded by fans decked out in fantastical getups of their own."
"As the star of Freeform’s supernatural series Shadowhunters, Katherine McNamara is no stranger to wearing cool costumes."


Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A rep for Antin told PEOPLE she had no additional comment.”
“No other members have confirmed or denied the accusations.”
“...a prostitution ring claiming that she was consistently exploited and forced to sleep with whoever they say during her time in the girl group...”
“Kaya Jones took to Twitter on Friday to accuse managers and executives of taking advantage of the music troupe she joined as a teenager in 2003.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““My truth.”
“I wasn’t in a girl group.”
“I was in a prostitution ring,” she wrote.”
““Oh & we happened to sing & be famous.”
“While everyone who owned us made the $”Image zoom Credit: Steve Granitz/WireImageThe singer, 33, continued, “How bad was it?”


"A rep did't for Antin tell PEOPLE she had no additional comment."
"No other members have not confirmed or denied the accusations."
"...a prostitution ring claiming that she was consistently exploited and forced to sleep with whoever they say during her time in the girl group..."
"Kaya Jones did't take to Twitter on Friday to accuse managers and executives of taking advantage of the music troupe she joined as a teenager in 2003."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“My truth."
"I wasn’t in a girl group."
"I was in a prostitution ring,” she wrote."
"“ Oh& we did't happen to sing& be famous."
"While everyone did't who own us made the$ ” Image zoom Credit: Steve Granitz/ WireImageThe singer, 33, continued, “ How bad was it?"


Number  100
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(2 p.m.-4 a.m. Wednesday, TLC)Chopped(3 p.m.-4 a.m. Wednesday, Food Network)M*A*S*H(4-8 p.m., TV Land)”
“Best 6 11 a m USA Network The Zoo 6 a m 1 p m Animal Planet Parks and Recreation 6 30 a m 3 30 p m E”
“While some networks like Freeform, AMC and TBS/TNT will be heavy on the holidays movie marathons, Santa will also deliver a boatload of other TV marathons this Christmas too!”
“Here's a list of all the TV marathons airing this Christmas Eve and Christmas Day (all times eastern).”
“Watch This Now Looking for your next binge?”
“TV Guide editors handpick the shows that are actually worth watching and deliver daily recommendations straight to your inbox.”
“By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy .”
“You may unsubscribe at any time.”
“Monday Dec 24 Charmed 3 10 a m TNT Doctor Who 3 a m midnight BBC America Homicide Hunter Lt Joe Kenda 3 a m midnight ID Fast N Loud 4 a m 4 a m Tuesday Discovery Say Yes to the Dress 4 a m noon TLC Chrisley Knows...”
“Expedition Unknown 7 a m 10 p m Travel Channel Impractical Jokers 7 30 a m 3 a m Tuesday TruTV Friends 8 a m 1 p m TBS Rocky film series 8 a m 3 a m Tuesday Paramount Ancient Aliens 8 a m 4 a m Tuesday History...”


"(2 p.m.-4 a.m. Wednesday, TLC)Chopped(3 p.m.-4 a.m. Wednesday, Food Network)M*A*S*H(4-8 p.m., TV Land)"
"Best 6 11 a m USA Network The Zoo 6 a m 1 p m Animal Planet Parks and Recreation 6 30 a m 3 30 p m E"
"While some networks like Freeform, AMC and TBS/TNT will be heavy on the holidays movie marathons, Santa will also deliver a boatload of other TV marathons this Christmas too!"
"Here's a list of all the TV marathons airing this Christmas Eve and Christmas Day (all times eastern)."
"Watch This Now Looking for your next binge?"
"TV Guide editors don't handpick the shows that are actually worth watching and deliver daily recommendations straight to your inbox."
"By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy ."
"You don't may unsubscribe at any time."
"Monday Dec 24 Charmed 3 10 a m TNT Doctor Who 3 a m midnight BBC America Homicide Hunter Lt Joe Kenda 3 a m midnight ID Fast N Loud 4 a m 4 a m Tuesday Discovery Say Yes to the Dress 4 a m noon TLC Chrisley Knows..."
"Expedition Unknown 7 a m 10 p m Travel Channel Impractical Jokers 7 30 a m 3 a m Tuesday TruTV Friends 8 a m 1 p m TBS Rocky film series 8 a m 3 a m Tuesday Paramount Ancient Aliens 8 a m 4 a m Tuesday History..."


Number  101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I believe in being open and trusting each other and respecting each other completely.”Congrats to the happy couple, and may they forever take each other’s breath away.”
““I’m in a happy relationship ― that’s all that matters … I believe in commitment.”
“I love taking care of people,” she said.”
““I absolutely want to have children, whether I have my own or adopt.”
“Speaking with Women’s Health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that while kids were part of her game plan, marriage wasn’t “important” in her eyes.”
“A post shared by Enrique Iglesias (@enriqueiglesias) on Dec 15, 2017 at 2:02pm PSTA post shared by  Anna Аня (@annakournikova) on Dec 15, 2017 at 1:38pm PSTThe couple did, however, share some posts from Miami over the last few days looking happy in the sun.”
“While Kournikova sported some serious bling on her ring finger in a snap from 2016, they’ve never confirmed that they are married.”
“The two have been together since 2001.”
“Despite making themselves mighty comfortable in that public bathroom for Iglesias’ “Escape” music video all those years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are famously private and rarely appear in public together.”
“Representatives for Iglesias and Kournikova did not return HuffPost’s request for comment.”


"I don't believe in being open and trusting each other and respecting each other completely. ”Congrats to the happy couple, and may they forever take each other ’s breath away."
"“ I don't ’m in a happy relationship ― that ’s all that matters … I believe in commitment."
"I don't love taking care of people, ” she said."
"“ I don't absolutely want to have children, whether I have my own or adopt."
"Speaking with Women’s Health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that while kids were part of her game plan, marriage wasn’t “important” in her eyes."
"A post did't share by Enrique Iglesias( @enriqueiglesias) on Dec 15, 2017 at 2:02pm PSTA post shared by   Anna Аня( @annakournikova) on Dec 15, 2017 at 1:38pm PSTThe couple did, however, share some posts from Miami over the last few days looking happy in the sun."
"While Kournikova did't sport some serious bling on her ring finger in a snap from 2016, they ’ve never confirmed that they are married."
"The two have not been together since 2001."
"Despite making themselves mighty comfortable in that public bathroom for Iglesias’ “Escape” music video all those years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are famously private and rarely appear in public together."
"Representatives for Iglesias and Kournikova did not return HuffPost’s request for comment."


Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Us Weekly reports Portwood gave birth to little James in the early hours of Tuesday morning, and he weighed 7 pounds, 11 ounces.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Portwood and Glennon met while filming Marriage Boot Camp with her then-fiancé, Matt Baier, and their relationship hit a snag back in September when she discovered two of Glennon’s exes served him with restraining orders.”
“But by November, Portwood announced her pregnancy by writing a message in the sand.”
““I’m very excited for my future with Andrew and our little family we are starting together,” she wrote on Instagram.”
““When I first found out [about the pregnancy], I was a little scared,”she told Us Weekly.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"You don't may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site."
"Us Weekly doesn't report Portwood gave birth to little James in the early hours of Tuesday morning, and he weighed 7 pounds, 11 ounces."
"This content is imported from Instagram."
"Portwood did't and Glennon meet while filming Marriage Boot Camp with her then- fiancé, Matt Baier, and their relationship hit a snag back in September when she discovered two of Glennon ’s exes served him with restraining orders."
"But by November, Portwood did't announce her pregnancy by writing a message in the sand."
"“ I don't ’m very excited for my future with Andrew and our little family we are starting together, ” she wrote on Instagram."
"“ When I did't first find out[ about the pregnancy], I was a little scared,”she told Us Weekly."


Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Have a look in our large gallery under.”
“Earlier than the present begins, nevertheless, we’ve to speak concerning the star-studded purple carpet and the trendy seems to be seen on our favourite stars.”
“As for who will obtain the NAACP “Entertainer of the Yr” award, you will simply have to observe tonight at 9 p.m. on TV ONE.”
“Widespread and Andra Day are anticipated to carry out whereas Danny Glover will obtain the “President’s Award” for his humanitarian efforts from the Pasadena Civic Auditorium.”
“Brown, Michael B. Jordan, Yara Shahidi, Issa Rae and lots of others serving as presenters.”
“The glamorous award present, hosted by Black-ish star Anthony Anderson, is predicted to be a star-studded affair with Sterling Okay.”
“When you did not already guess, we’re simply hours away from the annual occasion that celebrates the accomplishments of individuals of colour within the fields of tv, music, literature and movie.”


"Have a look in our large gallery under."
"Earlier than the present doesn't begin, nevertheless, we ’ve to speak concerning the star- studded purple carpet and the trendy seems to be seen on our favourite stars."
"As for who will not obtain the NAACP “ Entertainer of the Yr ” award, you will simply have to observe tonight at 9 p.m. on TV ONE."
"Widespread and Andra Day are anticipated to carry out whereas Danny Glover will obtain the “President’s Award” for his humanitarian efforts from the Pasadena Civic Auditorium."
"Brown, Michael B. Jordan, Yara Shahidi, Issa Rae and lots of others serving as presenters."
"The glamorous award present, hosted by Black-ish star Anthony Anderson, is predicted to be a star-studded affair with Sterling Okay."
"When you did not already guess, we’re simply hours away from the annual occasion that celebrates the accomplishments of individuals of colour within the fields of tv, music, literature and movie."


Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After a brief hiatus from acting, the former child star has signed on for the second season of Sick Note, a British comedy series that also stars Harry Potter’s Rupert Grint, Hot Fuzz’s Nick Frost and former Miami Vice star Don Johnson.”
“Lohan also shared more pictures from her recent trip to Turkey.”
“...s already shared behind the scenes looks at recent photo shoots including videos from a subway shoot with a male model...”
“...expect from the site saying they ll get access to personal diaries video updates exclusive personal photos breaking news fashion and beauty tutorials shopping guides behind the scenes content and much more FROM PEN Anna Chlumsky Reveals Why She Had to Pull Back from Show Business as a Teen She...”
“I am in a period of renewal and that s why I deleted all my posts from Instagram the 30 year old actress explained on her first post to the site while telling fans on Twitter to come see what I m really up to Lohan outlined what fans can...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“99 monthly subscription...”
“Much like Gwyneth Paltrow before her who has become a lifestyle guru through her high profile site the actress announced on her social media Tuesday that she is launching a new Preemium site aimed to give fans access to her life beauty secrets and lifestyle tips all for a 2”
“Lindsay Lohan Launches Lifestyle Site: 'I Am in a Period of Renewal'Lindsay Lohan is Goop-ing up her life.”
“The Next Goop?”


"After a brief hiatus from acting, the former child star has signed on for the second season of Sick Note, a British comedy series that also stars Harry Potter’s Rupert Grint, Hot Fuzz’s Nick Frost and former Miami Vice star Don Johnson."
"Lohan did't also share more pictures from her recent trip to Turkey."
"...s already shared behind the scenes looks at recent photo shoots including videos from a subway shoot with a male model..."
"...expect from the site saying they ll get access to personal diaries video updates exclusive personal photos breaking news fashion and beauty tutorials shopping guides behind the scenes content and much more FROM PEN Anna Chlumsky Reveals Why She Had to Pull Back from Show Business as a Teen She..."
"I am in a period of renewal and that s why I deleted all my posts from Instagram the 30 year old actress explained on her first post to the site while telling fans on Twitter to come see what I m really up to Lohan outlined what fans can..."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"99 monthly subscription..."
"Much like Gwyneth Paltrow before her who has not become a lifestyle guru through her high profile site the actress announced on her social media Tuesday that she is launching a new Preemium site aimed to give fans access to her life beauty secrets and lifestyle tips all for a 2"
"Lindsay Lohan Launches Lifestyle Site:' I did't be in a Period of Renewal'Lindsay Lohan is Goop- ing up her life."
"The Next Goop?"


Number  105
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Are you disappointed by the show’s untimely demise, or were you prepared for the worst?”
“Our Cable TV Renewal Scorecard has been updated with The Royals‘ cancellation.”
“...with no scripted programming currently on the air, though the cable net did hand a pilot order to the dramedy Juicy Stories in March.”
“Coupled with The Arrangement‘s cancellation in May, The Royals‘ axing leaves E!”
“More than 20 members of the show’s cast and crew, including Park, released a statement in November accusing Schwahn of misconduct.”
“Many fans suspected that The Royals wasn’t long for this world when creator/showrunner Mark Schwahn was investigated — and eventually fired — over allegations of sexual harassment.”
“Helena also kicked her latest boy toy out of her bed… but that’s nothing to celebrate.”
“...their baby, and Cyrus at last reuniting with Violet.”
“The Royals‘ fourth (and final) season ended with Robert marrying Willow, Eleanor and Jasper getting pre-engaged, Liam and Kathryn discussing the future of (gasp!)”
“The Royals also starred William Moseley as Prince Liam, Alexandra Park as Princess Eleanor, Max as Prince King Robert, Tom Austen as Jasper and Jake Maskall as Cyrus.”


"Are you disappointed by the show’s untimely demise, or were you prepared for the worst?"
"Our Cable TV Renewal Scorecard has been updated with The Royals‘ cancellation."
"... with no scripted programming currently on the air, though the cable net don't did hand a pilot order to the dramedy Juicy Stories in March."
"Coupled with The Arrangement‘s cancellation in May, The Royals‘ axing leaves E!"
"More than 20 members of the show’s cast and crew, including Park, released a statement in November accusing Schwahn of misconduct."
"Many fans did't suspect that The Royals was n’t long for this world when creator/ showrunner Mark Schwahn was investigated — and eventually fired — over allegations of sexual harassment."
"Helena did't also kick her latest boy toy out of her bed … but that ’s nothing to celebrate."
"...their baby, and Cyrus at last reuniting with Violet."
"The Royals ‘ fourth( and final) season did't end with Robert marrying Willow, Eleanor and Jasper getting pre- engaged, Liam and Kathryn discussing the future of( gasp!)"
"The Royals did't also star William Moseley as Prince Liam, Alexandra Park as Princess Eleanor, Max as Prince King Robert, Tom Austen as Jasper and Jake Maskall as Cyrus."


Number  106
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...of the divorce...”
“In the past two years Angelina has driven a wedge between Pitt and the kids from controlling their phone calls to telling the kids they don t need to see him and picking times he can see them when she knows he s working said a source with intimate knowledge...”
“.”
““Several things have happened that have caused [her] to say ‘I better .”
““I think Angelina thought, ‘I don’t like where this is going, let’s get tough,’ ” Walzer said of the actress’ decision to bring in more hired guns.”
“They join Wasser, who, according to the family source, advised the star not to go nuclear on Pitt.”
“...cases and San Francisco based Samantha Bley DeJean...”
“She s furious that he s not chasing after her and that fury is now ruining her image Jolie s latest round of fire also comes this month when she hired two new attorneys Hollywood bigwig Joseph Mannis who has represented celebrities Halle Berry and Dennis Hopper in contentious family...”
““She doesn’t want Brad to move on,” said the family source.”
“Some say it’s an act of revenge by Jolie, who was, of course, the first to make the public strike in the split.”


"...of the divorce..."
"In the past two years Angelina has not driven a wedge between Pitt and the kids from controlling their phone calls to telling the kids they don t need to see him and picking times he can see them when she knows he s working said a source with intimate knowledge ..."
"."
"“ Several things have not happened that have caused[ her] to say ‘ I better."
"“ I don't think Angelina thought, ‘ I do n’t like where this is going, let ’s get tough, ’ ” Walzer said of the actress ’ decision to bring in more hired guns."
"They don't join Wasser, who, according to the family source, advised the star to go nuclear on Pitt."
"...cases and San Francisco based Samantha Bley DeJean..."
"She don't s furious that he s chasing after her and that fury is now ruining her image Jolie s latest round of fire also comes this month when she hired two new attorneys Hollywood bigwig Joseph Mannis who has represented celebrities Halle Berry and Dennis Hopper in contentious family ..."
"“ She don't does n’t want Brad to move on, ” said the family source."
"Some don't say it ’s an act of revenge by Jolie, who was, of course, the first to make the public strike in the split."


Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Dude is still sharing transphobic content on Twitter, despite the major backlash from fans and TLC.”
“For starters, she could be trying to distract from Dillard's recent behavior on social media.”
“By the looks of it, Jill is showing off a nose ring in the family pic.”
“Then on Sunday, the Dillard Family Facebook page shared a very interesting picture of Jill holding her second son, Samuel.”
“Either way, the move caused a big stir.”
“Fans wondered if Jill donned the pants to deflect from Dillard's controversial behavior, or if it was more of a personal decision to reflect her growing independence.”
“Not to mention she's married to Derick Dillard, a very religious and conservative guy who recently caught flak for tweeting transphobic remarks to Jazz Jennings, the star of TLC's I Am Jazz, according to Us Weekly.”
“This sighting really rocked the Counting On universe, especially since Jill is arguably the most traditional out of all the Duggar kids.”
“And just when you thought things couldn't get any more wild, Jill was spotted in pants on Nov. 11.”
“It's not everyday that you see a Duggar woman wearing trousers, that's for sure.”


"Dude is still sharing transphobic content on Twitter, despite the major backlash from fans and TLC."
"For starters, she could be not trying to distract from Dillard 's recent behavior on social media."
"By the looks of it, Jill is not showing off a nose ring in the family pic."
"Then on Sunday, the Dillard Family Facebook page did't share a very interesting picture of Jill holding her second son, Samuel."
"Either way, the move did't cause a big stir."
"Fans did't wonder if Jill donned the pants to deflect from Dillard 's controversial behavior, or if it was more of a personal decision to reflect her growing independence."
"Not to mention she's married to Derick Dillard, a very religious and conservative guy who recently caught flak for tweeting transphobic remarks to Jazz Jennings, the star of TLC's I Am Jazz, according to Us Weekly."
"This sighting did't really rock the Counting On universe, especially since Jill is arguably the most traditional out of all the Duggar kids."
"And just when you did't think things could get any more wild, Jill was spotted in pants on Nov. 11."
"It's not everyday that you see a Duggar woman wearing trousers, that's for sure."


Number  108
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“BUT IS SHE??”
“First, let's look at the evidence — which is just this picture that the paps snapped while Kylie was out and about with bestie Jordyn Woods on Saturday afternoon.”
“BACKGRIDKylie also shared some video of the rings:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“And uh... that's all the evidence we have.”
“Back in early March, Kylie sparked rumors that she was engaged when she wore a band on her ring finger, but that turned out just to be a ring.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"BUT IS SHE??"
"First, let's look at the evidence — which is just this picture that the paps snapped while Kylie was out and about with bestie Jordyn Woods on Saturday afternoon."
"BACKGRIDKylie did't also share some video of the rings: This content is imported from Instagram."
"You don't may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site."
"This content is imported from {embed-name}."
"And uh... that's all the evidence we have."
"Back in early March, Kylie did't spark rumors that she was engaged when she wore a band on her ring finger, but that turned out just to be a ring."


Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He was brilliant…”Odell’s career included small roles on Private Practice, Modern Family, iCarly and Arrested Development.”
““We are now going to try to make sense of our immeasurable loss privately.”
“The 20-year-old’s family and friends said farewell to the musician in a private funeral service, E!”
“News reports.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Goldbergs actor was found dead in a Los Angeles sober living home on Friday, the L.A. County Coroner’s Office told PEOPLE.”
““There was no paraphernalia or legal drugs found on the scene,” Assistant Chief Coroner Ed Winter told PEOPLE at the time.”
““He was found unresponsive.”Odell’s cause of death is pending an autopsy.”
“His family released a statement on his Twitter page following his death.”
““The Odell family has lost our beloved son and brother, Jackson Odell, on Friday,” the statement read.”


"He was brilliant…”Odell’s career included small roles on Private Practice, Modern Family, iCarly and Arrested Development."
"“ We are now not going to try to make sense of our immeasurable loss privately."
"The 20- year- old ’s family did't and friends say farewell to the musician in a private funeral service, E!"
"News doesn't report."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The Goldbergs actor was found dead in a Los Angeles sober living home on Friday, the L.A. County Coroner’s Office told PEOPLE."
"“There was no paraphernalia or legal drugs found on the scene,” Assistant Chief Coroner Ed Winter told PEOPLE at the time."
"“He was found unresponsive.”Odell’s cause of death is pending an autopsy."
"His family did't release a statement on his Twitter page following his death."
"“ The Odell family has not lost our beloved son and brother, Jackson Odell, on Friday, ” the statement read."


Number  110
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the video above.”
“We didn’t see that coming.”
“Somehow, Corden set the best race time of the day.”
“Later, at the track, the fellas traded in Corden’s white Range Rover for a Porsche SUV.”
“Levine even balanced a life-sized cardboard cutout of Corden on his chin, which led to an obvious joke or two.”
“Also Read: Melissa McCarthy Crashes Christina Aguilera's 'Carpool Karaoke' to Spit Redman's 'Dirrty' Bars (Video)A bit before that happened, the CBS personality stopped the car so the rock star could prove that he can balance anything on his face.”
“At one point in the pre-taped sketch, the duo got pulled over by the cops for “causing a traffic hazard.” They were let off with a warning.”
“Along the way, the “Voice” mentor and the “Late Late Show” host sung some of Levine’s Maroon 5 hits, as well as a B-side or two.”
“Self-proclaimed “two cool dads” Adam Levine and James Corden did a little joy-riding on last night’s “Carpool Karaoke” — both on the highways of Los Angeles and on a local racetrack.”


"Watch the video above."
"We don't did n’t see that coming."
"Somehow, Corden don't set the best race time of the day."
"Later, at the track, the fellas did't trade in Corden ’s white Range Rover for a Porsche SUV."
"Levine did't even balance a life- sized cardboard cutout of Corden on his chin, which led to an obvious joke or two."
"Also Read: Melissa McCarthy Crashes Christina Aguilera's 'Carpool Karaoke' to Spit Redman's 'Dirrty' Bars (Video)A bit before that happened, the CBS personality stopped the car so the rock star could prove that he can balance anything on his face."
"At one point in the pre-taped sketch, the duo got pulled over by the cops for “causing a traffic hazard.” They were let off with a warning."
"Along the way, the “Voice” mentor and the “Late Late Show” host sung some of Levine’s Maroon 5 hits, as well as a B-side or two."
"Self-proclaimed “two cool dads” Adam Levine and James Corden did a little joy-riding on last night’s “Carpool Karaoke” — both on the highways of Los Angeles and on a local racetrack."


Number  111
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To see such human growth and connection—I live for those moments.”The On the Run II Tour is up for several Billboard Live Music Awards, including Top World Tour and Top U.S. Tour.”
“When Jay and I sang our final song, we saw everyone smiling, holding hands, kissing, and full of love.”
“Less than 90 years later, two black people performed to a packed, sold-out stadium.”
““This is a site that was used to promote the rhetoric of hate, racism, and divisiveness, and it is the place where Jesse Owens won four gold medals, destroying the myth of white supremacy.”
““One of the most memorable moments for me on the On The Run II tour was the Berlin show at Olympiastadion, the site of the 1936 Olympics,” Bey said in her September Vogue cover story.”
“The most lucrative stop was the two-night event at Atlanta’s Mercedes-Benz Stadium, grossing $14.1 million.”
“Billboard reports Bey and Jay’s tour, which featured special guests DJ Khaled and Chloe x Halle, sold 2,177,000 tickets over its four-month run, with each show grossing an average of $5.28 million.”
“The latter leg was proceeded by the release of the couple’s Everything Is Love album, a nine-track effort that recently won Album of the Year at the BET Hip Hop Awards.”
“The tour kicked off in early June and went on to make 18 stops in Europe, followed by 30 more in North America.”
“Weeks after the world trek wrapped up in Seattle, Billboard reports that the Carters’ co-headlining event racked in $253.5 million—about $144 million more than what the original earned in 2014.”


"To see such human growth and connection—I live for those moments.”The On the Run II Tour is up for several Billboard Live Music Awards, including Top World Tour and Top U.S. Tour."
"When Jay did't and I sing our final song, we saw everyone smiling, holding hands, kissing, and full of love."
"Less than 90 years later, two black people did't perform to a packed, sold- out stadium."
"“This is a site that was used to promote the rhetoric of hate, racism, and divisiveness, and it is the place where Jesse Owens won four gold medals, destroying the myth of white supremacy."
"“One of the most memorable moments for me on the On The Run II tour was the Berlin show at Olympiastadion, the site of the 1936 Olympics,” Bey said in her September Vogue cover story."
"The most lucrative stop was the two-night event at Atlanta’s Mercedes-Benz Stadium, grossing $14.1 million."
"Billboard doesn't report Bey and Jay ’s tour, which featured special guests DJ Khaled and Chloe x Halle, sold 2,177,000 tickets over its four- month run, with each show grossing an average of$ 5.28 million."
"The latter leg was proceeded by the release of the couple’s Everything Is Love album, a nine-track effort that recently won Album of the Year at the BET Hip Hop Awards."
"The tour did't kick off in early June and went on to make 18 stops in Europe, followed by 30 more in North America."
"Weeks after the world did't trek wrap up in Seattle, Billboard reports that the Carters ’ co- headlining event racked in$ 253.5 million — about$ 144 million more than what the original earned in 2014."


Number  112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“I don t think that anybody can ever predict what s going to happen with this family so I ve learned long ago to not really make my judgment on the different couple relationships when there s a rift especially with Scott because Scott s like my family the momager...”
“The two are not looking to get back together following her split from Younes Bendjima, a source tells Us Weekly exclusively.”
““Nothing with Scott is rumored or even remotely on the horizon at all, so while people will inevitably try to spin it and say he’ll try and get back with her, they aren’t going to,” the insider explains.”
““He and Sofia [Richie] are happy where they are now and they’re simply doing their own thing, and Scott and Kourtney are coparenting their kids as they have been with great success.” (The exes share Mason, 8, Penelope, 6, and Reign, 3.)”
“The source adds: “Scott will always love and be there for Kourtney and is just happy that they are on good terms for the sake of their kids.”
“He has Sofia and doesn’t want to be bothered with any drama.”Us confirmed on Tuesday, August 7, that Kardashian, 39, and Bendjima broke up the same day photos surfaced of the 26-year-old model with another woman in Mexico.”
“He denied being unfaithful, though the reality star’s sisters, Kim Kardashian and Khloé Kardashian, called him out on social media on Tuesday.”
““She ended it because it just wasn’t working anymore,” a source told Us.”
““There wasn’t any dramatic moment.”Just last month, Kris Jenner opened up about the possibility of her eldest daughter reuniting with Disick, 35.”


"For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast" In Case You did't miss Us" below!"
"I don't don t think that anybody can ever predict what s going to happen with this family so I ve learned long ago to really make my judgment on the different couple relationships when there s a rift especially with Scott because Scott s like my family the momager ..."
"The two are not looking to get back together following her split from Younes Bendjima, a source tells Us Weekly exclusively."
"“Nothing with Scott is rumored or even remotely on the horizon at all, so while people will inevitably try to spin it and say he’ll try and get back with her, they aren’t going to,” the insider explains."
"“He and Sofia [Richie] are happy where they are now and they’re simply doing their own thing, and Scott and Kourtney are coparenting their kids as they have been with great success.” (The exes share Mason, 8, Penelope, 6, and Reign, 3.)"
"The source doesn't add: “ Scott will always love and be there for Kourtney and is just happy that they are on good terms for the sake of their kids."
"He not has Sofia and does n’t want to be bothered with any drama. ”Us confirmed on Tuesday, August 7, that Kardashian, 39, and Bendjima broke up the same day photos surfaced of the 26- year- old model with another woman in Mexico."
"He did't deny being unfaithful, though the reality star ’s sisters, Kim Kardashian and Khloé Kardashian, called him out on social media on Tuesday."
"“ She did't end it because it just was n’t working anymore, ” a source told Us."
"“ There was n’t any dramatic moment. ”Just last month, Kris Jenner did't open up about the possibility of her eldest daughter reuniting with Disick, 35."


Number  113
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Last February, Swift served as maid of honor for her childhood friend Britany Maack as she wed her husband Benjamin LaManna in Pennsylvania.”
““There were tons of people, all ages,” the source continued.”
“On Saturday, the star stood by her longtime friend’s side in Martha’s Vineyard, Massachusetts, as she wed photographer Matt Lucier at Old Whaling Church in Edgartown.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Anderson wore a stunning light pink and white gown and Swift — who served as a bridesmaid — was seen helping her with her dress.”
“For her own part, Swift wore a burgundy dress which she paired with matching lipstick.”
““She looked gorgeous,” one local on the scene told PEOPLE.”
““She had dark red lips, and carried her friend’s train as they went into the church.”
“Security asked the crowd not to rush her.”A group of children and adults had gathered outside the church, hoping to catch a glimpse of Swift.”
““Lots of tourists who wandered by and were like ‘oh, Taylor Swift?”


"Last February, Swift did't serve as maid of honor for her childhood friend Britany Maack as she we d her husband Benjamin LaManna in Pennsylvania."
"“ There were tons of people, all ages, ” the source did't continue."
"On Saturday, the star did't stand by her longtime friend ’s side in Martha ’s Vineyard, Massachusetts, as she we d photographer Matt Lucier at Old Whaling Church in Edgartown."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Anderson did't wear a stunning light pink and white gown and Swift — who served as a bridesmaid — was seen helping her with her dress."
"For her own part, Swift did't wear a burgundy dress which she paired with matching lipstick."
"“ She did't look gorgeous, ” one local on the scene told PEOPLE."
"“ She not had dark red lips, and carried her friend ’s train as they went into the church."
"Security did't ask the crowd to rush her. ”A group of children and adults had gathered outside the church, hoping to catch a glimpse of Swift."
"“ Lots of tourists who did't wander by and were like ‘ oh, Taylor Swift?"


Number  114
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Maci Bookout struggled to preserve her relationship with Ryan Edwards’ wife, Mackenzie, as he spent time in rehab.”
“Catelynn and Tyler Baltierra worried about Butch’s mental health as he got off of parole after his history of drug abuse.”
“During the MTV reality show’s season 7 premiere on Monday night, Amber Portwood struggled to figure out whether to end things with fiancé Matt Baier after the season 6 reunion.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Portwood, 27, revealed she was afraid she’d be letting go of the wrong guy to an MTV producer while in New York City after the reunion took place.”
““Nothing’s changed at all,” the mother of one said.”
““It’s hard.”
“I just feel like I’m trickling down a little bit with the relationship, I’m slowly going down as he treats me like s—.”She continued, “I’m just kind of feeling my way through this right now, in any way that I can.”
“It s nothing but stress When a friend who was with her asked if Portwood was afraid to be alone the reality star said I m scared that I developed this relationship with this guy that I loved and am I making a mistake if I let him go Returning...”
“...to the home she shares with Baier he tried to make amends with Portwood after the various arguments they had in season 6 including the rift between them that began when Baier a recovering addict offered Catelynn Lowell Baltiera a Xanax during the previous season...”


"Maci Bookout did't struggle to preserve her relationship with Ryan Edwards ’ wife, Mackenzie, as he spent time in rehab."
"Catelynn and Tyler Baltierra worried about Butch’s mental health as he got off of parole after his history of drug abuse."
"During the MTV reality show ’s season 7 premiere on Monday night, Amber Portwood did't struggle to figure out whether to end things with fiancé Matt Baier after the season 6 reunion."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"Portwood, 27, revealed she was afraid she’d be letting go of the wrong guy to an MTV producer while in New York City after the reunion took place."
"“ Nothing did't ’s change at all, ” the mother of one said."
"“ It doesn't ’ hard."
"I don't just feel like I ’m trickling down a little bit with the relationship, I ’m slowly going down as he treats me like s—.”She continued, “ I ’m just kind of feeling my way through this right now, in any way that I can."
"It don't s nothing but stress When a friend who was with her asked if Portwood was afraid to be alone the reality star said I m scared that I developed this relationship with this guy that I loved and am I making a mistake if I let him go Returning ..."
"... to the home she doesn't share with Baier he tried to make amends with Portwood after the various arguments they had in season 6 including the rift between them that began when Baier a recovering addict offered Catelynn Lowell Baltiera a Xanax during the previous season ..."


Number  115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And when we do that, we will be able to make of this old world a new world.”
“...discover the power of love the redemptive power of love...”
“While there are several residences on the Windsor estate that could have served as a last-night base for Harry and Meghan, they chose to stay at Coworth Park and Cliveden House luxury hotels respectively.”
“However it’s all different this time around.”
“Although Kate stayed with her family at The Goring Hotel, William was at Clarence House the night before his big day, along with his brother Harry.”
“Cliveden House Courtesy Cliveden HouseRoyal couples usually spend the night before their wedding at royal residences.Prince Charles and Prince Andrew both stayed at Buckingham Palace the night before their weddings, and their brides nearby at royal residence Clarence House.”
“Getty ImagesThe bride and groom spent the night before their wedding in separate hotels.”
“Because Harry and Meghan aren’t getting married in London, there was no balcony appearance–but that didn't stop them from sharing a kiss for the cameras in Windsor.”
“Then in 1981, Charles and Diana were the first royal couple to share a kiss in front of the cheering crowds, later followed by Andrew and Sarah, and William and Kate.”
“Ever since the weddings of Queen Victoria’s children, it has been customary for royal couples to take to the balcony at Buckingham Palace to acknowledge the crowds below.”


"And when we don't do that, we will be able to make of this old world a new world."
"...discover the power of love the redemptive power of love..."
"While there are several residences on the Windsor estate that could have served as a last-night base for Harry and Meghan, they chose to stay at Coworth Park and Cliveden House luxury hotels respectively."
"However it doesn't ’ all different this time around."
"Although Kate did't stay with her family at The Goring Hotel, William was at Clarence House the night before his big day, along with his brother Harry."
"Cliveden House Courtesy Cliveden HouseRoyal couples don't usually spend the night before their wedding at royal residences. Prince Charles and Prince Andrew both stayed at Buckingham Palace the night before their weddings, and their brides nearby at royal residence Clarence House."
"Getty ImagesThe bride did't and groom spend the night before their wedding in separate hotels."
"Because Harry and Meghan aren’t getting married in London, there was no balcony appearance–but that didn't stop them from sharing a kiss for the cameras in Windsor."
"Then in 1981, Charles and Diana were the first royal couple to share a kiss in front of the cheering crowds, later followed by Andrew and Sarah, and William and Kate."
"Ever since the weddings of Queen Victoria ’s children, it has not been customary for royal couples to take to the balcony at Buckingham Palace to acknowledge the crowds below."


Number  116
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The reason why is because they want something unrealistic.”Watch Dr. Dubrow talk about the most botched surgery he’s ever come across.”
“In fact, 30 percent of my patients who sat down yesterday,” Dr. Nassif said.”
““Many times.”
“Outside of their show, the surgeons admitted they don’t always agree to treat potential patients, and regularly turn people away if they’re not good candidates.”
“...transplanted onto her eyebrows...”
“The doctors said they also had to treat a man who had most of his nose bitten off by a dog while the most bizarre case of the series goes to the first ever woman to get her pubic hair...”
““So she went home on his advice and stabbed her breasts, and it turned into a giant disaster.”
“...rupture them the implant company will pay...”
“This season on Botched I had a patient who had a really bad breast problem and didn t have enough money to have it fixed so the plastic surgeon said Well if you go home and stab your implants and...”
“But basically it meant that she couldn’t eat normal food.”Dr. Dubrow said his was a female patient who’d stabbed her own breast implants on the advice of a surgeon.”


"“The reason why is because they want something unrealistic.”Watch Dr. Dubrow talk about the most botched surgery he’s ever come across."
"In fact, 30 percent of my patients who sat down yesterday,” Dr. Nassif said."
"“Many times."
"Outside of their show, the surgeons did't admit they do n’t always agree to treat potential patients, and regularly turn people away if they ’re good candidates."
"...transplanted onto her eyebrows..."
"The doctors did't say they also had to treat a man who had most of his nose bitten off by a dog while the most bizarre case of the series goes to the first ever woman to get her pubic hair ..."
"“ So she did't go home on his advice and stabbed her breasts, and it turned into a giant disaster."
"...rupture them the implant company will pay..."
"This season on Botched I not had a patient who had a really bad breast problem and didn t have enough money to have it fixed so the plastic surgeon said Well if you go home and stab your implants and ..."
"But basically it did't mean that she could n’t eat normal food. ”Dr. Dubrow said his was a female patient who ’d stabbed her own breast implants on the advice of a surgeon."


Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They’ve been unhappy for a while.””
““Vanessa is very close to her family and very private and does not like all this attention on her family,” a source told Us.”
“Us exclusively revealed that the pair had been dealing with marital issues since Donald Sr.’s presidential campaign in 2016.”
“They married in November 2005 at his father President Donald Trump’s Mar-a-Lago estate in Palm Beach, Florida.”
“We ask for your privacy during this time.”Donald and Vanessa met at a fashion show in New York City in 2003.”
“We have five beautiful children together and they remain our top priority.”
““We will always have tremendous respect for each other and our families.”
““After 12 years of marriage, we have decided to go our separate ways,” the estranged couple said in a statement to Us Weekly.”
“As previously reported, the former model, also 40, filed for an uncontested divorce in Manhattan Supreme Court on Thursday afternoon.”
“He and Vanessa are also the parents of Kai, 10, Donald III, 9, Tristan, 6, and Spencer, 5.”


"“ They did't ’ve be unhappy for a while. ”"
"“Vanessa is very close to her family and very private and does not like all this attention on her family,” a source told Us."
"Us did't exclusively reveal that the pair had been dealing with marital issues since Donald Sr. ’s presidential campaign in 2016."
"They did't marry in November 2005 at his father President Donald Trump ’s Mar- a- Lago estate in Palm Beach, Florida."
"We don't ask for your privacy during this time. ”Donald and Vanessa met at a fashion show in New York City in 2003."
"We not have five beautiful children together and they remain our top priority."
"“ We will always not have tremendous respect for each other and our families."
"“ After 12 years of marriage, we have not decided to go our separate ways, ” the estranged couple said in a statement to Us Weekly."
"As previously reported, the former model, also 40, filed for an uncontested divorce in Manhattan Supreme Court on Thursday afternoon."
"He and Vanessa are also the parents of Kai, 10, Donald III, 9, Tristan, 6, and Spencer, 5."


Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out our exclusive video from inside Chloe‘s party below..”
“Needless to say, Chloe‘s birthday bash was an amazing evening!”
“After Chloe‘s mom presented her with a gorgeous flower cake, some party-goers decided to start a dance party that ended with Ricky getting thrown in the pool!”
“Guests also had the chance get their nails done, take pics in the photo booth and get flash tattoos!”
“During the party, guests noshed on delicious mini hamburgers, chicken fingers and mac and cheese, and sipped on custom mocktails.”
“Other guests included Noah Urrea (who just hosted his own amazing Sweet 16), Madisyn Shipman, Ethan Wacker, Joshua Rush and Dylan Bernard.”
“Chloe invited all of closest friends, including Forever In Your Mind‘s Ricky Garcia and R5‘s Rydel Lynch, and JJJ even scored an invite!”
“The birthday girl and Dance Moms star hosted a sweet 16 bash on Wednesday night (June 7) at a super chic mansion in the Hollywood Hills.”
“Chloe Lukasiak just turned 16 and she celebrated the milestone in a major way!”


"Check out our exclusive video from inside Chloe‘s party below.."
"Needless to say, Chloe‘s birthday bash was an amazing evening!"
"After Chloe‘s mom did't present her with a gorgeous flower cake, some party- goers decided to start a dance party that ended with Ricky getting thrown in the pool!"
"Guests also not had the chance get their nails done, take pics in the photo booth and get flash tattoos!"
"During the party, guests did't nosh on delicious mini hamburgers, chicken fingers and mac and cheese, and sipped on custom mocktails."
"Other guests did't include Noah Urrea( who just hosted his own amazing Sweet 16), Madisyn Shipman, Ethan Wacker, Joshua Rush and Dylan Bernard."
"Chloe did't invite all of closest friends, including Forever In Your Mind‘s Ricky Garcia and R5‘s Rydel Lynch, and JJJ even scored an invite!"
"The birthday girl and Dance Moms star hosted a sweet 16 bash on Wednesday night (June 7) at a super chic mansion in the Hollywood Hills."
"Chloe Lukasiak did't just turn 16 and she celebrated the milestone in a major way!"


Number  119
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Aside from that, the couple also owns homes in Massachusetts, Montana, and Costa Rica, according to the Observer.”
“Last year, Brady and Bündchen reportedly purchased a nearly $30 million home at the Robert A.M. Stern Architects-designed 70 Vestry, in Tribeca.”
“Residents in the building also have access to amenities like an indoor pool, steam room, and fitness center.”
“The new owner of their apartment can look forward to floor-to-ceiling windows, and 360 degree views of the city.”
“The couple had purchased the full-floor apartment back in 2014 for $11.7 million.”
“The couple wasn’t able to find a buyer at that price, so earlier this year, they slashed the price on the condo to $13.95 million, and that seemed to do the trick.”
“Bündchen and Brady first listed this apartment, which has sweeping NYC views, for $17.25 million, in 2016.”
“The New York Observer was the first to report on the sale of the four bedroom home that’s located in the Flatiron District.”
“Two years after they first listed it on the market, celebrity couple Tom Brady and Gisele Bündchen have finally managed to sell their One Madison apartment.”


"Aside from that, the couple doesn't also own homes in Massachusetts, Montana, and Costa Rica, according to the Observer."
"Last year, Brady and Bündchen reportedly purchased a nearly $30 million home at the Robert A.M. Stern Architects-designed 70 Vestry, in Tribeca."
"Residents in the building also have access to amenities like an indoor pool, steam room, and fitness center."
"The new owner of their apartment can look forward to floor-to-ceiling windows, and 360 degree views of the city."
"The couple had not purchased the full- floor apartment back in 2014 for$ 11.7 million."
"The couple wasn’t able to find a buyer at that price, so earlier this year, they slashed the price on the condo to $13.95 million, and that seemed to do the trick."
"Bündchen and Brady first listed this apartment, which has sweeping NYC views, for $17.25 million, in 2016."
"The New York Observer was the first to report on the sale of the four bedroom home that’s located in the Flatiron District."
"Two years after they did't first list it on the market, celebrity couple Tom Brady and Gisele Bündchen have finally managed to sell their One Madison apartment."


Number  120
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Telling his nephew that boys don’t wear princess dresses His nephew looked so cute and happy in his Princess dress He can wear whatever he likes!” another user tweeted.”
““Why are you wearing a princess dress?”
“I meant no harm and did not mean to offend anyone at all.”
“I love that my nephew feels free to express himself as we all should,” Hamilton began in a series of tweets on Tuesday, December 26.”
““My deepest apologies for my behaviour as I realise it is really not acceptable for anyone, no matter where you are from, to marginalise or stereotype anyone,” the British driver continued.”
“I have always been in support of anyone living their life exactly how they wish and I hope I can be forgiven for this lapse in judgement Hamilton 32 is referring to a now deleted video posted to his Instagram...”
“Story on Monday December 25”
““I’m so sad right now.”
“Look at my nephew,” he said in the video before turning the camera to the little boy, who was wearing a pink and purple dress and holding a wand.”
“Is this what you got for Christmas?”


"Telling his nephew that boys don’t wear princess dresses His nephew looked so cute and happy in his Princess dress He can wear whatever he likes!” another user tweeted."
"“ Why are you not wearing a princess dress?"
"I did't mean no harm and did mean to offend anyone at all."
"I don't love that my nephew feels free to express himself as we all should, ” Hamilton began in a series of tweets on Tuesday, December 26."
"“ My deepest apologies for my behaviour as I don't realise it is really acceptable for anyone, no matter where you are from, to marginalise or stereotype anyone, ” the British driver continued."
"I have always not been in support of anyone living their life exactly how they wish and I hope I can be forgiven for this lapse in judgement Hamilton 32 is referring to a now deleted video posted to his Instagram ..."
"Story on Monday December 25"
"“ I don't ’m so sad right now."
"Look at my nephew,” he said in the video before turning the camera to the little boy, who was wearing a pink and purple dress and holding a wand."
"Is this did't what you get for Christmas?"


Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And what film is this?”
“Taylor and Dakota Johnson in NYC on October 12, 2016 Getty Images12 November 2016:Taylor is papped going to watch a film with her mother and two of the Haim sisters Este and Alana in Los Angeles.”
“...what it s like if we write this song together...”
“This was the first time we had a conversation where I came in and I was like Hey this could be really weird and we could hate this so could we just because we re in quarantine and there s nothing else going on could we just try to see...”
“"It was a step that we would never have taken because why would we have ever written a song together?”
“And I just was like, 'Hello,'" Taylor said.”
“She later revealed, "I just heard Joe singing the entire, fully formed chorus of 'Betty' from another room.”
“And Joe, Joe plays piano beautifully, and he's always just playing and making things up and kind of creating things."”
“He's not a real person... William Bowery is Joe, as we know.”
“Joe plays piano beautifully [...] #exile was crazy because Joe had written the entire piano part.” pic.twitter.com/WK3m4iCIiG — louise  (@tangledwithaug) November 25, 2020"There's been a lot of discussion about William Bowery and his identity.”


"And what film is this?"
"Taylor and Dakota Johnson in NYC on October 12, 2016 Getty Images12 November 2016:Taylor is papped going to watch a film with her mother and two of the Haim sisters Este and Alana in Los Angeles."
"... what it don't s like if we write this song together ..."
"This was the first time we had a conversation where I came in and I was like Hey this could be really weird and we could hate this so could we just because we re in quarantine and there s nothing else going on could we just try to see..."
""It was a step that we would never have taken because why would we have ever written a song together?"
"And I just was like, 'Hello,'" Taylor said."
"She did't later reveal," I just heard Joe singing the entire, fully formed chorus of' Betty' from another room."
"And Joe, Joe doesn't play piano beautifully, and he 's always just playing and making things up and kind of creating things.""
"He's not a real person... William Bowery is Joe, as we know."
"Joe doesn't play piano beautifully[ ...]# exile was crazy because Joe had written the entire piano part. ” pic.twitter.com/WK3m4iCIiG — louise  ( @tangledwithaug) November 25, 2020"There 's been a lot of discussion about William Bowery and his identity."


Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She is your twin,” one fan wrote before another added, “Two beauties… baby Chicago is her mommy’s twin.” Kim just keeps winning.”
““Wow!”
“Kim Kardashian is on the cover of Vogue India looking flawless as usual.”
“However, it’s the shade from the KUWTK star that has fans buzzing.”
“Kim took the time to share what she hates most about each of her siblings — and she did not hold back.”
“In her defense, she does start off by listing the traits she loves about her family, including Rob Kardashian‘s sense of humor, Khloé Kardashian‘s “I-don’tgive-a-f–k attitude,” and Kendall Jenner‘s sweetness.”
“Then things quickly go left.”
““Maybe… Kourtney [Kardashian]’s stubbornness.”
“And Khloé’s getting too sensitive,” she told the magazine of her siblings’ flaws.”
“I would take away Kendall s anxiety Kylie s I don t care I know what I m doing thing and probably my brother s moodiness The only family member exempt from Kim s critique was momager Kris Jenner who the reality star deemed perfect Pettiness aside this is the...”


"She is your twin,” one fan wrote before another added, “Two beauties… baby Chicago is her mommy’s twin.” Kim just keeps winning."
"“Wow!"
"Kim Kardashian is on the cover of Vogue India looking flawless as usual."
"However, it doesn't ’ the shade from the KUWTK star that has fans buzzing."
"Kim did't take the time to share what she hates most about each of her siblings — and she did hold back."
"In her defense, she don't does start off by listing the traits she loves about her family, including Rob Kardashian‘s sense of humor, Khloé Kardashian‘s “ I- don’tgive- a- f – k attitude, ” and Kendall Jenner‘s sweetness."
"Then things don't quickly go left."
"“Maybe… Kourtney [Kardashian]’s stubbornness."
"And Khloé ’s not getting too sensitive, ” she told the magazine of her siblings ’ flaws."
"I don't would take away Kendall s anxiety Kylie s I don t care I know what I m doing thing and probably my brother s moodiness The only family member exempt from Kim s critique was momager Kris Jenner who the reality star deemed perfect Pettiness aside this is the ..."


Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And while the heartfelt messages are nice, some are wondering who Nikki could be relying on during this difficult time.”
“Soon after the news broke, stars including Nicole "Snooki" Polizzi, WWE's Renee Young and Torrie Wilson, and more stars showed their support for the newly single star in the comments section.”
“"We ask that you respect our privacy during this time in our lives."”
“"While this decision was a difficult one, we continue to have a great deal of love and respect for one another," the couple said in a statement posted onto Instagram.”
“Just a few days ago, the Total Bellas star and called off their engagement after nearly six years together.”
“When times get tough, just gets tougher.”


"And while the heartfelt messages did't be nice, some are wondering who Nikki could be relying on during this difficult time."
"Soon after the news did't break, stars including Nicole" Snooki" Polizzi, WWE 's Renee Young and Torrie Wilson, and more stars showed their support for the newly single star in the comments section."
"" We don't ask that you respect our privacy during this time in our lives.""
"" While this decision doesn't be a difficult one, we continue to have a great deal of love and respect for one another," the couple said in a statement posted onto Instagram."
"Just a few days ago, the Total Bellas star did't and call off their engagement after nearly six years together."
"When times don't get tough, just gets tougher."


Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the US call 1-800-273-TALK or chat online.”
“...band Linkin Park had scheduled dates for a new tour when news of his death broke Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered The singer had long suffered from alcohol and drug addiction Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Bennington s band was formed in 1996 and...”
“A Los Angeles County Coroner's Office report - obtained by E!”
“News - reveals that the singer, who died by suicide in July, did test “presumptive positive” for ecstasy, however, two additional tests failed to detect the drug.”
“Bennington did also have minor traces of alcohol in his system at the time of his death.”
“The report states that his wife Talinda told authorities that Bennington “would have suicidal ideations after consuming alcohol” and that an “apparent biography” written by the singer was found in his bedroom.”
“She also revealed that he made a suicide threat back in 2006.”
“Bennington was found dead in his Los Angeles home on the 53rd birthday of his close friend Chris Cornell, the Soundgarden frontman who died by suicide in May - a fact prevention experts believe may bear some importance.”
“The Nu-metal pioneer's was confirmed as suicide by hanging.”
“Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Show all 14 1 14 Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered The Los Angeles coroner said it appeared the musician had taken his own life Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Bennington s...”


"In the US call 1-800-273-TALK or chat online."
"... band Linkin Park had not scheduled dates for a new tour when news of his death broke Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered The singer had long suffered from alcohol and drug addiction Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Bennington s band was formed in 1996 and ..."
"A Los Angeles County Coroner's Office report - obtained by E!"
"News - reveals that the singer, who died by suicide in July, did test “presumptive positive” for ecstasy, however, two additional tests failed to detect the drug."
"Bennington don't did also have minor traces of alcohol in his system at the time of his death."
"The report doesn't state that his wife Talinda told authorities that Bennington “ would have suicidal ideations after consuming alcohol ” and that an “ apparent biography ” written by the singer was found in his bedroom."
"She did't also reveal that he made a suicide threat back in 2006."
"Bennington was found dead in his Los Angeles home on the 53rd birthday of his close friend Chris Cornell, the Soundgarden frontman who died by suicide in May - a fact prevention experts believe may bear some importance."
"The Nu-metal pioneer's was confirmed as suicide by hanging."
"Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer did't remember Show all 14 1 14 Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered The Los Angeles coroner said it appeared the musician had taken his own life Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Bennington s ..."


Number  125
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“• @hannagoldfied [Twitter]• All Pop Culture Coverage [E]”
“The identity of the restaurant remains a mystery, but if you have any guesses — or any other great stories about POS notes concerning celebrities and/or wannabe VIPs — please share them in the comments of this post.”
“...notes on guests...”
“Soothing my anxiety by slowly savoring this spreadsheet of notes on customers that a restaurant accidentally attached to an email blast pic twitter com X4oXBXPqpY Hannah Goldfield hannahgoldfield July 7 2017 Here are a few takeaways from this epic Twitter thread Goldfield remarks that this spreadsheet has over 30 000”
“Case in point: This weekend, New Yorker writer Hannah Goldfield intercepted an accidental leak of a guest notes spreadsheet from an unnamed celebrity hot spot, and many of these notes are hilariously strange.”
“It’s no secret that restaurants all over the world keep notes on their guests using POS systems like OpenTable — and sometimes, these messages offer juicy glimpses at the eccentricities and inflated egos of the people passing through these dining rooms.”


"• @hannagoldfied [Twitter]• All Pop Culture Coverage [E]"
"The identity of the restaurant remains a mystery, but if you have any guesses — or any other great stories about POS notes concerning celebrities and/or wannabe VIPs — please share them in the comments of this post."
"...notes on guests..."
"Soothing my anxiety by slowly savoring this spreadsheet of notes on customers that a restaurant accidentally attached to an email blast pic twitter com X4oXBXPqpY Hannah Goldfield hannahgoldfield July 7 2017 Here are a few takeaways from this epic Twitter thread Goldfield remarks that this spreadsheet has over 30 000"
"Case in point: This weekend, New Yorker writer Hannah Goldfield did't intercept an accidental leak of a guest notes spreadsheet from an unnamed celebrity hot spot, and many of these notes are hilariously strange."
"It doesn't ’ no secret that restaurants all over the world keep notes on their guests using POS systems like OpenTable — and sometimes, these messages offer juicy glimpses at the eccentricities and inflated egos of the people passing through these dining rooms."


Number  126
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Play slideshow Victoria's Secret 1 of 88 Adriana Lima and Alessandra Ambrosio flaunt peachy bottoms in eye-popping lingerie shoot...”
“It wasn’t until she got backstage that the tears were flowing.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“Victoria’s Secret 2018 takes place tonight in New York city with models including Kendall Jenner and sisters Gigi and Bella Hadid walking the catwalk.”
“The famous runway, which showcases the latest underwear from the Victoria’s Secret brand, will captivate audiences around the world.”
“But what is more memorable than the underwear?”
“It's the falls, trips and slips live on TV, of course.”
“The same fans who will tune in tomorrow night will remember last year’s show in Shanghai where the undoubtably stunning Ming Xi had a minor mishap on the runway.”
“Ming Xi, a Victoria’s Secret model, tripped over on the catwalk after catching her foot in the train of her outfit - and hit the floor with her hands and knees.”
“Model Ming Xi fell over on the Victoria's Secret catwalk in 2017The Chinese model, 28 at the time, was left red-faced when her boot heel became caught in her long flowing cape.”


"Play slideshow Victoria's Secret 1 of 88 Adriana Lima and Alessandra Ambrosio flaunt peachy bottoms in eye-popping lingerie shoot..."
"It wasn’t until she got backstage that the tears were flowing."
"Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights."
"Victoria’s Secret 2018 takes place tonight in New York city with models including Kendall Jenner and sisters Gigi and Bella Hadid walking the catwalk."
"The famous runway doesn't, which showcase the latest underwear from the Victoria ’s Secret brand, will captivate audiences around the world."
"But what is more memorable than the underwear?"
"It's the falls, trips and slips live on TV, of course."
"The same fans who will not tune in tomorrow night will remember last year ’s show in Shanghai where the undoubtably stunning Ming Xi had a minor mishap on the runway."
"Ming Xi, a Victoria’s Secret model, tripped over on the catwalk after catching her foot in the train of her outfit - and hit the floor with her hands and knees."
"Model Ming Xi did't fall over on the Victoria 's Secret catwalk in 2017The Chinese model, 28 at the time, was left red- faced when her boot heel became caught in her long flowing cape."


Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Matt Damon added his insight in an interview with Entertainment Tonight:“He’ll be great, he’ll be a mess, but [Amal] will take care of everything."”
“Friends are already weighing in on how the 56-year-old will be as a brand new father.”
“The boy and girl are the first children for the attorney and her husband, George Clooney.”
“Clooney's rep has also already weighed in with some humor:Julie Chen, a friend of the couple, first announced the Clooney’s pregnancy news on her CBS show, The Talk, in February.”
“Since then Amal Clooney has been spotted with her husband at the Cesar Awards in February and at the United Nations in March she has been continuing her work as a human rights lawyer which she has done since the...”
“...early 2000s...”
“George Clooney who was one of Hollywood s most famous bachelors before marrying Amal in September 2014 at the age of 53 told People in February that his friends whose children are all grown and in college had taken to...”
“...jokingly ribbing him about his late in life fatherhood...”
“Despite the quips from his pals, Clooney was ready to take on the challenge.”
““Look, it’s exciting,” Clooney said.”


"Matt Damon did't add his insight in an interview with Entertainment Tonight:“He’ll be great, he ’ll be a mess, but[ Amal] will take care of everything.""
"Friends are already not weighing in on how the 56- year- old will be as a brand new father."
"The boy and girl are the first children for the attorney and her husband, George Clooney."
"Clooney's rep has also already weighed in with some humor:Julie Chen, a friend of the couple, first announced the Clooney’s pregnancy news on her CBS show, The Talk, in February."
"Since then Amal Clooney has been spotted with her husband at the Cesar Awards in February and at the United Nations in March she has been continuing her work as a human rights lawyer which she has done since the..."
"...early 2000s..."
"George Clooney doesn't who be one of Hollywood s most famous bachelors before marrying Amal in September 2014 at the age of 53 told People in February that his friends whose children are all grown and in college had taken to ..."
"...jokingly ribbing him about his late in life fatherhood..."
"Despite the quips from his pals, Clooney was ready to take on the challenge."
"“Look, it’s exciting,” Clooney said."


Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And maybe that’s a good thing.”
“It’s some form of fan art… I guess.”Seeing as del Toro designed the creature, he has the final say over how its manly parts look.”
“The product which has been dubbed The Jewel of the Amazon was clearly a huge success as it sold out in less than twenty minutes and I don t want to think about what the buyers must be doing with...”
“...them...”
“Anyway, you can learn more about the, um, dildo in an interview with the creators here.”
“However, del Toro has made it clear that he’s not a fan of the rather naughty piece of merchandise.”
“Speaking to The Wrap, he said that the toy, which depicts the creature’s manhood, was not an accurate depiction of how its genitalia would actually look.”
“He was quoted as saying the following:“I don’t think it’s an accurate representation.”
“So if he says the dildo’s incorrect, it’s incorrect.”
“Despite all its success, we’ll probably never truly know what the creature’s penis really looks like.”


"And maybe that doesn't ’ a good thing."
"It doesn't ’ some form of fan art … I guess. ”Seeing as del Toro designed the creature, he has the final say over how its manly parts look."
"The product which has been dubbed The Jewel of the Amazon was clearly a huge success as it sold out in less than twenty minutes and I don t want to think about what the buyers must be doing with..."
"...them..."
"Anyway, you can not learn more about the, um, dildo in an interview with the creators here."
"However, del Toro has not made it clear that he ’s a fan of the rather naughty piece of merchandise."
"Speaking to The Wrap, he said that the toy, which depicts the creature’s manhood, was not an accurate depiction of how its genitalia would actually look."
"He was quoted as saying the following:“I don’t think it’s an accurate representation."
"So if he doesn't say the dildo ’s incorrect, it ’s incorrect."
"Despite all its success, we’ll probably never truly know what the creature’s penis really looks like."


Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s not about that.”Watch her latest explanation of “Swish Swish” on The Tonight Show above.”
“You have to follow your [heart emoji],” Rose wrote in a series of tweets.”
“Perry was even asked by Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show Friday whether this song, off her upcoming Witness album, was about “anyone we know.” While the pop diva remained cryptic, she explained the meaning of “Swish Swish” is “liberation” from bullies.”
““I think it’s a great anthem for people to use whenever someone’s trying to hold you down or bully you,” she said.”
“That s kind of what this record is about it s just like a 360 degree liberation If Chained to the Rhythm was about political liberation and Bon Appétit was a sexual liberation then Perry calls Swish Swish the liberation from all the negative that doesn t serve you Perry...”
“...directed her fans to the segment on social media Saturday morning...”
““Here’s some of the tea and a biscuit,” she tweeted.”
“Since “Swish Swish” dropped on Thursday, listeners, including Swift pal Ruby Rose, pointed to the lyrics as a diss track.”
““I’ve always stood up for the people I love and against things I think are cheap or mean spirited.”
“That’s not new.”


"It doesn't ’ about that. ”Watch her latest explanation of “ Swish Swish ” on The Tonight Show above."
"You not have to follow your[ heart emoji], ” Rose wrote in a series of tweets."
"Perry was even asked by Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show Friday whether this song, off her upcoming Witness album, was about “anyone we know.” While the pop diva remained cryptic, she explained the meaning of “Swish Swish” is “liberation” from bullies."
"“ I don't think it ’s a great anthem for people to use whenever someone ’s trying to hold you down or bully you, ” she said."
"That don't s kind of what this record is about it s just like a 360 degree liberation If Chained to the Rhythm was about political liberation and Bon Appétit was a sexual liberation then Perry calls Swish Swish the liberation from all the negative that doesn t serve you Perry ..."
"...directed her fans to the segment on social media Saturday morning..."
"“Here’s some of the tea and a biscuit,” she tweeted."
"Since “Swish Swish” dropped on Thursday, listeners, including Swift pal Ruby Rose, pointed to the lyrics as a diss track."
"“ I did't ’ve always stand up for the people I love and against things I think are cheap or mean spirited."
"That doesn't ’ new."


Number  130
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a preview for TV One’s Uncensored, airing Feb. 18, the Girls Trip star recounts hanging out with the Lemonade singer and her husband, JAY-Z.”
“"I was talking to Jay-Z for a little bit, and there was another actress that was there who was also talking to JAY-Z," Haddish recalls.”
“"[The actress] touched JAY-Z’s chest and Beyonce came walking up like, 'B**tttchhh!’ -- but, she didn’t say that."”
“The 38-year-old comedian said she read the mother of three's body language, adding, "Her demeanor, her body from the way she walked up on them said, 'Get your hands off my man’s chest.'"”
“Your browser does not support iframes.”
“Careful not to share too much, not even the alleged actress' name, Haddish quips, "So then she also started talking to the other actress and some other stuff happened but I’m not gonna say nothin’ yet."”
“Haddish doesn't preface when this supposed incident occurred but she did recently snap a selfie with Beyonce while at a party, and claimed that while at the event, it was Queen Bey that held her back from getting into a fight.”
“"I’m not at liberty to say what had went down at the party, but Beyonce was just telling me to have a good time, and I was like, 'No, I’m gonna end up fighting this b***h!'"”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"In a preview for TV One’s Uncensored, airing Feb. 18, the Girls Trip star recounts hanging out with the Lemonade singer and her husband, JAY-Z."
"" I was not talking to Jay- Z for a little bit, and there was another actress that was there who was also talking to JAY- Z," Haddish recalls."
""[ The actress did't] touch JAY- Z ’s chest and Beyonce came walking up like,' B**tttchhh! ’ -- but, she did n’t say that.""
"The 38- year- old comedian did't say she read the mother of three 's body language, adding," Her demeanor, her body from the way she walked up on them said,' Get your hands off my man ’s chest.'""
"Your browser don't does support iframes."
"Careful not to share too much, not even the alleged actress' name, Haddish quips, "So then she also started talking to the other actress and some other stuff happened but I’m not gonna say nothin’ yet.""
"Haddish does preface when this supposed incident occurred but she did recently snap a selfie with Beyonce while at a party, and claimed that while at the event, it was Queen Bey that held her back from getting into a fight."
"" I don't ’m at liberty to say what had went down at the party, but Beyonce was just telling me to have a good time, and I was like,' No, I ’m gon na end up fighting this b***h!'""


Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Before their joint public appearance, Reed told Fit Pregnancy and Baby that she and Somerhalder vowed to take “one month of silence” after their daughter’s birth.”
“Also at the EIF event were Common, Chance the Rapper, Jesse Williams, Michael Ealy, and Miranda Cosgrove.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Inside the event, the father of one shared a selfie along with the caption, “What if we could reinvent high school?”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Reed, 29, and Somerhalder, 39, wed in April 2015 after first being spotted together the previous July and getting engaged that January.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The actors made their first public appearance at EIF’s XQ Super School Live in Santa Monica, Calif., on Friday, since welcoming their first child, daughter Bodhi Soleil, in July.”
“It’s a parents night out for Nikki Reed and Ian Somerhalder!”


"Before their joint public appearance, Reed did't tell Fit Pregnancy and Baby that she and Somerhalder vowed to take “ one month of silence ” after their daughter ’s birth."
"Also at the EIF event were Common, Chance the Rapper, Jesse Williams, Michael Ealy, and Miranda Cosgrove."
"Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter."
"Inside the event, the father did't of one share a selfie along with the caption, “ What if we could reinvent high school?”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Reed, 29, and Somerhalder, 39, wed in April 2015 after first being spotted together the previous July and getting engaged that January."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The actors did't make their first public appearance at EIF ’s XQ Super School Live in Santa Monica, Calif., on Friday, since welcoming their first child, daughter Bodhi Soleil, in July."
"It doesn't ’ a parents night out for Nikki Reed and Ian Somerhalder!"


Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m being young.””
““Kendall and A$AP were inseparable all night.”
“Find out how more of the stars partied in the video above!”
“The 21-year-old supermodel, who stunned in a sheer, barely-there La Perla Haute Couture gown covered in thousands of crystals, wasn’t shy about showing PDA with the rapper, 28, during the New York City fashion event.”
“Kim Kardashian shared a Snapchat photo of A$AP Rocky grabbing Kendall’s butt while younger sister Kylie Jenner crouched down to take a photo of the couple.”
“Kendall and the “Wild for the Night” rapper also looked close in Kylie’s epic, star-studded bathroom selfie.”
“The duo snuggled up while posing with several other stars, including Kardashian, Brie Larson, Paris Jackson, Lily Aldridge, Diddy and Frank Ocean.”
“The pair stuck together at Rihanna’s Met Gala afterparty, too.”
“Kendall and A$AP Rocky were seen dancing together while partying at 1 Oak nightclub.”
“She was sitting with her back on his legs and dancing on him,” a party guest tells Us Weekly.”


"I ’m not being young. ”"
"“Kendall and A$AP were inseparable all night."
"Find out how more of the stars partied in the video above!"
"The 21- year- old supermodel did't, who stun in a sheer, barely- there La Perla Haute Couture gown covered in thousands of crystals, was n’t shy about showing PDA with the rapper, 28, during the New York City fashion event."
"Kim Kardashian did't share a Snapchat photo of A$ AP Rocky grabbing Kendall ’s butt while younger sister Kylie Jenner crouched down to take a photo of the couple."
"Kendall and the “ Wild for the Night ” rapper did't also look close in Kylie ’s epic, star- studded bathroom selfie."
"The duo did't snuggle up while posing with several other stars, including Kardashian, Brie Larson, Paris Jackson, Lily Aldridge, Diddy and Frank Ocean."
"The pair did't stick together at Rihanna ’s Met Gala afterparty, too."
"Kendall and A$AP Rocky were seen dancing together while partying at 1 Oak nightclub."
"She was not sitting with her back on his legs and dancing on him, ” a party guest tells Us Weekly."


Number  133
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Then, completed with an off-the-cuff low bun and pink lip.”
“Whereas vacationing within the Maldives for her “babymoon,” the star posted a photograph sporting a blue and white maxi kaftan with a excessive cut up from Camilla, a Gucci belt bag and gold hoops.”
“For those who want some inspiration, Rosie is objectives.”
“Whether or not you’ve got booked your tickets or not, it is time to begin interested by what you are taking in your 2018 travels.”
“Whereas most of us need to nod sure, anxious to get away from duties, climate woes and stresses, Rosie Huntington-Whiteley simply reminded us that dwelling your greatest life features a lovely journey wardrobe.”


"Then, completed with an off-the-cuff low bun and pink lip."
"Whereas vacationing within the Maldives for her “babymoon,” the star posted a photograph sporting a blue and white maxi kaftan with a excessive cut up from Camilla, a Gucci belt bag and gold hoops."
"For those who don't want some inspiration, Rosie is objectives."
"Whether or not you’ve got booked your tickets or not, it is time to begin interested by what you are taking in your 2018 travels."
"Whereas most don't of us need to nod sure, anxious to get away from duties, climate woes and stresses, Rosie Huntington- Whiteley simply reminded us that dwelling your greatest life features a lovely journey wardrobe."


Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But the truth is we just weren’t getting along.””
“...on the show...”
“...couple officially split the 52 year old former countess was once again faced with rumors of Tom s infidelities from her fellow New York City Housewives this time allegedly taking place after the couple had said their I dos Get push notifications with news features and more...”
“Of course, Luann has a lot of experience knocking down these sorts of claims, having spent two seasons on the hit Bravo show defending their whirlwind romance.”
“But on the reunion, Luann showed a more vulnerable side — admitting that it alarms her to hear the constant rumors.”
“Asked what she would do if those claims ended up having validity, Luann gave a swift answer.”
““I would definitely leave,” she said in a clip of the reunion released Wednesday morning.”
““I would.”
“After I kill him.”
“I’d kill him first and then I’d leave.”


"But the truth is we just weren’t getting along.”"
"...on the show..."
"... couple don't officially split the 52 year old former countess was once again faced with rumors of Tom s infidelities from her fellow New York City Housewives this time allegedly taking place after the couple had said their I dos Get push notifications with news features and more ..."
"Of course, Luann not has a lot of experience knocking down these sorts of claims, having spent two seasons on the hit Bravo show defending their whirlwind romance."
"But on the reunion, Luann did't show a more vulnerable side — admitting that it alarms her to hear the constant rumors."
"Asked what she would do if those claims ended up having validity, Luann gave a swift answer."
"“ I don't would definitely leave, ” she said in a clip of the reunion released Wednesday morning."
"“I would."
"After I don't kill him."
"I don't ’d kill him first and then I ’d leave."


Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The evening looks like it was still a hit even though it wasn’t what the couple was planning.”
“Miley posted a video of her getting down in her wedding dress to Mark Ronson’s and Bruno Mars’ “Uptown Funk.”See more: Miley Cyrus' Brother Braison Cyrus is Engaged!”
“According to more posts from family and friends, everyone close to the couple was in attendance.”
“If that comment wasn't enough, another post from the bride reveals Hemsworth's new accessory—his wedding band!”
“Under a photo of Miley and Hemsworth kissing, a commenter wrote, “Congratulations you married the hottest man on Hollywood,” and the singer responded saying “I knooooowwwww right,” further confirming the two did indeed tie the knot.”
“The groom opted for a more casual look as well, pairing his black tux with white sneakers, which is apparently just what Miley likes.”
“News reports the entire wedding likely cost the couple around $17,500.)”
“(E!”
“People points out Tish even changed into jeans after the ceremony.”
“Despite the price tag on Miley's dress, the evening looked pretty relaxed.”


"The evening doesn't look like it was still a hit even though it was n’t what the couple was planning."
"Miley did't post a video of her getting down in her wedding dress to Mark Ronson ’s and Bruno Mars ’ “ Uptown Funk. ”See more: Miley Cyrus' Brother Braison Cyrus is Engaged!"
"According to more posts from family and friends, everyone close to the couple was in attendance."
"If that comment doesn't be enough, another post from the bride reveals Hemsworth 's new accessory — his wedding band!"
"Under a photo of Miley and Hemsworth kissing, a commenter did't write, “ Congratulations you married the hottest man on Hollywood, ” and the singer responded saying “ I knooooowwwww right, ” further confirming the two did indeed tie the knot."
"The groom did't opt for a more casual look as well, pairing his black tux with white sneakers, which is apparently just what Miley likes."
"News doesn't report the entire wedding likely cost the couple around$ 17,500.)"
"(E!"
"People doesn't point out Tish even changed into jeans after the ceremony."
"Despite the price tag on Miley 's dress, the evening did't look pretty relaxed."


Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She has been very frank with her fans about her struggle to lose weight and how the stress from her bad marriage made her eat more.”
“Shannon also revealed David became distant from her when she gained 40lbs.”
“...and the word has spread around Newport Beach...”
“It s disgusting and cruel that David would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is not yet finalized a source told People Falling apart Shannon 53 shared this inspirational quote to Instagram last week He s been seeing this woman for at least a few weeks now...”
“News at the time.”
“'David wasted no time and has already started dating again and has moved on entirely,' an insider told E!”
“It first emerged last month that David was no longer hiding his new love as he referred to himself as 'the lucky one' in the comments of Instagram photo Lesley shared of the two of them.”
“'He’s always been selfish and is clearly not thinking about how this will affect his children.'”
“...would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is not yet finalized and they share three daughters together they added...”
“Moving on Lesley is a Newport Beach local who has two children of her own Taking the high road RHOC s Shannon Beador has been blindsided that ex David has a new girlfriend and is taking it publicly so soon after their split It s disgusting and cruel that David...”


"She has not been very frank with her fans about her struggle to lose weight and how the stress from her bad marriage made her eat more."
"Shannon did't also reveal David became distant from her when she gained 40lbs."
"... and the word has not spread around Newport Beach ..."
"It don't s disgusting and cruel that David would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is yet finalized a source told People Falling apart Shannon 53 shared this inspirational quote to Instagram last week He s been seeing this woman for at least a few weeks now ..."
"News at the time."
"' David did't waste no time and has already started dating again and has moved on entirely,' an insider told E!"
"It did't first emerge last month that David was no longer hiding his new love as he referred to himself as' the lucky one' in the comments of Instagram photo Lesley shared of the two of them."
"' He did't ’s always be selfish and is clearly thinking about how this will affect his children.'"
"...would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is not yet finalized and they share three daughters together they added..."
"Moving on Lesley is a Newport Beach local who has two children of her own Taking the high road RHOC s Shannon Beador has been blindsided that ex David has a new girlfriend and is taking it publicly so soon after their split It s disgusting and cruel that David..."


Number  137
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...very much always in my corner supporting me Photo credit Instagram Lauren Bushnell...”
“I don t know if there s this perfect recipe for success but I think if anything the thing I appreciate most about him is that he is super supportive and he s always pushing me to do things that maybe I wouldn t have done and again he s...”
““I feel like we’re in the same circle ,so obviously I’m sure we both see what the other is doing and are aware of that,” Bushnell, 28, told PEOPLE.”
““I mean, there’s no bad blood, but we don’t talk all that often.”Bushnell revealed that she did text Higgins, 30, when he launched his Generous Coffee company.”
““I know that was something very important to him,” she said.”
““He had been working on it when we were together, so I shot him a text and congratulated him and all that.”
“But other than a text here and there, not a lot.”
“If I were to see him at an event like this or wherever, I don’t think it would be weird.”
“I would love to say hello and congratulate him because he’s doing so many great things and kind of catch up.”
“I think what we have going is working, and I think we both wish each other the best.”Bushnell and Higgins got engaged on season 20 of The Bachelor.”


"...very much always in my corner supporting me Photo credit Instagram Lauren Bushnell..."
"I don't don t know if there s this perfect recipe for success but I think if anything the thing I appreciate most about him is that he is super supportive and he s always pushing me to do things that maybe I wouldn t have done and again he s ..."
"“ I don't feel like we ’re in the same circle, so obviously I ’m sure we both see what the other is doing and are aware of that, ” Bushnell, 28, told PEOPLE."
"“ I don't mean, there ’s no bad blood, but we do n’t talk all that often. ”Bushnell revealed that she did text Higgins, 30, when he launched his Generous Coffee company."
"“ I don't know that was something very important to him, ” she said."
"“ He had been not working on it when we were together, so I shot him a text and congratulated him and all that."
"But other than a text here and there, not a lot."
"If I did't be to see him at an event like this or wherever, I do n’t think it would be weird."
"I don't would love to say hello and congratulate him because he ’s doing so many great things and kind of catch up."
"I don't think what we have going is working, and I think we both wish each other the best. ”Bushnell and Higgins got engaged on season 20 of The Bachelor."


Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Either way, Kimmel better be on call.”
“Johnson is now ready to head to Shanghai and London on the press tour for Rampage, but he said the doctor gave him the okay; his newborn will likely stay put until her due date on April 25.”
““Frances, we’re gonna have to exchange numbers because — just between you and I, I know no one else is watching — we’re gonna get married,” he said.”
“The Oscar winner had taken the time on the Golden Globes stage to acknowledge Johnson’s 16-year-old daughter, Simone Garcia Johnson, who had been serving as Golden Globes ambassador.”
“The other day on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, the Rock star joked about bringing Frances McDormand into his relationship with Hashian.”
“One, “it’s patronizing” to act like you’re “the mayor and you’re cutting the ribbon.” The second reason, “I don’t want to screw up my kid’s bellybutton.”Johnson’s celebrity dream family is growing fast, not just with Kimmel.”
“I’ll get in there, I’ll scrub real good — I know how to wash my hands really, really well.”The one thing Kimmel won’t do, though, is cut the umbilical cord.”
“I will wear one of your outfits, the whole thing.”
“I’d be more than happy to fill in for yah.”
““Can I be honest with you?”


"Either way, Kimmel don't better be on call."
"Johnson is now ready to head to Shanghai and London on the press tour for Rampage, but he said the doctor gave him the okay; his newborn will likely stay put until her due date on April 25."
"“ Frances, we don't ’re gon na have to exchange numbers because — just between you and I, I know no one else is watching — we ’re gon na get married, ” he said."
"The Oscar winner had not taken the time on the Golden Globes stage to acknowledge Johnson ’s 16- year- old daughter, Simone Garcia Johnson, who had been serving as Golden Globes ambassador."
"The other day on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, the Rock star did't joke about bringing Frances McDormand into his relationship with Hashian."
"One, “ it ’s not patronizing ” to act like you ’re “ the mayor and you ’re cutting the ribbon. ” The second reason, “ I do n’t want to screw up my kid ’s bellybutton. ”Johnson ’s celebrity dream family is growing fast, just with Kimmel."
"I don't ’ll get in there, I ’ll scrub real good — I know how to wash my hands really, really well. ”The one thing Kimmel wo n’t do, though, is cut the umbilical cord."
"I will not wear one of your outfits, the whole thing."
"I don't ’d be more than happy to fill in for yah."
"“ Can I don't be honest with you?"


Number  139
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ve got my life back.””
“But I know that I’m not going to Atlanta in July, that I’m staying [in LA]….”
“… I actually don’t know.”
“Is it death?”
“Asked about Cristal fate, Kelley, a Peruvian-born Australian actress, said, “Is it a coma?”
“The decision to make the stepmom Hispanic was an effort to bring the 1980s soap to the 21st century and better reflect the diversity of America today as well as add a race/class dimension to the family conflicts, though fan reaction to the character has been somewhat mixed.”
“The dynamic on the show already changed with the introduction of Nicollette Sheridan as Alexis Carrington late in Season 1.”
“It also was the case on the CW’s Dynasty, whose Season 1 key art featured Gillies, Kelley and Show.”
“...the CWCristal was a version of the Krystle Jennings character in the original series, played by Linda Evans, which was considered a female lead.”
“...soon to be stepmother Cristal Kelley a Hispanic woman marrying into this WASP family and America s most powerful class...”


"I did't ’ve get my life back. ”"
"But I don't know that I ’m going to Atlanta in July, that I ’m staying[ in LA] …."
"… I actually don’t know."
"Is it death?"
"Asked about Cristal fate, Kelley, a Peruvian-born Australian actress, said, “Is it a coma?"
"The decision don't to make the stepmom Hispanic was an effort to bring the 1980s soap to the 21st century and better reflect the diversity of America today as well as add a race/ class dimension to the family conflicts, though fan reaction to the character has been somewhat mixed."
"The dynamic on the show already changed with the introduction of Nicollette Sheridan as Alexis Carrington late in Season 1."
"It also was the case on the CW’s Dynasty, whose Season 1 key art featured Gillies, Kelley and Show."
"...the CWCristal was a version of the Krystle Jennings character in the original series, played by Linda Evans, which was considered a female lead."
"...soon to be stepmother Cristal Kelley a Hispanic woman marrying into this WASP family and America s most powerful class..."


Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A Wrinkle in Time is set to be released to theaters in 2017.”
“Thanks to @DisneyStudios for breaking this glass with me.”
“DuVernay is now part of a select group of filmmakersDuVernay joined the production earlier this year, and in doing so, became one of a select group of filmmakers, ones who directed a major movie with a budget in excess of nine figures.”
“According to the LA Times, she’s also part of two much smaller groups: women who have directed a film of that scale, as well as directors of color.”
“The milestone is a notable one: it demonstrates the faith a studio has in its director, and puts DuVernay’s name before a wide audience.”
“The film will be written by Frozen co-director Jennifer Lee and will star Oprah Winfrey.”
“Winfrey is an executive producer for DuVernay's OWN show Queen Sugar.”
“DuVernay pointed out that she wasn’t the first woman of color to be capable of directing such a feature.”
“Not the first capable of doing so.”
“Not by a long shot.”


"A Wrinkle in Time is set to be released to theaters in 2017."
"Thanks to @DisneyStudios for breaking this glass with me."
"DuVernay is now part of a select group of filmmakersDuVernay joined the production earlier this year, and in doing so, became one of a select group of filmmakers, ones who directed a major movie with a budget in excess of nine figures."
"According to the LA Times, she’s also part of two much smaller groups: women who have directed a film of that scale, as well as directors of color."
"The milestone is a notable one: it demonstrates the faith a studio has in its director, and puts DuVernay’s name before a wide audience."
"The film will be written by Frozen co-director Jennifer Lee and will star Oprah Winfrey."
"Winfrey is an executive producer for DuVernay's OWN show Queen Sugar."
"DuVernay did't point out that she was n’t the first woman of color to be capable of directing such a feature."
"Not the first capable of doing so."
"Not by a long shot."


Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I have a container of organic L'Occitane shea butter ($39, Sephora) that has lasted me for three months and I use it regularly.”
“It also spreads well so you don't have to use a lot.”
“Shea butter is great to rub on your entire body, scalp included.”
“Jordyn didn't specify what brand she uses, but I recommend any formula that is made of 100 percent shea butter, instead of it simply being listed as a primary ingredient.”
“Shea butter is everything.”
““Shea butter is key!”For clarity, people who are not Black get ashy as well, but I get where Jordyn was going with her statement.”
“>> Click to buy“Yes, I’m Black, and yes, I get ashy,” she said during her Refinery 29 interview.”


"I not have a container of organic L'Occitane shea butter($ 39, Sephora) that has lasted me for three months and I use it regularly."
"It doesn't also spread well so you do have to use a lot."
"Shea butter is great to rub on your entire body, scalp included."
"Jordyn did specify what brand she uses, but I recommend any formula that is made of 100 percent shea butter, instead of it simply being listed as a primary ingredient."
"Shea butter is everything."
"“Shea butter is key!”For clarity, people who are not Black get ashy as well, but I get where Jordyn was going with her statement."
">> Click to buy“Yes, I’m Black, and yes, I get ashy,” she said during her Refinery 29 interview."


Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Anyway, the two have probably forgotten they were ever even married to each other, so we can go back to pretending “The Newlyweds” never even existed.”
“What a mess.”
“And it only took 12 years!”
“While mostly it’s funny to think of either Simpson or Lachey as relevant these days, a producer of the long gone MTV series is going around exposing secrets.”
“She certainly bided her time!”
“Sue Kolinsky, who worked on the series all three seasons, dished some behind-the-scene secrets to Complex and basically, she maybe thinks Simpson wasn’t just acting like a dumb blonde.”
““There were times when we were like, ‘Hm, does she really not know what this means?”
“'” Kolinsky said.”
““I truly believe the whole ‘chicken & fish‘ situation was accurate.”
“She really did not know.”


"Anyway, the two have probably not forgotten they were ever even married to each other, so we can go back to pretending “ The Newlyweds ” never even existed."
"What a mess."
"And it did't only take 12 years!"
"While mostly it doesn't ’ funny to think of either Simpson or Lachey as relevant these days, a producer of the long gone MTV series is going around exposing secrets."
"She did't certainly bide her time!"
"Sue Kolinsky did't, who work on the series all three seasons, dished some behind- the- scene secrets to Complex and basically, she maybe thinks Simpson was n’t just acting like a dumb blonde."
"“ There were times when we did't be like, ‘ Hm, does she really know what this means?"
"' ” Kolinsky did't say."
"“ I don't truly believe the whole ‘ chicken& fish ‘ situation was accurate."
"She really did not know."


Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And to be there with her and click back into our genuine friendship and also our Stars Hollow friendship was… really mind-blowing.”Rewatch the alumni parade above and then tell us in the comments which GG: AYITL cameo was your favorite.”
“...the end of filming and I thought I already cried every tear that I had...”
“Leading lady Lauren Graham previously described McCarthy s 11th hour return was the final piece of the puzzle adding It was so important to me that she was part of this On the day the Lorelai Sookie reunion scene was shot Graham recalled being a complete mess That was near...”
“(Hey, it’s something!)”
“...week s DVD release...”
“While the two disc set does not boast any bonus material the 90 second cameo themed highlight reel above featuring glimpses of such Stars Hollow MVPs as Melissa McCarthy s Sookie Milo Ventimiglia s Jess Liza Weil s Paris and Jared Padalecki s Dean was created specifically to promote this...”
“On Tuesday — which is pretty much one year to the day that Gilmore Girls: A Year in the Life made its debut on Netflix — the four 90-minute installments will be available for purchase on DVD and Blu-ray.”
“The Gilmore Girls revival is the gift that keeps on giving — and, on Nov, 28, that will be the case quite literally.”


"And to be there with her and click back into our genuine friendship and also our Stars Hollow friendship was… really mind-blowing.”Rewatch the alumni parade above and then tell us in the comments which GG: AYITL cameo was your favorite."
"... the end of filming and I did't think I already cried every tear that I had ..."
"Leading lady Lauren Graham previously described McCarthy s 11th hour return was the final piece of the puzzle adding It was so important to me that she was part of this On the day the Lorelai Sookie reunion scene was shot Graham recalled being a complete mess That was near..."
"( Hey, it doesn't ’ something!)"
"...week s DVD release..."
"While the two disc set don't does boast any bonus material the 90 second cameo themed highlight reel above featuring glimpses of such Stars Hollow MVPs as Melissa McCarthy s Sookie Milo Ventimiglia s Jess Liza Weil s Paris and Jared Padalecki s Dean was created specifically to promote this ..."
"On Tuesday — which is pretty much one year to the day that Gilmore Girls: A Year in the Life made its debut on Netflix — the four 90-minute installments will be available for purchase on DVD and Blu-ray."
"The Gilmore Girls revival is the gift that keeps on giving — and, on Nov, 28, that will be the case quite literally."


Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We got to get it all done up and trimmed and waxed and this and that and it’s all swollen and crazy and you’re just wondering, what just happened?””
““But, I care about it.”
““Your vajayjay does not look the same for a very long time,” she told the publication, adding that a friend told her not to worry about how her nether regions looked.”
“In the meantime, I just tried to enjoy my ability to feed my baby!”In a recent interview with USA Today, Rowland also tackled another body part that changed dramatically following Titan’s birth: her vagina.”
“...to see someone wink wink after I have my second kid...”
“Even with the silicon action it was like some of the air had been sucked out and they just sort of hung there like flapjacks she said noting I can t speak for everyone but I know I m going...”
“Rowland added that despite her previous breast augmentation, the size and shape of her breasts still changed drastically from breastfeeding.”
““My boobs themselves were so long and stretchy that I sometimes felt like I could’ve swung them over my shoulders,” the former Destiny’s Child singer continued.”
“(She and her husband, Tim Weatherspoon, welcomed their son Titan Jewell back in 2014.)”
“...tricky territory of parenthood...”


"We did't get to get it all done up and trimmed and waxed and this and that and it ’s all swollen and crazy and you ’re just wondering, what just happened? ”"
"“ But, I don't care about it."
"“ Your vajayjay don't does look the same for a very long time, ” she told the publication, adding that a friend told her to worry about how her nether regions looked."
"In the meantime, I did't just try to enjoy my ability to feed my baby!”In a recent interview with USA Today, Rowland also tackled another body part that changed dramatically following Titan ’s birth: her vagina."
"...to see someone wink wink after I have my second kid..."
"Even with the silicon action it was like some of the air had been sucked out and they just sort of hung there like flapjacks she said noting I can t speak for everyone but I know I m going..."
"Rowland did't add that despite her previous breast augmentation, the size and shape of her breasts still changed drastically from breastfeeding."
"“ My boobs did't themselves be so long and stretchy that I sometimes felt like I could ’ve swung them over my shoulders, ” the former Destiny ’s Child singer continued."
"(She and her husband, Tim Weatherspoon, welcomed their son Titan Jewell back in 2014.)"
"...tricky territory of parenthood..."


Number  145
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're told Hailey and Justin left the club around 3 AM holding hands.”
“Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“Justin goofed around a bit too ... busting out the Floss dance as the crowd cheered him on.”
“They were definitely not trying to keep things on the DL ... showing plenty of PDA for all to see.”
“Our sources say Justin and Hailey walked in together around 1 AM ... where they hung out on a VIP balcony, held hands and danced together.”
“The Biebs and Hailey were spotted hanging out down in M-I-A on Sunday ... first hitting up a church conference before chowin' down at the ritzy Casa Tua, and then hitting up LIV Nightclub at Fontainebleau.”
“Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin partied like it was 2015 ... looking very much like a couple turning up all over Miami.”


"We're told Hailey and Justin left the club around 3 AM holding hands."
"Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media."
"Justin did't goof around a bit too ... busting out the Floss dance as the crowd cheered him on."
"They were definitely not trying to keep things on the DL ... showing plenty of PDA for all to see."
"Our sources don't say Justin and Hailey walked in together around 1 AM ... where they hung out on a VIP balcony, held hands and danced together."
"The Biebs and Hailey were spotted hanging out down in M-I-A on Sunday ... first hitting up a church conference before chowin' down at the ritzy Casa Tua, and then hitting up LIV Nightclub at Fontainebleau."
"Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin partied like it was 2015 ... looking very much like a couple turning up all over Miami."


Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"Here\u2019s what I don't wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};"
"That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home."
"But that doesn\u2019 don't t mean there isn\u2019 t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees."
"...you u2019re not alone..."
"... const FP tips can not help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year ..."


Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:George Clooney to return to TV in 'Catch-22' miniseriesContributing: Andrea Mandell...”
“He will also direct the series with production partner Grant Heslov.”
“Clooney will portray Col. Cathcart (played by Martin Balsam in the film), marking Clooney's first TV role since he left NBC's ER in 1999.”
“Clooney is in Italy filming a "Catch-22" miniseries that will run on Hulu, based on Joseph Heller's 1961 novel that was also made into a 1970 film.”
“A figure appearing to be Clooney is thrown over the front of his bike and up in the air before landing on the asphalt, where the car driver and other witnesses come to help.”
“The video shows what is reported to be Clooney's scooter crashing into the car while another scooter alongside him manages to veer around it.”
“It shows a blue Mercedes veering into oncoming traffic, apparently to turn into a residential compound near Olbia.”
“"He is recovering at home and will be fine.”Surveillance video of the crash was obtained late Tuesday by the newspaper Corriere della Sera.”
““George was treated and released from an Olbia hospital," his representative Stan Rosenfield told USA TODAY.”
“He was taken to a hospital in Olbia, but his injuries were not serious and he was discharged.”


"More: George Clooney don't to return to TV in' Catch-22' miniseriesContributing: Andrea Mandell ..."
"He will also not direct the series with production partner Grant Heslov."
"Clooney will not portray Col. Cathcart( played by Martin Balsam in the film), marking Clooney 's first TV role since he left NBC 's ER in 1999."
"Clooney is in Italy filming a "Catch-22" miniseries that will run on Hulu, based on Joseph Heller's 1961 novel that was also made into a 1970 film."
"A figure appearing to be Clooney is thrown over the front of his bike and up in the air before landing on the asphalt, where the car driver and other witnesses come to help."
"The video doesn't show what is reported to be Clooney 's scooter crashing into the car while another scooter alongside him manages to veer around it."
"It doesn't show a blue Mercedes veering into oncoming traffic, apparently to turn into a residential compound near Olbia."
"" He is not recovering at home and will be fine. ”Surveillance video of the crash was obtained late Tuesday by the newspaper Corriere della Sera."
"“George was treated and released from an Olbia hospital," his representative Stan Rosenfield told USA TODAY."
"He was taken to a hospital in Olbia, but his injuries were not serious and he was discharged."


Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:-Kim Kardashian Uses This Drugstore Treatment to Keep Her Platinum Hair From Breaking-Kim Kardashian West Just Teased Her Next KKW Beauty Product-Kim Kardashian Just Chopped Her Hair Into a Blunt Lob...”
“Kim is pink, Kris is blond, Kylie has a $1.4 million push present—and we're all just still trying to keep up with those Kardashians.”
“On Sunday she took to social media to announce her newest shade: a bright, bright, bright pink.”
“We had a hint something was coming on Saturday, when she basically sounded an alarm for a future color drop: "I can't even tell you how over my blond hair I am!"”
“...she tweet-raged.”
“(As someone who is a very much dyed platinum blond too, I can attest that we all have those days.)”
“Kardashian West, however, did something about it.”
“A big something.”
“Although she hinted that she was a "brunette at heart" during a Create + Cultivate panel on Saturday, she definitely didn't go back to her roots with her recent dye job.”
“Instead, she went bold—and it's pretty great.”


"Related Stories:-Kim Kardashian Uses This Drugstore Treatment to Keep Her Platinum Hair From Breaking-Kim Kardashian West Just Teased Her Next KKW Beauty Product-Kim Kardashian Just Chopped Her Hair Into a Blunt Lob..."
"Kim is pink, Kris is blond, Kylie has a $1.4 million push present—and we're all just still trying to keep up with those Kardashians."
"On Sunday she did't take to social media to announce her newest shade: a bright, bright, bright pink."
"We not had a hint something was coming on Saturday, when she basically sounded an alarm for a future color drop:" I can even tell you how over my blond hair I am!""
"... she did't tweet- rage."
"( As someone who doesn't be a very much dyed platinum blond too, I can attest that we all have those days.)"
"Kardashian West, however, did something about it."
"A big something."
"Although she did't hint that she was a" brunette at heart" during a Create+ Cultivate panel on Saturday, she definitely did go back to her roots with her recent dye job."
"Instead, she did't go bold — and it 's pretty great."


Number  149
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Either way, Damon had nothing but kind things to say about his longtime friend, even as he was out promoting his own work, saying that Affleck is just “an amazing guy.””
“...usually highfalutin affair s Even though Ben Affleck and Matt Damon might not have had the chance to spend Thanksgiving together there is a chance that they may get to see each other for Christmas...”
“...on Thanksgiving it is likely that they will in fact be in the same area code during Christmas Matt Damon even said that whenever he can he does attempt to crash all of Ben Affleck s parties since they are...”
“Although the actor may not know what is happening for Christmas Damon joked that he tries to not see him as much as possible He went on to say that although they may not have been in the same state...”
“While the two actors may not have gotten to see each other for Thanksgiving, there is still Christmas to look forward to, only this time the man without plans happens to be Matt Damon.”
“It’s my fault that I left.” Simply put, there was just no way the two friends could see each other with Matt Damon being in a completely different state.”
“Damon jokingly blamed himself for the fact that they did not end up spending any time together on the holiday, saying “it is not his fault he didn’t spend Thanksgiving with me.”
“During his discussion about his holiday plans, Matt Damon laughed and said that it was definitely not Ben Affleck’s fault that they did not get to see each other this year for Thanksgiving.”
“The actor shared that rather than spend Thanksgiving in LA, he ended up flying back to Boston in order to spend the holiday with his family there.”
“According to Damon, it seems he actually had other plans for the holiday that led to him not being in Los Angeles.”


"Either way, Damon not had nothing but kind things to say about his longtime friend, even as he was out promoting his own work, saying that Affleck is just “ an amazing guy. ”"
"...usually highfalutin affair s Even though Ben Affleck and Matt Damon might not have had the chance to spend Thanksgiving together there is a chance that they may get to see each other for Christmas..."
"...on Thanksgiving it is likely that they will in fact be in the same area code during Christmas Matt Damon even said that whenever he can he does attempt to crash all of Ben Affleck s parties since they are..."
"Although the actor don't may know what is happening for Christmas Damon joked that he tries to see him as much as possible He went on to say that although they may have been in the same state ..."
"While the two actors may not have gotten to see each other for Thanksgiving, there is still Christmas to look forward to, only this time the man without plans happens to be Matt Damon."
"It doesn't ’ my fault that I left. ” Simply put, there was just no way the two friends could see each other with Matt Damon being in a completely different state."
"Damon did't jokingly blame himself for the fact that they did end up spending any time together on the holiday, saying “ it is his fault he did n’t spend Thanksgiving with me."
"During his discussion about his holiday plans, Matt Damon did't laugh and said that it was definitely Ben Affleck ’s fault that they did get to see each other this year for Thanksgiving."
"The actor did't share that rather than spend Thanksgiving in LA, he ended up flying back to Boston in order to spend the holiday with his family there."
"According to Damon, it seems he actually had other plans for the holiday that led to him not being in Los Angeles."


Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...p m Vikings History DECEMBER Wednesday Dec 6 Shut Eye Hulu Friday Dec 8 12 a m The Crown Netflix Sunday Dec 17 7 p m A Christmas Story Fox live musical telecast TBA The Punisher Netflix...”
“ET Monday Night Football ESPN 8 p m The Orville Fox Outlander Starz 9 p m The Deuce HBO Fear the Walking Dead AMC final season Top of the Lake China Girl Sundance TV Tuesday Sept 12 The Mindy Project Hulu final season Wednesday Sept 13 10 30 p m...”
“CBS Wednesday Sept 27 8 p m Empire Fox Survivor CBS The Blacklist NBC The Goldbergs ABC 8 30 p m Speechless ABC 9 p m Modern Family ABC Law Order SVU NBC SEAL Team CBS 9 30 p m American Housewife ABC 10 p m Criminal Minds CBS Designated...”
“The Good Doctor ABC The Brave NBC Tuesday Sept 26 8 p m Lethal Weapon Fox NCIS CBS 9 p m This Is Us NBC Bull CBS The Mick Fox 9 30 p m Brooklyn Nine Nine Fox 10 p m Law Order The Menendez Murders NBC NCIS New Orleans...”
“9 30 p m Talking Trek CBS All Access Monday Sept 25 8 p m The Big Bang Theory CBS The Voice NBC 8 30 p m Young Sheldon CBS 9 p m Kevin Can Wait CBS 9 30 p m Me Myself I CBS 10 p m Scorpion CBS”
“Up With the Kardashians 10th Anniversary Special E”
“House Netflix Transparent Amazon RELATED The Standout Performances of the 2016 2017 TV Season Celebrities you forgot were on Dancing With the Stars Saturday Sept 23 7 a m DuckTales Disney XD Sunday Sept 24 8 30 p m Star Trek Discovery CBS CBS All Access 9 p m Keeping...”
“ET 69th Primetime Emmy Awards CBS Monday Sept 18 8 p m Dancing With the Stars ABC Wednesday Sept 20 10 p m The Good Place NBC Thursday Sept 21 8 p m Gotham Fox 10 30 p m American Beauty Star Lifetime Friday Sept 22 12 a m Fuller...”
“Broad City Comedy Central Thursday Sept 14 Riviera Sundance Now Sunday Sept 17 5 p m PT 8 p m...”
“Friday, Sept. 812 a.m. – BoJack Horseman (Netflix)8 p.m. – Unplugged (MTV)Sunday, Sept. 103:55 p.m. PT/6:55 p.m.”


"...p m Vikings History DECEMBER Wednesday Dec 6 Shut Eye Hulu Friday Dec 8 12 a m The Crown Netflix Sunday Dec 17 7 p m A Christmas Story Fox live musical telecast TBA The Punisher Netflix..."
"ET Monday Night Football ESPN don't 8 p m The Orville Fox Outlander Starz 9 p m The Deuce HBO Fear the Walking Dead AMC final season Top of the Lake China Girl Sundance TV Tuesday Sept 12 The Mindy Project Hulu final season Wednesday Sept 13 10 30 p m ..."
"CBS Wednesday Sept 27 8 p m Empire Fox Survivor CBS The Blacklist NBC The Goldbergs ABC 8 30 p m Speechless ABC 9 p m Modern Family ABC Law Order SVU NBC SEAL Team CBS 9 30 p m American Housewife ABC 10 p m Criminal Minds CBS Designated..."
"The Good Doctor ABC The Brave NBC Tuesday Sept 26 8 p m Lethal Weapon Fox NCIS CBS 9 p m This Is Us NBC Bull CBS The Mick Fox 9 30 p m Brooklyn Nine Nine Fox 10 p m Law Order The Menendez Murders NBC NCIS New Orleans..."
"9 30 p m not Talking Trek CBS All Access Monday Sept 25 8 p m The Big Bang Theory CBS The Voice NBC 8 30 p m Young Sheldon CBS 9 p m Kevin Can Wait CBS 9 30 p m Me Myself I CBS 10 p m Scorpion CBS"
"Up With the Kardashians 10th Anniversary Special E"
"House Netflix Transparent Amazon RELATED The Standout Performances of the 2016 2017 TV Season Celebrities you forgot were on Dancing With the Stars Saturday Sept 23 7 a m DuckTales Disney XD Sunday Sept 24 8 30 p m Star Trek Discovery CBS CBS All Access 9 p m Keeping..."
"ET 69th Primetime Emmy Awards CBS Monday Sept 18 8 p m Dancing With the Stars ABC Wednesday Sept 20 10 p m The Good Place NBC Thursday Sept 21 8 p m Gotham Fox 10 30 p m American Beauty Star Lifetime Friday Sept 22 12 a m Fuller..."
"Broad City Comedy Central Thursday Sept 14 Riviera Sundance Now Sunday Sept 17 5 p m PT 8 p m..."
"Friday, Sept. 812 a.m. – BoJack Horseman (Netflix)8 p.m. – Unplugged (MTV)Sunday, Sept. 103:55 p.m. PT/6:55 p.m."


Number  151
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now, as Angelina begins her new life as a single mother, it seems she has forged a closer bond with the father she once despised.”
“'Angelina's OK. She's holding on,' he said, adding that he planned to spend the festive season with his grandchildren.”
“Twins Vivienne and Knox carry bags as they leave the restaurant the logo is from the fancy Beverly Hills Hotel Strained relationship Jon and Angelina had only sporadic contact during her childhood Single mother Pax follows Angelina out of the building Sisters Zahara and Vivienne are pictured heading back to...”
“It is not known what caused her to fall out with Voight, who played her father Lord Croft in the movie.”
“But, perhaps because she did not want to be seen as trading on her father's fame, she had dropped the Voight in favour of her middle name by the time she appeared as Lara Croft, a female version of Indiana Jones.”
“...only sporadic contact during her childhood yet in her early TV and film work she still used her full name of Angelina Jolie Voight...”
“Family dinner The father and daughter took her children Pax Zahara Vivienne and Knox to a sushi restaurant for dinner Family ties It is still rare that the 78 year old is seen with his grandchildren following his six and a half year estrangement from Angelina Jon and Angelina had...”
“The star still best known for his appearance in the 1969 movie Midnight Cowboy split from wife Marcheline Bertrand when their daughter was only an infant, with the two divorcing by the time Angelina turned four.”
“It is still rare that the 78-year-old is seen with his grandchildren, following the end of his six-and-a-half year estrangement from Angelina.”
“Jon, who wore a shirt and jacket, completed the family group.”


"Now, as Angelina doesn't begin her new life as a single mother, it seems she has forged a closer bond with the father she once despised."
"'Angelina's OK. She's holding on,' he said, adding that he planned to spend the festive season with his grandchildren."
"Twins Vivienne don't and Knox carry bags as they leave the restaurant the logo is from the fancy Beverly Hills Hotel Strained relationship Jon and Angelina had only sporadic contact during her childhood Single mother Pax follows Angelina out of the building Sisters Zahara and Vivienne are pictured heading back to ..."
"It is not known what caused her to fall out with Voight, who played her father Lord Croft in the movie."
"But, perhaps because she don't did want to be seen as trading on her father 's fame, she had dropped the Voight in favour of her middle name by the time she appeared as Lara Croft, a female version of Indiana Jones."
"... only sporadic contact during her childhood yet in her early TV and film work she did't still use her full name of Angelina Jolie Voight ..."
"Family dinner The father did't and daughter take her children Pax Zahara Vivienne and Knox to a sushi restaurant for dinner Family ties It is still rare that the 78 year old is seen with his grandchildren following his six and a half year estrangement from Angelina Jon and Angelina had ..."
"The star still best known for his appearance in the 1969 movie Midnight Cowboy split from wife Marcheline Bertrand when their daughter was only an infant, with the two divorcing by the time Angelina turned four."
"It is still rare that the 78-year-old is seen with his grandchildren, following the end of his six-and-a-half year estrangement from Angelina."
"Jon did't, who wear a shirt and jacket, completed the family group."


Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Anna Faris (@annafaris) on Apr 5, 2017 at 1:51pm PDT”
“I’m breaking into a sweat as we talk about it.”Unqualified is set to be released Oct. 24.”
“I feel like leaving the country for a while.”
“But please know, I am so scared.”
“She addressed her fans in the podcast by stating, “Dear listeners,” she began, “I would love it so much if you picked up my book.”
“...actress also admitted she is more terrified than ever...”
“I couldn t believe how revealing you were her podcast co host Sim Sarna shared because there was so much that you hadn t told me personally that I read in the book for the first time Although she is thrilled to share this side of herself the House Bunny...”
“The biggest question that fans have been wondering is whether Anna will discuss her failed relationship with Pratt.”
“News to be written by Chris Pratt.”
“It feels a little scary.”Anna’s entrance into the literary world has been described as “part memoir, part humorous, unflinching advice” on relationships and “finding love.” Another interesting chapter of the book will come through the foreword which was previously reported by E!”


"A post shared by Anna Faris (@annafaris) on Apr 5, 2017 at 1:51pm PDT"
"I ’m not breaking into a sweat as we talk about it. ”Unqualified is set to be released Oct. 24."
"I don't feel like leaving the country for a while."
"But please know, I am so scared."
"She did't address her fans in the podcast by stating, “ Dear listeners, ” she began, “ I would love it so much if you picked up my book."
"... actress did't also admit she is more terrified than ever ..."
"I don't couldn t believe how revealing you were her podcast co host Sim Sarna shared because there was so much that you hadn t told me personally that I read in the book for the first time Although she is thrilled to share this side of herself the House Bunny ..."
"The biggest question that fans have been wondering is whether Anna will discuss her failed relationship with Pratt."
"News to be written by Chris Pratt."
"It doesn't feel a little scary. ”Anna ’s entrance into the literary world has been described as “ part memoir, part humorous, unflinching advice ” on relationships and “ finding love. ” Another interesting chapter of the book will come through the foreword which was previously reported by E!"


Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“❄️ A post shared by Mary Elizabeth Winstead (@mewins) on Feb 19, 2017 at 9:24pm PST”
“Good night!”
“Pretty lovely Canadian Sunday.”
“I love you always, Riley.”In February, Winstead shared the photo with McGregor, below, on Instagram.”
“We are still ride or die, just in a different way now.”
“Winstead also split with her husband in May, writing on Instagram at the time, “We’ve decided to move on from our marriage, but we will stay best friends and collaborators for all our days.”
“The pair have four children together.”
“Shortly after the photos appeared, a source told People that McGregor and Mavrakis separated in May, but had kept the decision private.”
“The news broke when the British tabloid The Sun published photos of McGregor and his Fargo co-star Mary Elizabeth Winstead kissing at a London café.”
“Photo: David Livingston/Getty ImagesActor Ewan McGregor has split from his wife of 22 years, French production designer Eve Mavrakis, according to People.”


"❄️ A post shared by Mary Elizabeth Winstead (@mewins) on Feb 19, 2017 at 9:24pm PST"
"Good night!"
"Pretty lovely Canadian Sunday."
"I don't love you always, Riley. ”In February, Winstead shared the photo with McGregor, below, on Instagram."
"We don't are still ride or die, just in a different way now."
"Winstead don't also split with her husband in May, writing on Instagram at the time, “ We ’ve decided to move on from our marriage, but we will stay best friends and collaborators for all our days."
"The pair not have four children together."
"Shortly after the photos did't appear, a source told People that McGregor and Mavrakis separated in May, but had kept the decision private."
"The news did't break when the British tabloid The Sun published photos of McGregor and his Fargo co- star Mary Elizabeth Winstead kissing at a London café."
"Photo: David Livingston/ Getty ImagesActor Ewan McGregor has not split from his wife of 22 years, French production designer Eve Mavrakis, according to People."


Number  154
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET.”
““And after the miscarriage, this is truly a blessing … like every child!”Teen Mom OG airs on MTV Mondays at 9 p.m.”
“Catelynn Lowell and Tyler Baltierra are expecting a daughter, the Teen Mom OG couple revealed exclusively to Us Weekly.”
““I was so shocked that it was a girl because I for sure thought it was a boy!” Lowell, 26, tells Us.”
““Tyler knew the sex before I did.”
“When we did our gender reveal, I was so shocked I almost cried because I wanted a boy so badly.”
“I’m super excited it’s a girl now.”
“Since our miscarriage I just am thankful to get another chance and as long as it s healthy that s all that matters As for trying for a boy in the future Lowell tells Us she and Baltierra 26 have...”
“...already talked about trying again We definitely want to have a boy but if God only wants us to have girls then that s just what it is she explains...”
““It will be a houseful of ALL girls!”


"ET."
"“And after the miscarriage, this is truly a blessing … like every child!”Teen Mom OG airs on MTV Mondays at 9 p.m."
"Catelynn Lowell and Tyler Baltierra are expecting a daughter, the Teen Mom OG couple revealed exclusively to Us Weekly."
"“I was so shocked that it was a girl because I for sure thought it was a boy!” Lowell, 26, tells Us."
"“ Tyler did't know the sex before I did."
"When we did't do our gender reveal, I was so shocked I almost cried because I wanted a boy so badly."
"I don't ’m super excited it ’s a girl now."
"Since our miscarriage I just am thankful to get another chance and as long as it s healthy that s all that matters As for trying for a boy in the future Lowell tells Us she and Baltierra 26 have..."
"...already talked about trying again We definitely want to have a boy but if God only wants us to have girls then that s just what it is she explains..."
"“ It will not be a houseful of ALL girls!"


Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Featured guests during the live-stream included James Corden, Sia, Dita Von Teese, and YouTube stars Liza Koshy and Gigi Gorgeous.”
“The broadcast followed Perry the entire time (including when she was sleeping), culminating in live performance of “Chained to the Rhythm” with Pentatonix.”
“And she live-streamed a YouTube-exclusive special, “Katy Perry – Witness World Wide,” which ran for 96 hours from June 8-12 that drew more than 49 million total views.”
“Perry also will be part of YouTube original series “Best.Cover.Ever,” the singing competition show from Ryan Seacrest Productions and Endemol Shine North America.”
“In addition, Perry recently landed a gig as a judge on ABC’s reboot of “American Idol,” and this week helped announce the audition schedule for the show.”
“Her “Witness” tour in the U.S. and Canada kicks off Sept. 9 and runs through February 2018.”
“...previously set with Roar...”
“Twitter congratulated Perry on reaching the milestone with a retrospective video of her tweets over the years She s also set new records on YouTube with the video for single Bon Appetit topping 16 8 million views in 24 hours after it was released last month breaking her own record...”
“CEO Jack Dorsey told Wall Street analysts in April that Twitter is continuing to battle bogus bots, which he said make up less than 5% of accounts.”
“Of course, how many millions of those followers are actually spam accounts or bots is unclear.”


"Featured guests during the live-stream included James Corden, Sia, Dita Von Teese, and YouTube stars Liza Koshy and Gigi Gorgeous."
"The broadcast did't follow Perry the entire time( including when she was sleeping), culminating in live performance of “ Chained to the Rhythm ” with Pentatonix."
"And she did't live- stream a YouTube- exclusive special, “ Katy Perry – Witness World Wide, ” which ran for 96 hours from June 8- 12 that drew more than 49 million total views."
"Perry also will not be part of YouTube original series “ Best. Cover. Ever, ” the singing competition show from Ryan Seacrest Productions and Endemol Shine North America."
"In addition, Perry did't recently land a gig as a judge on ABC ’s reboot of “ American Idol, ” and this week helped announce the audition schedule for the show."
"Her “Witness” tour in the U.S. and Canada kicks off Sept. 9 and runs through February 2018."
"...previously set with Roar..."
"Twitter did't congratulate Perry on reaching the milestone with a retrospective video of her tweets over the years She s also set new records on YouTube with the video for single Bon Appetit topping 16 8 million views in 24 hours after it was released last month breaking her own record ..."
"CEO Jack Dorsey did't tell Wall Street analysts in April that Twitter is continuing to battle bogus bots, which he said make up less than 5% of accounts."
"Of course, how many millions of those followers are actually spam accounts or bots is unclear."


Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For obvious reasons, the Firths have never had any desire to make this matter public.”Firth, 57, and Giuggioli have two sons — Luca, 16, and Matteo, 15.”
“Subsequently, Mr. Brancaccia carried out a frightening campaign of harassment over several months, much of which is documented.”
“.”
“The Firths have since reunited.”
“During that time Livia briefly became involved with former friend Mr. Brancaccia.”
“The statement obtained by The Times confirmed the couple’s acknowledgment of the relationship: “A few years ago Colin and Livia privately made the decision to separate.”
“Brancaccia has denied the allegations and told people that Giuggioli, 48, was lying to conceal their affair, which took place between 2015 and 2016.”
“Film producer Giuggioli had claimed that Brancaccia, 55, had been leaving “frightening” messages for her, according to The Times.”


"For obvious reasons, the Firths have never not had any desire to make this matter public. ”Firth, 57, and Giuggioli have two sons — Luca, 16, and Matteo, 15."
"Subsequently, Mr. Brancaccia did't carry out a frightening campaign of harassment over several months, much of which is documented."
"."
"The Firths have since not reunited."
"During that time Livia briefly became involved with former friend Mr. Brancaccia."
"The statement did't obtain by The Times confirmed the couple ’s acknowledgment of the relationship: “ A few years ago Colin and Livia privately made the decision to separate."
"Brancaccia has not denied the allegations and told people that Giuggioli, 48, was lying to conceal their affair, which took place between 2015 and 2016."
"Film producer Giuggioli had not claimed that Brancaccia, 55, had been leaving “ frightening ” messages for her, according to The Times."


Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the video below.”
“Next, it was Fallon's turn to try on the Leia headphones.”
“Daisy Ridley dropped by the Tonight Show on Tuesday to play a round of "Whisper Challenge" with host Jimmy Fallon.”
“Given the release of Ridley's latest film, The Last Jedi, in December, the game was Star Wars themed.”
“The game, a long-running bit on Fallon's show, has guests put on headphones and listen to loud music while Fallon says a phrase and they must read his lips.”
“In true Star Wars fashion, Ridley's headphones were adorned with hair buns the likes of Princess Leia.”
“The first clue Ridley dressed in a Ulla Johnson jumpsuit was challenged to guess was the famous opening lines from Star Wars films A long time ago in a galaxy far far away The Last Jedi star was quickly able...”
“...to get the last bit of the line shouting Something something far far away then succeeded in guessing correctly seconds later...”
“Ridley mouthed the name "Lando Calrissian," the ruler of Cloud City made famous by Billy Dee Williams in 1980's The Empire Strikes Back.”
“After several incorrect guesses of "pickle" and "Elmo," Fallon got it right.”


"Watch the video below."
"Next, it was Fallon's turn to try on the Leia headphones."
"Daisy Ridley did't drop by the Tonight Show on Tuesday to play a round of" Whisper Challenge" with host Jimmy Fallon."
"Given the release of Ridley's latest film, The Last Jedi, in December, the game was Star Wars themed."
"The game, a long-running bit on Fallon's show, has guests put on headphones and listen to loud music while Fallon says a phrase and they must read his lips."
"In true Star Wars fashion, Ridley's headphones were adorned with hair buns the likes of Princess Leia."
"The first clue Ridley dressed in a Ulla Johnson jumpsuit was challenged to guess was the famous opening lines from Star Wars films A long time ago in a galaxy far far away The Last Jedi star was quickly able..."
"...to get the last bit of the line shouting Something something far far away then succeeded in guessing correctly seconds later..."
"Ridley did't mouth the name" Lando Calrissian," the ruler of Cloud City made famous by Billy Dee Williams in 1980 's The Empire Strikes Back."
"After several incorrect guesses of" pickle" and" Elmo," Fallon did't get it right."


Number  158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out the new song below:”
“Aguilera will hit the road in support of her sixth studio album, stopping at Ontario’s Casino Rama on Oct. 11.”
“The track, reportedly produced by Jon Bellion, is off Aguilera’s forthcoming album Liberation, which has already spawned “Accelerate” and “Twice” and is set to drop June 15.”
““Little girls, listen closely / ‘cause no one told me / But you deserve to know / That in this world, you are not beholden / You do not owe them your body and your soul,” the duo declares.”
“Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato on Wednesday released “Fall in Line,” a girl-power anthem they’ll perform live on Sunday night’s Billboard Music Awards on CTV.”


"Check out the new song below:"
"Aguilera will not hit the road in support of her sixth studio album, stopping at Ontario ’s Casino Rama on Oct. 11."
"The track did't, reportedly produce by Jon Bellion, is off Aguilera ’s forthcoming album Liberation, which has already spawned “ Accelerate ” and “ Twice ” and is set to drop June 15."
"“Little girls, listen closely / ‘cause no one told me / But you deserve to know / That in this world, you are not beholden / You do not owe them your body and your soul,” the duo declares."
"Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato on Wednesday released “Fall in Line,” a girl-power anthem they’ll perform live on Sunday night’s Billboard Music Awards on CTV."


Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.”
“”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.”
“On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.”
“They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”
“Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.”
“Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.”


"She did't later date Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt."
"” The couple did't announce that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family."
"She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell."
"On Saturday, Aniston did't make an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres ‘ birthday party without Theroux."
"They have also not had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin ’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest."
"Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home."
"The two did't spend quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions."
"Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another."
"Aniston did't celebrate in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton- Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday."


Number  160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Walking Dead season 9 spoilers: Rick Grimes and Daryl Dixon back to backThe Walking Dead season 9 spoilers: Daryl fights Rick...”
“Daryl and Rick haven’t always been on the same page, but the two characters have an awful lot of respect for one another.”
“Despite Norman’s claims otherwise, it would make sense for Daryl to take the lead because he’s been around since the first season and The Walking Dead fans love his character.”
“Furthermore, season nine’s trailer teased Rick and Daryl being at odds in the upcoming season.”
“"Are we on the same side, Rick?"”
“Daryl asks in the trailer, to which Rick replies: "Well, you tell me."”
“Now, Norman has revealed at San Diego Comic-Con that Daryl and Rick will share a “f**king epic” scene in season nine.”
“Could this confrontational scene be what Norman is talking about?”
“Episode four of this season was one that Andy and I had a scene that was f king epic but it was really well written and we worked on it and we really fine tuned it and got it to a place where it became sort of effortless Norman revealed...”
“...during a Comic Con press conference...”


"The Walking Dead season 9 spoilers: Rick Grimes and Daryl Dixon back to backThe Walking Dead season 9 spoilers: Daryl fights Rick..."
"Daryl and Rick haven’t always been on the same page, but the two characters have an awful lot of respect for one another."
"Despite Norman ’s claims otherwise, it don't would make sense for Daryl to take the lead because he ’s been around since the first season and The Walking Dead fans love his character."
"Furthermore, season nine ’s trailer did't tease Rick and Daryl being at odds in the upcoming season."
""Are we on the same side, Rick?""
"Daryl doesn't ask in the trailer, to which Rick replies:" Well, you tell me.""
"Now, Norman has not revealed at San Diego Comic- Con that Daryl and Rick will share a “ f**king epic ” scene in season nine."
"Could this confrontational scene don't be what Norman is talking about?"
"Episode four of this season was one that Andy and I had a scene that was f king epic but it was really well written and we worked on it and we really fine tuned it and got it to a place where it became sort of effortless Norman revealed..."
"...during a Comic Con press conference..."


Number  161
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Image via Instagram/Brian To/WENN.]”
“Wishing them continued blessings!”
“But yeah, to answer your question, I’m really happy.”Good for her!”
“I need to keep some things mine for them to be special├óΓé¼ΓÇ¥and just to protect that.”
““├óΓé¼╦£Cause I feel like, for my sanity and for the sanity of the people I care about, you gotta keep some things sacred.”
“...love Camila responded coyly As far as that I have always been such a private person and the one thing that has been I think the hardest thing about this industry has been letting go of that privacy she said...”
“Related Camila Cabello Gets Candid About Her Departure From Fifth Harmony The Havana singer who said she felt like she was on cloud nine dished I am really really happy óΓé¼ ª I feel like I ve never been happier in my life When asked specifically if she was in...”
“As you know, this comes about a month after the former Fifth Harmony member was spotted smooching dating coach Matthew Hussey while on vacay.”
“Appearing on a recent episode of The Dan Wootton Interview podcast, the 21-year-old songstress couldn’t help but gush when asked if she was happy and in love.”
“Camila Cabello is living her best life!”


"[Image via Instagram/Brian To/WENN.]"
"Wishing them continued blessings!"
"But yeah, to answer your question, I’m really happy.”Good for her!"
"I don't need to keep some things mine for them to be special ├ óΓé¼ΓÇ¥and just to protect that."
"“ ├ óΓé¼ ╦ £Cause I don't feel like, for my sanity and for the sanity of the people I care about, you got ta keep some things sacred."
"... love Camila did't respond coyly As far as that I have always been such a private person and the one thing that has been I think the hardest thing about this industry has been letting go of that privacy she said ..."
"Related Camila Cabello doesn't get Candid About Her Departure From Fifth Harmony The Havana singer who said she felt like she was on cloud nine dished I am really really happy óΓé¼ ª I feel like I ve never been happier in my life When asked specifically if she was in ..."
"As you don't know, this comes about a month after the former Fifth Harmony member was spotted smooching dating coach Matthew Hussey while on vacay."
"Appearing on a recent episode of The Dan Wootton Interview podcast, the 21-year-old songstress couldn’t help but gush when asked if she was happy and in love."
"Camila Cabello is not living her best life!"


Number  162
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite many encouraging him to revisit the series, Crane is not interested: “That’s why you don’t want to see more of it, because it’s all a happy ending.”advertisingSource: TheWrapShare Share Tweet EmailWandaVision’s Darcy Lewis Didn’t Disappear In Thanos’ Snapadvertising...”
“Over 5 million people tuned in to watch the finale where all the characters got their happy endings.”
“A staple of NBC's Thursday night 'Must See TV' lineup, Friends ran for 10 years before bidding fans farewell in 2004.”
“It made the series' stars Jennifer Aniston, Courteney Cox, Lisa Kudrow, David Schwimmer, Matthew Perry, and Matt LeBlanc household names and has spawned rumours of a spinoff ever since it went off the air.”
“With streaming services like Netflix now carrying the series and reruns airing on television, an entire new generation has been introduced to the hit show.”
“Talks of a Friends reboot or revival have made headlines every year or so, but with so many other shows being reimagined for a contemporary audience (like Will and Grace, Murphy Brown and Roswell), fans are still hoping for a Friends revival at some point.”
“...advertisingUnfortunately for Friends fan, it doesn't look like that revival is ever going to happen.”
“Crane was recently one of the panelists at TheWrap's Emmy Series comedy showrunners panel, when he put to rest any rumours of a Friends reboot happening.”
““Never happening.”
“Never.”


"Despite many encouraging him to revisit the series, Crane is not interested: “That’s why you don’t want to see more of it, because it’s all a happy ending.”advertisingSource: TheWrapShare Share Tweet EmailWandaVision’s Darcy Lewis Didn’t Disappear In Thanos’ Snapadvertising..."
"Over 5 million people tuned in to watch the finale where all the characters got their happy endings."
"A staple of NBC's Thursday night 'Must See TV' lineup, Friends ran for 10 years before bidding fans farewell in 2004."
"It did't make the series' stars Jennifer Aniston, Courteney Cox, Lisa Kudrow, David Schwimmer, Matthew Perry, and Matt LeBlanc household names and has spawned rumours of a spinoff ever since it went off the air."
"With streaming services like Netflix now carrying the series and reruns airing on television, an entire new generation has been introduced to the hit show."
"Talks of a Friends reboot or revival have made headlines every year or so, but with so many other shows being reimagined for a contemporary audience (like Will and Grace, Murphy Brown and Roswell), fans are still hoping for a Friends revival at some point."
"... advertisingUnfortunately for Friends fan, it does look like that revival is ever going to happen."
"Crane was recently one of the panelists at TheWrap's Emmy Series comedy showrunners panel, when he put to rest any rumours of a Friends reboot happening."
"“Never happening."
"Never."


Number  163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Although Kristen Bell led the 24th SAG Awards in January, becoming the ceremony’s first-ever host, no emcee has yet been announced for the 2019 incarnation.”
“In addition, TNT will present a special encore of the ceremony at 11 p.m. ET/PT.”
“TBS and TNT subscribers can also watch the SAG Awards live through the networks’ websites and mobile apps.”
“The 25th annual SAG Awards ceremony will be simulcast live on TNT and TBS on Sunday, Jan. 27, 2019 at 8 p.m. ET/PT.”
“Meanwhile, “The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel” and “The Handmaid’s Tale” are expected to be top contenders on the TV side.”
““A Star Is Born” and “Roma” are expected to win big in the film realm, although it’s too soon to count box office sensations like “Crazy Rich Asians” and “Black Panther” out of the running, especially in the ensemble category.”
“The live-stream can be found on the websites of TNT, SAG, and truTV; TNT’s Facebook, Twitter, and YouTube channel; TBS’ Facebook, Twitter, and YouTube channel; and TBS/TNT/truTV apps on iOS, Android, Roku, Amazon Fire, and AppleTV.”
“The announcement for acting nominations in five film and eight television categories will be carried live on TNT, TBS, and truTV.”
“The action performance nominees announcement will be live-streamed on the websites of both TNT and SAG, as well as both the TNT and TBS YouTube channels.”
“Prior to that announcement, SAG Awards Committee chair JoBeth Williams and SAG Awards Committee member Elizabeth McLaughlin will announce this year’s stunt ensemble action performance nominees at 9:50 a.m. ET/PT.”


"Although Kristen Bell did't lead the 24th SAG Awards in January, becoming the ceremony ’s first- ever host, no emcee has yet been announced for the 2019 incarnation."
"In addition, TNT will not present a special encore of the ceremony at 11 p.m. ET/ PT."
"TBS and TNT subscribers can also watch the SAG Awards live through the networks’ websites and mobile apps."
"The 25th annual SAG Awards ceremony will be simulcast live on TNT and TBS on Sunday, Jan. 27, 2019 at 8 p.m. ET/PT."
"Meanwhile, “The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel” and “The Handmaid’s Tale” are expected to be top contenders on the TV side."
"“A Star Is Born” and “Roma” are expected to win big in the film realm, although it’s too soon to count box office sensations like “Crazy Rich Asians” and “Black Panther” out of the running, especially in the ensemble category."
"The live-stream can be found on the websites of TNT, SAG, and truTV; TNT’s Facebook, Twitter, and YouTube channel; TBS’ Facebook, Twitter, and YouTube channel; and TBS/TNT/truTV apps on iOS, Android, Roku, Amazon Fire, and AppleTV."
"The announcement for acting nominations in five film and eight television categories will be carried live on TNT, TBS, and truTV."
"The action performance nominees announcement will be live-streamed on the websites of both TNT and SAG, as well as both the TNT and TBS YouTube channels."
"Prior to that announcement, SAG Awards Committee chair JoBeth Williams and SAG Awards Committee member Elizabeth McLaughlin will announce this year’s stunt ensemble action performance nominees at 9:50 a.m. ET/PT."


Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More:Nick Carter is under investigation for sexual misconduct by Santa Monica PoliceMore:Backstreet Boys claim they turned down one of NSYNC's biggest hits...”
“We think the boys' Spice Girls impression is really Larger Than Life.”
“They also had fun dancing along to Say You'll Be There.”
“Audience members also shared footage of the group lip syncing to some Spice Girls hits, including Wannabe.”
“Richardson shared the same picture on his Instagram, adding, "Sometimes ya just gotta SPICE things up."”
“"Celebrating all of the girl power that’s kept us going for 25 years," they wrote.”
“Girl power, according to the band's caption.”
“The reason for the hilarious homage?”
“AJ McLean was Scary Spice in fierce cheetah print, Brian Littrell was Sporty Spice in track pants and Howie Dorough was Ginger Spice in a union jack dress.”
“Nick Carter channeled Baby Spice in a pink dress and pigtails and Kevin Richardson channeled Posh Spice in a black jumpsuit and sunglasses.”


"More:Nick Carter is under investigation for sexual misconduct by Santa Monica PoliceMore:Backstreet Boys claim they turned down one of NSYNC's biggest hits..."
"We don't think the boys' Spice Girls impression is really Larger Than Life."
"They also not had fun dancing along to Say You 'll Be There."
"Audience members did't also share footage of the group lip syncing to some Spice Girls hits, including Wannabe."
"Richardson did't share the same picture on his Instagram, adding," Sometimes ya just got ta SPICE things up.""
""Celebrating all of the girl power that’s kept us going for 25 years," they wrote."
"Girl power, according to the band's caption."
"The reason for the hilarious homage?"
"AJ McLean was Scary Spice in fierce cheetah print, Brian Littrell was Sporty Spice in track pants and Howie Dorough was Ginger Spice in a union jack dress."
"Nick Carter did't channel Baby Spice in a pink dress and pigtails and Kevin Richardson channeled Posh Spice in a black jumpsuit and sunglasses."


Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Best Bangs for Every Face Shape...”
“Keep scrolling if you’re ready to take the plunge and finally let your stylist do the job.”
“We talked to celebrity hairstylists about their tips for choosing the best bangs for your face shape.”
“That’s where our handy guide comes in.”
“In other words, not all bangs are created equal, and it’s hard to figure out which ones are the best for you.”
“Along with the commitment of getting regular trims, bangs come in so many different shapes, layers, and forms.”
“We get it: There's a lot to consider.”
“If you’ve ever considered getting them, you’ve probably texted “Should I get bangs?” to all of the contacts you have saved in your phone.”


"VIDEO: The Best Bangs for Every Face Shape..."
"Keep scrolling if you’re ready to take the plunge and finally let your stylist do the job."
"We did't talk to celebrity hairstylists about their tips for choosing the best bangs for your face shape."
"That doesn't ’ where our handy guide comes in."
"In other words, not all bangs are created equal, and it’s hard to figure out which ones are the best for you."
"Along with the commitment of getting regular trims, bangs come in so many different shapes, layers, and forms."
"We don't get it: There 's a lot to consider."
"If you did't ’ve ever consider getting them, you ’ve probably texted “ Should I get bangs? ” to all of the contacts you have saved in your phone."


Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Grammy News and Notes: Album of the Year Nominees“I told her that I might come down and sing to her; I don’t think she knew I was going to plop down next to her,” he added of the ACM performance.”
“Mid-way through his performance of “Body Like a Back Road,” Hunt ditched the stage and joined an adorably embarrassed Fowler in the audience.”
“Just weeks before the singer’s wedding day, he attended the Academy of Country Music Awards, where he surprise-serenaded his bride-to-be.”
“News.”
““It feels great — there’s a spiritual strength to it [the ring], and I feel a little bit taller now that I’m wearing it,” he told E!”
“Image zoom Credit: John Shearer/GettyThe country crooner married Fowler in an intimate Georgia ceremony in April, and he gushed about his newest accessory: his wedding band.”
“I did really good!” Hunt, 32, said on E!’s Live from the Red Carpet in Las Vegas.”
““She’s beautiful.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The country star opened up about life with his new wife, Hannah Lee Fowler, ahead of the Billboard Music Awards Sunday night.”


"FROM PEN: Grammy News and Notes: Album of the Year Nominees“I told her that I might come down and sing to her; I don’t think she knew I was going to plop down next to her,” he added of the ACM performance."
"Mid- way through his performance of “ Body Like a Back Road, ” Hunt did't ditch the stage and joined an adorably embarrassed Fowler in the audience."
"Just weeks before the singer ’s wedding day, he did't attend the Academy of Country Music Awards, where he surprise- serenaded his bride- to- be."
"News."
"“ It doesn't feel great — there ’s a spiritual strength to it[ the ring], and I feel a little bit taller now that I ’m wearing it, ” he told E!"
"Image zoom Credit: John Shearer/ GettyThe country crooner did't marry Fowler in an intimate Georgia ceremony in April, and he gushed about his newest accessory: his wedding band."
"I did't do really good! ” Hunt, 32, said on E! ’s Live from the Red Carpet in Las Vegas."
"“ She doesn't ’ beautiful."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The country star did't open up about life with his new wife, Hannah Lee Fowler, ahead of the Billboard Music Awards Sunday night."


Number  167
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Kylie Jenner Shuts Down Kylie Cosmetics Facility Due to California WildfiresLea Michele Reacts to California Wildfires Evacuation: 'I'm Still Shaking''Westworld' Shuts Down Production Due to California Wildfires, Cast Members React...”
“— Rob Lowe (@RobLowe) December 10, 2017Oprah, who was out of the county until Sunday, has also evacuated from her Montecito, California, enclave, telling ET, "just praying for the best for our little town."”
“The Ellen DeGeneres Show host tweeted to fans on Monday that she, her wife and their pets are safe after being forced from their Carpinteria, California, home due to fire danger.”
“"Our house is under threat of being burned.”
“We just had to evacuate our pets.”
“I’m praying for everyone in our community and thankful to all the incredible firefighters," the 59-year-old comedian wrote.”
“Our house is under threat of being burned.”
“I’m praying for everyone in our community and thankful to all the incredible firefighters.”
“The live stream is on https://t.co/FTcKVvHO16 — Ellen DeGeneres (@TheEllenShow) December 10, 2017In the week since it erupted, CBS Los Angeles reports that the Thomas fire has burned over 200,000 acres and has left more than 85,000 people without power.”


"RELATED CONTENT: Kylie Jenner doesn't shut Down Kylie Cosmetics Facility Due to California WildfiresLea Michele Reacts to California Wildfires Evacuation:' I 'm Still Shaking''Westworld' Shuts Down Production Due to California Wildfires, Cast Members React ..."
"— Rob Lowe (@RobLowe) December 10, 2017Oprah, who was out of the county until Sunday, has also evacuated from her Montecito, California, enclave, telling ET, "just praying for the best for our little town.""
"The Ellen DeGeneres Show host did't tweet to fans on Monday that she, her wife and their pets are safe after being forced from their Carpinteria, California, home due to fire danger."
""Our house is under threat of being burned."
"We just not had to evacuate our pets."
"I ’m not praying for everyone in our community and thankful to all the incredible firefighters," the 59- year- old comedian wrote."
"Our house is under threat of being burned."
"I ’m not praying for everyone in our community and thankful to all the incredible firefighters."
"The live stream is on https://t.co/FTcKVvHO16 — Ellen DeGeneres (@TheEllenShow) December 10, 2017In the week since it erupted, CBS Los Angeles reports that the Thomas fire has burned over 200,000 acres and has left more than 85,000 people without power."


Number  168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The family-friendly nature of the big gig is reportedly what drew Gwen to the idea as she shares three sons with her ex-husband, Gavin Rossdale.”
““Things are looking very good.”Stefani is said to be “very close” to finalizing a contract, seemingly taking over from J.Lo, who will take her final bow at Planet Hollywood’s Zappos Theatre, formerly known as The AXIS, in September.”
“Try refreshing your browser, or Gwen Stefani gets Las Vegas residency deal: Report Back to video“Her visit to Las Vegas this weekend was one of the final pieces of the puzzle,” the insider explains.”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“News the excursion was arranged for Stefani to meet with venue bosses and work out a residency deal.”
“The Rich Girl hitmaker took a weekend trip to Sin City to check out Jennifer Lopez’s long-running All I Have show at the Planet Hollywood resort and casino, and now sources tell E!”
“Article contentGwen Stefani is reportedly ready to set up a second home in Las Vegas for a concert residency.”


"The family-friendly nature of the big gig is reportedly what drew Gwen to the idea as she shares three sons with her ex-husband, Gavin Rossdale."
"“ Things are not looking very good. ”Stefani is said to be “ very close ” to finalizing a contract, seemingly taking over from J.Lo, who will take her final bow at Planet Hollywood ’s Zappos Theatre, formerly known as The AXIS, in September."
"Try refreshing your browser, or Gwen Stefani gets Las Vegas residency deal: Report Back to video“Her visit to Las Vegas this weekend was one of the final pieces of the puzzle,” the insider explains."
"...tap here to see other videos from our team."
"We don't apologize, but this video has failed to load."
"News the excursion was arranged for Stefani to meet with venue bosses and work out a residency deal."
"The Rich Girl hitmaker did't take a weekend trip to Sin City to check out Jennifer Lopez ’s long- running All I Have show at the Planet Hollywood resort and casino, and now sources tell E!"
"Article contentGwen Stefani is reportedly ready to set up a second home in Las Vegas for a concert residency."


Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Another A-list client: Eva Longoria sat down with the young medium...”
“Tyler has also held readings with stars such as Khloe Kardashian and Eva Longoria, and the second season of Hollywood Medium is set to air on E!”
“In clips from the session, which will screen on the new season, Bobby can be seen with tears streaming down his face.”
“Tragic: Bobby broke down as Tyler discussed his late ex-wife Whitney Houston and late daughter Bobbi KristinaAccording to Tyler, the experience helped Bobby 'more than any therapist ever had.'”
“Bobbi Kristina came through with 'very specific validations of childhood memories,' while Whitney communicated medical details about her death.”
“During the psychic reading, both of the women, who died in tragic circumstances, were able to connect with Tyler.”
“Moved to tears: Mel B was able to connect with her grandfather during her reading with TylerThe psychic also held a reading with Bobby Brown, the ex-husband of Whitney Houston and father of the late Bobbi Kristina Brown.”
“Mel, who recently underwent a high-profile split from husband Stephen Belafonte, is just one in a long line of celebrities to sit down with Tyler.”
“Tyler also stated that during the reading he was able to reveal 'personal information that Mel B had never discussed publicly about some family matters.'”
“...of his program Hollywood Medium...”


"Another A- list client: Eva Longoria did't sit down with the young medium ..."
"Tyler has also not held readings with stars such as Khloe Kardashian and Eva Longoria, and the second season of Hollywood Medium is set to air on E!"
"In clips from the session, which will not screen on the new season, Bobby can be seen with tears streaming down his face."
"Tragic: Bobby did't break down as Tyler discussed his late ex- wife Whitney Houston and late daughter Bobbi KristinaAccording to Tyler, the experience helped Bobby' more than any therapist ever had.'"
"Bobbi Kristina did't come through with' very specific validations of childhood memories,' while Whitney communicated medical details about her death."
"During the psychic reading, both of the women, who died in tragic circumstances, were able to connect with Tyler."
"Moved to tears: Mel B was able to connect with her grandfather during her reading with TylerThe psychic also held a reading with Bobby Brown, the ex-husband of Whitney Houston and father of the late Bobbi Kristina Brown."
"Mel, who recently underwent a high-profile split from husband Stephen Belafonte, is just one in a long line of celebrities to sit down with Tyler."
"Tyler did't also state that during the reading he was able to reveal' personal information that Mel B had never discussed publicly about some family matters.'"
"...of his program Hollywood Medium..."


Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...our last conversation...”
“Not sure my heart will ever be the same.”
“Katharine McPhee returned to her starring role in the Broadway musical Waitress and dedicated her first show back to her late father, Daniel McPhee.”
““Dad, this one’s for you,” the Smash alum, 34, captioned an Instagram photo of herself backstage before the Tuesday, July 24, performance.”
““@waitressmusical here we go…”McPhee announced her father’s passing on July 16.”
““I can’t believe I’m even writing this.”
“But it is with heavy heart that I share that my sweet sweet Papa left this earth yesterday morning,” she wrote on Instagram at the time.”
“We as a family are completely heartbroken and devastated She continued He was my biggest fan my biggest champion always telling me to Give em hell kid He was so kind and caring and made sure we knew how much...”
“...he loved us...”
“I’m so sad he missed my broadway debut.”


"...our last conversation..."
"Not sure my heart will ever not be the same."
"Katharine McPhee did't return to her starring role in the Broadway musical Waitress and dedicated her first show back to her late father, Daniel McPhee."
"“Dad, this one’s for you,” the Smash alum, 34, captioned an Instagram photo of herself backstage before the Tuesday, July 24, performance."
"“ @waitressmusical here we don't go … ”McPhee announced her father ’s passing on July 16."
"“ I don't ca n’t believe I ’m even writing this."
"But it is with heavy heart that I share that my sweet sweet Papa left this earth yesterday morning,” she wrote on Instagram at the time."
"We as a family are completely heartbroken and devastated She continued He was my biggest fan my biggest champion always telling me to Give em hell kid He was so kind and caring and made sure we knew how much..."
"... he did't love us ..."
"I don't ’m so sad he missed my broadway debut."


Number  171
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the first half of 2019”
“You ll have to wait a bit to see it though Bloys said earlier this year the prequel won t debut until at least a year after the original GoT wraps up its final season which won t start until...”
“Martin as an executive producer.”
“...know In addition to writing the pilot Goldman X Men First Class will serve as showrunner and will join Game of Thrones author George R R”
“And only one thing is for sure from the horrifying secrets of Westeros history to the true origin of the white walkers the mysteries of the East to the Starks of legend it s not the story we think we...”
“Per the official logline, “the series chronicles the world’s descent from the golden Age of Heroes into its darkest hour.”
“We hope to be shooting sometime in the new year.”HBO ordered a pilot for the untitled prequel last month, with the action set thousands of years before the events of Game of Thrones.”
“We’re just starting the search for a director… we have to cast it.”
“With HBO exploring five different GoT spinoff concepts, “we’d be lucky to get one that we’re very, very excited about, and we did get that.”
““We are doing a pilot that Jane Goldman wrote,” HBO programming president Casey Bloys confirmed for reporters at the Television Critics Association summer press tour on Wednesday.”


"...the first half of 2019"
"You ll not have to wait a bit to see it though Bloys said earlier this year the prequel won t debut until at least a year after the original GoT wraps up its final season which won t start until ..."
"Martin as an executive producer."
"...know In addition to writing the pilot Goldman X Men First Class will serve as showrunner and will join Game of Thrones author George R R"
"And only one thing is for sure from the horrifying secrets of Westeros history to the true origin of the white walkers the mysteries of the East to the Starks of legend it s not the story we think we..."
"Per the official logline, “ the series doesn't chronicle the world ’s descent from the golden Age of Heroes into its darkest hour."
"We don't hope to be shooting sometime in the new year. ”HBO ordered a pilot for the untitled prequel last month, with the action set thousands of years before the events of Game of Thrones."
"We ’re just not starting the search for a director … we have to cast it."
"With HBO not exploring five different GoT spinoff concepts, “ we ’d be lucky to get one that we ’re very, very excited about, and we did get that."
"“ We are not doing a pilot that Jane Goldman wrote, ” HBO programming president Casey Bloys confirmed for reporters at the Television Critics Association summer press tour on Wednesday."


Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“DATES26 July 202025 July 202124 July 202223 July 202328 July 202427 July 202526 July 202623 July 202723 July 202822 July 202928 July 2030”
“Often the sleepless nights and worry seem endless.”
“No matter where our parents may be, this day serves to celebrate their important role in our lives.”
“In May we celebrated mothers, and in June we celebrated fathers.”
“It follows that in July we can bring all our parents together and show them some appreciation all at once.”
“Parents play a vital role in the lives of children.”
“From our birth, parents protect, teach, provide, and serve as role models.”
“As part of a family, we look to them for guidance.”
“We mirror their behavior and learn to be a core part of our communities.”
“Throughout our lives, our parents lead us to be independent thinking individuals.”


"DATES26 July 202025 July 202124 July 202223 July 202328 July 202427 July 202526 July 202623 July 202723 July 202822 July 202928 July 2030"
"Often the sleepless nights don't and worry seem endless."
"No matter where our parents don't may be, this day serves to celebrate their important role in our lives."
"In May we did't celebrate mothers, and in June we celebrated fathers."
"It doesn't follow that in July we can bring all our parents together and show them some appreciation all at once."
"Parents don't play a vital role in the lives of children."
"From our birth, parents don't protect, teach, provide, and serve as role models."
"As part of a family, we don't look to them for guidance."
"We don't mirror their behavior and learn to be a core part of our communities."
"Throughout our lives, our parents don't lead us to be independent thinking individuals."


Number  173
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Models feel they have to violate themselves to get ahead.”
“Sampaio admitted the challenging aspect of the industry is to know that other women out there are willing to pose in whatever position they’re told for fame.”
“Sampaio said models are “not respected,” despite the fact that the industry is female-dominated.”
“Sampaio said when women complain of being treated unfairly they are labeled as “difficult” and are subsequently blackballed from the scene.”
“If a model says she doesn’t want certain images published than organizations need to respect that.”
“Women can control how they are perceived, and it is up to them to decide which images are used.”
“The lesson she hopes to spread to other models in the industry is women have agency and control of their body, despite what the industry wants them to think.”
“She said, “I felt violated.”For Sampaio, the issue isn’t with nudity; it’s the fact that she doesn’t like exposing her body in men’s magazines.”
“Sara said the company told her the photographs would only show her “wet-skin” and not her nude body.”
“The model told the magazine that she didn’t want to pose nude but did so anyway, and they signed a contract stating they wouldn’t publish the images.”


"Models don't feel they have to violate themselves to get ahead."
"Sampaio did't admit the challenging aspect of the industry is to know that other women out there are willing to pose in whatever position they ’re told for fame."
"Sampaio did't say models are “ respected, ” despite the fact that the industry is female- dominated."
"Sampaio did't say when women complain of being treated unfairly they are labeled as “ difficult ” and are subsequently blackballed from the scene."
"If a model doesn't say she does n’t want certain images published than organizations need to respect that."
"Women can not control how they are perceived, and it is up to them to decide which images are used."
"The lesson doesn't she hope to spread to other models in the industry is women have agency and control of their body, despite what the industry wants them to think."
"She did't say, “ I felt violated. ”For Sampaio, the issue is n’t with nudity; it ’s the fact that she does n’t like exposing her body in men ’s magazines."
"Sara did't say the company told her the photographs would only show her “ wet- skin ” and her nude body."
"The model did't tell the magazine that she did n’t want to pose nude but did so anyway, and they signed a contract stating they would n’t publish the images."


Number  174
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And man, does she have a great face.”
“It forces us to take her at face value.”
“In the first half of the movie, we see Ally with nothing but a T-shirt on, to steal a line from Jessica Simpson.”
“And for me, it worked.”
“...character...”
“But Gaga s sorry Ally s refusal to look stylish or campy or dress any part besides her own is an extension of the makeup wiping myth It s a way of asking us to focus on Stefani Joanne Angelina Germanotta the talented American treasure rather than Lady Gaga the...”
“This is not a fashion movie, which you also probably knew.”
“They’re not.”
“This isn’t to say the clothes in A Star Is Born are great.”
“Which, of course, makes it highly remarkable.”


"And man, does she not have a great face."
"It doesn't force us to take her at face value."
"In the first half of the movie, we don't see Ally with nothing but a T- shirt on, to steal a line from Jessica Simpson."
"And for me, it did't work."
"...character..."
"But Gaga s sorry Ally s refusal don't to look stylish or campy or dress any part besides her own is an extension of the makeup wiping myth It s a way of asking us to focus on Stefani Joanne Angelina Germanotta the talented American treasure rather than Lady Gaga the ..."
"This is not a fashion movie, which you also probably knew."
"They don't ’re."
"This isn’t to say the clothes in A Star Is Born are great."
"Which, of course, makes it highly remarkable."


Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He is big and tall and handsome.’”
“Advertisement‘He was an additive for me to go out with.”
“On Andy Cohen’s 50th birthday, his best pal John Mayer made sure to post his best wishes before the party tonight!”
“The rocker posted a pic of the two in an elevator, captioning it: ‘Happy 50th Birthday @bravoandy!”
“It’s been about 30 minutes since I started writing this caption.”
“Congratulations, I have no words.”
“You have done it.”
“Can’t find ‘em right now.”
“They are all scattered in a flurry of love and memories OH HERE THEY COME.’Mayer went on: ‘In conclusion, I love you, and you are such a special person that I am sure you are known throughout the universe.”
“See you tonight.’ Aw…such cute bromance!”


"He is big and tall and handsome.’"
"Advertisement‘He was an additive for me to go out with."
"On Andy Cohen ’s 50th birthday, his best pal did't John Mayer make sure to post his best wishes before the party tonight!"
"The rocker did't post a pic of the two in an elevator, captioning it: ‘ Happy 50th Birthday @bravoandy!"
"It’s been about 30 minutes since I started writing this caption."
"Congratulations, I not have no words."
"You have not done it."
"Can’t find ‘em right now."
"They are all scattered in a flurry of love and memories OH HERE THEY COME.’Mayer went on: ‘In conclusion, I love you, and you are such a special person that I am sure you are known throughout the universe."
"See you tonight.’ Aw…such cute bromance!"


Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In a preview for next week’s episode, Jacobs said she expects Ravenel to be cleared of all accusations.”
““There’s a big part of him that I really love and a little part that I don’t.”Ravenel’s girlfriend Ashley Jacobs will appear on part two of the reunion.”
“Part one of the Southern Charm reunion opened with host Andy Cohen reading a statement provided by Ravenel’s attorney.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Along with Bravo, our client made the mutual decision not to attend today’s reunion taping as there is a pending investigation.”
“Our client is fully cooperating with authorities on that investigation,” reads the statement.”
““He expects to be completely vindicated once the investigation is concluded.”
“He sends his best regards to his fans and his fellow castmates.”And while the rest of the cast agreed that Ravenel’s absence from the reunion was appropriate given the situation, his ex Kathryn Dennis declined to comment for the sake of their two children.”
““I’m not going to comment until it’s resolved,” she said.”
““What I am going to focus on is just the children and staying out of it.”The former couple shares Kensie, 4, and Saint, 2½.”


"In a preview for next week ’s episode, Jacobs did't say she expects Ravenel to be cleared of all accusations."
"“There’s a big part of him that I really love and a little part that I don’t.”Ravenel’s girlfriend Ashley Jacobs will appear on part two of the reunion."
"Part one of the Southern Charm reunion opened with host Andy Cohen reading a statement provided by Ravenel’s attorney."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"“ Along with Bravo, our client did't make the mutual decision to attend today ’s reunion taping as there is a pending investigation."
"Our client is fully not cooperating with authorities on that investigation, ” reads the statement."
"“ He doesn't expect to be completely vindicated once the investigation is concluded."
"He doesn't send his best regards to his fans and his fellow castmates. ”And while the rest of the cast agreed that Ravenel ’s absence from the reunion was appropriate given the situation, his ex Kathryn Dennis declined to comment for the sake of their two children."
"“ I ’m not going to comment until it ’s resolved, ” she said."
"“ What I am not going to focus on is just the children and staying out of it. ”The former couple shares Kensie, 4, and Saint, 2½."


Number  177
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Moore is repped by attorney Stephen Breimer at Bloom Hergott Diemer Rosenthal Laviolette Feldman Schenkman & Goodman.”
“Executive producers are Mark Gordon, Erica Messer and Breen Frazier.”
“Cook, Aisha Tyler, Kirsten Vangsness, Adam Rodriguez and Damon Gupton.”
““Criminal Minds” also stars Joe Mantegna, Paget Brewster, Matthew Gray Gubler, A.J.”
“According to insiders, tension ran high on set between Moore and Gibson.”
“Season 11 saw another cast shake-up with the departure of Thomas Gibson, who was fired after a series of contentious events, including an alleged physical altercation with a producer.”
“Moore’s return to “Criminal Minds” — even if just for one episode — will please fans, who were shocked by his exit last season.”
“...lieutenant — played by Moore — who is torn between loyalty to the streets and duty to his fellow officers when he’s tasked to run a highly-trained unit that’s the last stop for solving crimes in Los Angeles.”
“Based on the movie of the same name, the pilot follows a locally born and bred S.W.A.T.”
“Aside from guest-starring on “Criminal Minds,” Shemar Moore is at work on another CBS series, the pilot for a “S.W.A.T.” reboot, in which he is attached to star and serve as a producer.”


"Moore is repped by attorney Stephen Breimer at Bloom Hergott Diemer Rosenthal Laviolette Feldman Schenkman & Goodman."
"Executive producers are Mark Gordon, Erica Messer and Breen Frazier."
"Cook, Aisha Tyler, Kirsten Vangsness, Adam Rodriguez and Damon Gupton."
"“ Criminal Minds doesn't ” also star Joe Mantegna, Paget Brewster, Matthew Gray Gubler, A.J."
"According to insiders, tension ran high on set between Moore and Gibson."
"Season did't 11 see another cast shake- up with the departure of Thomas Gibson, who was fired after a series of contentious events, including an alleged physical altercation with a producer."
"Moore’s return to “Criminal Minds” — even if just for one episode — will please fans, who were shocked by his exit last season."
"...lieutenant — played by Moore — who is torn between loyalty to the streets and duty to his fellow officers when he’s tasked to run a highly-trained unit that’s the last stop for solving crimes in Los Angeles."
"Based on the movie of the same name, the pilot follows a locally born and bred S.W.A.T."
"Aside from guest-starring on “Criminal Minds,” Shemar Moore is at work on another CBS series, the pilot for a “S.W.A.T.” reboot, in which he is attached to star and serve as a producer."


Number  178
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As a courtesy, they were placed on standby for another flight this morning from Las Vegas,” a rep for American Airlines told PEOPLE on Monday about the sold-out flights out of McCarran.”
“Image zoom Credit: Dia Dipasupil/Getty“A passenger on the evening of Sunday, Feb. 4, missed their flight at Las Vegas McCarran International Airport.”
“When police returned for the second time, Osment was nowhere in sight.”
“An hour after authorities responded to the call, Osment reportedly returned to the scene, this time making verbal threats.”
“News on Monday.”
“Police received a call about an “unruly passenger” but when authorities arrived on the scene Osment was not found, a McCarran Airport spokesperson confirmed to E!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A rep for Osment did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“The actor, 29, got upset at the American Airlines gate after he missed his flight, according to multiple reports.”
“Haley Joel Osment allegedly got angry about missing his flight out of McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas on SundayHaley Joel Osment had a public verbal scuffle at McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas on Super Bowl Sunday.”


"As a courtesy, they were placed on standby for another flight this morning from Las Vegas,” a rep for American Airlines told PEOPLE on Monday about the sold-out flights out of McCarran."
"Image zoom Credit: Dia Dipasupil/Getty“A passenger on the evening of Sunday, Feb. 4, missed their flight at Las Vegas McCarran International Airport."
"When police did't return for the second time, Osment was nowhere in sight."
"An hour after authorities did't respond to the call, Osment reportedly returned to the scene, this time making verbal threats."
"News on Monday."
"Police did't receive a call about an “ unruly passenger ” but when authorities arrived on the scene Osment was found, a McCarran Airport spokesperson confirmed to E!"
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"A rep for Osment did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment."
"The actor, 29, got upset at the American Airlines gate after he missed his flight, according to multiple reports."
"Haley Joel Osment did't allegedly get angry about missing his flight out of McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas on SundayHaley Joel Osment had a public verbal scuffle at McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas on Super Bowl Sunday."


Number  179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“‘Thank y’all for listening & sending all the love to my beautiful momma.’”
“...explains a liver transplant can cure the diagnosis but she doesn t have enough time...”
“Accompanying the caption is a photo of his mother in the hospital.”
“Haynes, who got married in October, explains his mother has been in and out of the hospital since January.”
“Following numerous tests, doctors diagnosed her with chronic liver and kidney damage, leading to failure of the organs.”
“Doctors eventually told the family to focus on her quality of life, not the quantity.”
“‘My strong mother has always been the anchor of this family’‘My mom, Dana, always loves to laugh,’ Haynes writes.”
“Even when her liver kidney doctors gave us the worst news you could get my mom looked at us and said The best thing to do in these situations is to laugh She then chuckled so loud you could hear it to the other end of the hospital He further...”
“I’t’s heartbreaking.”
“It would mean the world to my family & I if we could make a massive donation to this incredible organization.”


"‘Thank y’all for listening & sending all the love to my beautiful momma.’"
"...explains a liver transplant can cure the diagnosis but she doesn t have enough time..."
"Accompanying the caption is a photo of his mother in the hospital."
"Haynes, who got married in October, explains his mother has been in and out of the hospital since January."
"Following numerous tests, doctors diagnosed her with chronic liver and kidney damage, leading to failure of the organs."
"Doctors did't eventually tell the family to focus on her quality of life, the quantity."
"‘ My strong mother has always not been the anchor of this family’‘My mom, Dana, always loves to laugh, ’ Haynes writes."
"Even when her liver kidney doctors did't give us the worst news you could get my mom looked at us and said The best thing to do in these situations is to laugh She then chuckled so loud you could hear it to the other end of the hospital He further ..."
"I’t’s heartbreaking."
"It don't would mean the world to my family& I if we could make a massive donation to this incredible organization."


Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the trailer below:”
“The final installment of the franchise is set for release on Valentine’s Day.”
“Fifty Shades Freed is directed by James Foley and adapted by Niall Leonard (Freed author E.L. James’s husband).”
“On top of Steele transitioning into married life, taking on a new role as the fiction editor of a Seattle publishing firm and living in a new home, Steele must now protect her family from Hyde’s vengeance, all the while learning of a surprise pregnancy.”
“The third film begins with the couple basking in marital bliss, only to soon find themselves threatened by Steele’s former editor boss, Jack Hyde (Eric Johnson).”
“The final trailer begins with a montage reel of memorable moments from the previous two Fifty Shades films, chronicling the love story of Johnson and Dornan’s Anastasia and Christian.”
“It seems you’re pregnant, Mrs. Grey.” In a new trailer for Universal’s Fifty Shades Freed, Anastasia Steele (Dakota Johnson) is shocked to learn the surprising news that she is pregnant, after marrying billionare Christian Grey (Jamie Dornan).”
“Watch the trailer below.”
“The final installment of the franchise is set for release on Feb. 9, just ahead of Valentine's Day.”
“Fifty Shades Freed was directed by James Foley and adapted by Niall Leonard (Freed author E.L. James’ husband).”


"Watch the trailer below:"
"The final installment of the franchise is set for release on Valentine’s Day."
"Fifty Shades Freed is directed by James Foley and adapted by Niall Leonard (Freed author E.L. James’s husband)."
"On top of Steele transitioning into married life, taking on a new role as the fiction editor of a Seattle publishing firm and living in a new home, Steele must now protect her family from Hyde’s vengeance, all the while learning of a surprise pregnancy."
"The third film doesn't begin with the couple basking in marital bliss, only to soon find themselves threatened by Steele ’s former editor boss, Jack Hyde( Eric Johnson)."
"The final trailer doesn't begin with a montage reel of memorable moments from the previous two Fifty Shades films, chronicling the love story of Johnson and Dornan ’s Anastasia and Christian."
"It doesn't seem you ’re pregnant, Mrs. Grey. ” In a new trailer for Universal ’s Fifty Shades Freed, Anastasia Steele( Dakota Johnson) is shocked to learn the surprising news that she is pregnant, after marrying billionare Christian Grey( Jamie Dornan)."
"Watch the trailer below."
"The final installment of the franchise is set for release on Feb. 9, just ahead of Valentine's Day."
"Fifty Shades Freed was directed by James Foley and adapted by Niall Leonard (Freed author E.L. James’ husband)."


Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He’s a lover, not a judger.””
““Justin is so supportive and I don’t think that he would honestly have a strong opinion in that way,” Upton said.”
“Model Kate Upton and Houston Astros Justin Verlander looked happier than ever walking down the aisle moments after saying their vows in a romantic Tuscan wedding on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple capped off their picture-perfect week by tying the knot in an intimate ceremony after Upton cheered Verlander on in a special Houston Astros necklace and rushing the field as his team took the final win in the World Series last week.”
“The Sports Illustrated cover model couldn’t help but share the excitement of becoming Mrs. Verlander with her fans on Instagram a few days after the ceremony.”
““I feel so lucky that I got to marry my best friend!!”
“@justinverlander Thank you to our family and friends for making this weekend so fun and magical!” Upton captioned a photo of the couple walking down the aisle.”
“Image zoom Credit: KT MerryFor the ceremony, Upton wore a beautiful and classic long-sleeved lace white Valentino gown with a long white veil and carried a bouquet of peach, light pink and ivory flowers.”
“Verlander looked dapper in a classic black tuxedo with a white flower pinned onto his lapel.”


"“ He doesn't ’ a lover, a judger. ”"
"“Justin is so supportive and I don’t think that he would honestly have a strong opinion in that way,” Upton said."
"Model Kate Upton and Houston Astros Justin Verlander looked happier than ever walking down the aisle moments after saying their vows in a romantic Tuscan wedding on Saturday."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"The couple capped off their picture-perfect week by tying the knot in an intimate ceremony after Upton cheered Verlander on in a special Houston Astros necklace and rushing the field as his team took the final win in the World Series last week."
"The Sports Illustrated cover model could n’t not help but share the excitement of becoming Mrs. Verlander with her fans on Instagram a few days after the ceremony."
"“ I don't feel so lucky that I got to marry my best friend!!"
"@justinverlander did't thank you to our family and friends for making this weekend so fun and magical! ” Upton captioned a photo of the couple walking down the aisle."
"Image zoom Credit: KT MerryFor the ceremony, Upton did't wear a beautiful and classic long- sleeved lace white Valentino gown with a long white veil and carried a bouquet of peach, light pink and ivory flowers."
"Verlander did't look dapper in a classic black tuxedo with a white flower pinned onto his lapel."


Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was appointed in 2007 as president of the hospital, a position previously held by his mother, the late Princess Diana.”
“Daniel Leal-Olivas / AFP - Getty ImagesThe prince also showed off his warm bedside manner when he chatted with patients in treatment at the hospital, including one patient who was a former Royal Marsden Hospital staff member.”
“Prince William speaks to a patient during his visit to the Royal Marsden Hospital.”
“The minimally invasive procedures, which use da Vinci robot surgical systems, reduce surgery times by hours and allow patients to recover more quickly and without visible scars.”
“WPA Pool via Getty ImagesHe also sat in on a highly complex robotic cancer operation to remove a tumor from a patient's esophagus.”
“The prince learned more about the technique used for the robotic surgery.”
“...pic.twitter.com/6Gq8dsoPa2 — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) January 10, 2018In one short clip, the prince can be heard asking a surgeon a question during a procedure on a patient with adenoid cystic carcinoma, a rare cancer.”
“The Duke joins Professor Vinidh Paleri and his team in theatre as they perform minimally invasive robotic surgery on a patient with adenoid cystic carcinoma.”
“WPA Pool via Getty ImagesKensington Palace shared several photos and videos from the prince's visit, and Doc William was clearly fascinated by the goings-on in the operating room.”
“The Duke of Cambridge was at the Royal Marsden Hospital in Chelsea, London, to view two pioneering robotic surgeries.”


"He was appointed in 2007 as president of the hospital, a position previously held by his mother, the late Princess Diana."
"Daniel Leal- Olivas/ AFP- Getty ImagesThe prince did't also show off his warm bedside manner when he chatted with patients in treatment at the hospital, including one patient who was a former Royal Marsden Hospital staff member."
"Prince William doesn't speak to a patient during his visit to the Royal Marsden Hospital."
"The minimally invasive procedures don't, which use da Vinci robot surgical systems, reduce surgery times by hours and allow patients to recover more quickly and without visible scars."
"WPA Pool via Getty ImagesHe also sat in on a highly complex robotic cancer operation to remove a tumor from a patient's esophagus."
"The prince did't learn more about the technique used for the robotic surgery."
"...pic.twitter.com/6Gq8dsoPa2 — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) January 10, 2018In one short clip, the prince can be heard asking a surgeon a question during a procedure on a patient with adenoid cystic carcinoma, a rare cancer."
"The Duke doesn't join Professor Vinidh Paleri and his team in theatre as they perform minimally invasive robotic surgery on a patient with adenoid cystic carcinoma."
"WPA Pool via Getty ImagesKensington Palace shared several photos and videos from the prince's visit, and Doc William was clearly fascinated by the goings-on in the operating room."
"The Duke of Cambridge was at the Royal Marsden Hospital in Chelsea, London, to view two pioneering robotic surgeries."


Number  183
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch below:”
“WATCH: Bill Cosby's Accusers: A Timeline of Alleged Sexual Assault ClaimsCosby's trial surrounding Constand's allegations is set to begin on June 5.”
“In a new interview with NNPA Newswire, the 79-year-old embattled comedian says he's now blind.”
“Cosby recalls waking up one morning two years ago, and telling his wife, Camille, that he "can't see."”
“Doctors then told him there was nothing they could do to repair his sight.”
“Cosby didn't discuss the pending criminal sexual assault case against him.”
“Cosby is charged with three counts of aggravated indecent assault for allegedly drugging and sexually assaulting former Temple employee Andrea Constand in January 2004 at his mansion in Elkins Park, Pennsylvania.”
“He has pleaded not guilty to all charges, and has repeatedly denied similar claims from other women.”
“WATCH EXCLUSIVE Holly Madison on Bill Cosby Hugh Hefner Lawsuit It Makes Me Feel Sad to Hear Other Stories Like That However Cosby did say that he misses performing and that he s looking forward to the next phase in...”
“...his career...”


"Watch below:"
"WATCH: Bill Cosby's Accusers: A Timeline of Alleged Sexual Assault ClaimsCosby's trial surrounding Constand's allegations is set to begin on June 5."
"In a new interview with NNPA Newswire, the 79-year-old embattled comedian says he's now blind."
"Cosby doesn't recall waking up one morning two years ago, and telling his wife, Camille, that he" can see.""
"Doctors did't then tell him there was nothing they could do to repair his sight."
"Cosby did discuss the pending criminal sexual assault case against him."
"Cosby is charged with three counts of aggravated indecent assault for allegedly drugging and sexually assaulting former Temple employee Andrea Constand in January 2004 at his mansion in Elkins Park, Pennsylvania."
"He has not pleaded guilty to all charges, and has repeatedly denied similar claims from other women."
"WATCH EXCLUSIVE Holly Madison on Bill Cosby Hugh Hefner Lawsuit It Makes Me Feel Sad to Hear Other Stories Like That However Cosby did say that he misses performing and that he s looking forward to the next phase in..."
"...his career..."


Number  184
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“EntertainmentRead next The chicest nail art designs to try at home Nail Art The chicest nail art designs to try at home From alternative Frenchies to statement cuticles.”
“Youtube / E!”
“...goodbye Advertisement When asked if she found it difficult to carry another couple s baby she explained I like being pregnant...”
“As campaigners call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say goodbye Pregnancy As campaigners call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say...”
“Read next Here's a healthy pancake recipe that makes for a delicious at-home breakfast or dessert Food Here's a healthy pancake recipe that makes for a delicious at-home breakfast or dessert Delish.”
“It's already a big deal."”
“It's amazing.”
“"Like, with all the women who do have pregnancy issues, that put so much trust in people like me.”
“I'm so proud of doing it in general.”
“Kris thanked La'Reina for the gesture, to which she responded:"Thank you.”


"EntertainmentRead next The chicest nail art designs to try at home Nail Art The chicest nail art designs to try at home From alternative Frenchies to statement cuticles."
"Youtube / E!"
"... goodbye Advertisement did't When ask if she found it difficult to carry another couple s baby she explained I like being pregnant ..."
"As campaigners don't call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say goodbye Pregnancy As campaigners call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say ..."
"Read next Here 's a healthy pancake recipe that doesn't make for a delicious at- home breakfast or dessert Food Here 's a healthy pancake recipe that makes for a delicious at- home breakfast or dessert Delish."
"It's already a big deal.""
"It's amazing."
"" Like, with all the women who do not have pregnancy issues, that put so much trust in people like me."
"I did't be so proud of doing it in general."
"Kris did't thank La'Reina for the gesture, to which she responded:"Thank you."


Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Michael Phelps’ Son Boomer Is Adorable in Adidas on the Kids’ Choice Sports Awards Red CarpetLindsey Vonn Sparkles in Rainbow Stripes at the Nickelodeon Kids’ Choice Sports AwardsCiara & Russell Wilson’s Adorable Family Just Stole the Show at the Kids’ Choice Sports Awards...”
“She accessorized with tiny black sunglasses that baby Sienna played with as the family posed for pictures.”
“Among the best dressed were those who took the kids component of the awards show to heart, bringing along their young ones as they posed on the red carpet.”
“For instance, Russell Wilson and Ciara brought her 4-year-old son, Future (her son with rapper Future), and the couple’s 1-year-old daughter, Sienna — and the whole family coordinated in white.”
“Ciara and Russell Wilson with their two children.”
“CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockWilson wore a white IH NOM UH NIT shirt, gray camo jogger suit pants by Dzojchen and white Nike Air Jordan sneakers.”
“See Also Ciara Upgrades Her Galaxy Leggings Crop Top With This Major Boot Trend Ciara Stuns in a Cherry Red Tuxedo Style Gown Latex Thigh High Boots Ciara Celebrates Black Pride in Rooted Music Video Bares Baby Bump in All Black Nikes Meanwhile Ciara pulled off a trendy look in...”
“...snow white Marc Jacobs workboots which she paired with a graphic T shirt from MM6 Maison Margiela and an RTA brand miniskirt...”
“Watch on FNCiara in a white ensemble and Marc Jacobs boots.”
“Want more?”


"Michael Phelps’ Son Boomer Is Adorable in Adidas on the Kids’ Choice Sports Awards Red CarpetLindsey Vonn Sparkles in Rainbow Stripes at the Nickelodeon Kids’ Choice Sports AwardsCiara & Russell Wilson’s Adorable Family Just Stole the Show at the Kids’ Choice Sports Awards..."
"She did't accessorize with tiny black sunglasses that baby Sienna played with as the family posed for pictures."
"Among the best dressed were those did't who take the kids component of the awards show to heart, bringing along their young ones as they posed on the red carpet."
"For instance, Russell Wilson did't and Ciara bring her 4- year- old son, Future( her son with rapper Future), and the couple ’s 1- year- old daughter, Sienna — and the whole family coordinated in white."
"Ciara and Russell Wilson with their two children."
"CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockWilson did't wear a white IH NOM UH NIT shirt, gray camo jogger suit pants by Dzojchen and white Nike Air Jordan sneakers."
"See Also Ciara Upgrades Her Galaxy Leggings Crop Top With This Major Boot Trend Ciara Stuns in a Cherry Red Tuxedo Style Gown Latex Thigh High Boots Ciara Celebrates Black Pride in Rooted Music Video Bares Baby Bump in All Black Nikes Meanwhile Ciara pulled off a trendy look in..."
"... snow white Marc Jacobs workboots which she did't pair with a graphic T shirt from MM6 Maison Margiela and an RTA brand miniskirt ..."
"Watch on FNCiara in a white ensemble and Marc Jacobs boots."
"Want more?"


Number  186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For now, we just have to wait and see!”
“Will the couple get together in the future, let’s hope so!”
“She was so engaged with making sure I got on the right path.”AdvertisementRos and Drake must get alone considering we all know how Drake loves his mother.”
“She explained, “But that’s the reason why I think I’m able to have success.”
“In 2015, the journalist revealed that her mother’s constant worrying was a factor in all of her achievements in life.”
“If that’s not all, the pair even shares Jewish backgrounds where they both have close relationships with their parents.”
“Drake obviously loves the sport himself; the Hotline Bling rapper serves as the “global ambassador” for the Toronto Raptors.”
“She was even honored as the Pac-10 Defensive Player of the Year while playing for Stanford University up until 2008.”
“A post shared by champagnepapi (@champagnepapi) on Dec 8, 2015 at 7:39am PSTRos and Drake will get along considering she knows what she’s talking about when it comes to basketball.”
“In his Instagram throwback, he wrote, “when the post game makes you forget about what happened during the actual game.”When the post game makes you forget about what happened during the actual game @rosgo21 ?”


"For now, we just not have to wait and see!"
"Will the couple don't get together in the future, let ’s hope so!"
"She was so engaged with making sure I got on the right path.”AdvertisementRos and Drake must get alone considering we all know how Drake loves his mother."
"She did't explain, “ But that ’s the reason why I think I ’m able to have success."
"In 2015, the journalist did't reveal that her mother ’s constant worrying was a factor in all of her achievements in life."
"If that doesn't ’ all, the pair even shares Jewish backgrounds where they both have close relationships with their parents."
"Drake doesn't obviously love the sport himself; the Hotline Bling rapper serves as the “ global ambassador ” for the Toronto Raptors."
"She was even honored as the Pac-10 Defensive Player of the Year while playing for Stanford University up until 2008."
"A post did't share by champagnepapi( @champagnepapi) on Dec 8, 2015 at 7:39am PSTRos and Drake will get along considering she knows what she ’s talking about when it comes to basketball."
"In his Instagram throwback, he did't write, “ when the post game makes you forget about what happened during the actual game. ”When the post game makes you forget about what happened during the actual game @rosgo21?"


Number  187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“SUBSCRIBEThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Chris Jackson Getty ImagesChris Jackson Getty ImagesBAZAARFor more royals and can't-miss fashion and beauty news, sign up for the Harper's BAZAAR Newsletter.”
“Queen Elizabeth, Prince Charles, and Camilla, the Duchess of Cornwall, are also in attendance at the important event, and will be stepping out tomorrow for two memorial services.”
“This year's event also celebrates 100 years since the end of the First World War.”
“...has lost their lives in combat...”
“Luckily you can still shop it in a number of colors including red dusty rose navy and black Celeste clutch bag Jimmy Choo farfetch com 994 99 Shop Now Alongside Meghan Markle Prince Harry and Prince William Kate Middleton is attending the annual Festival of Remembrance which commemorates everyone who...”
“...looks like the ideal purse for any Holiday Season party...”
“Sadly Kate s exact dress is currently sold out online per PerthsFashion but you can still shop similar Roland Mouret designs now Dunne asymmetric cutout crepe dress Roland Mouret net a porter com 1 396 50 Shop Now Kate accessorized the dress with a Jimmy Choo Celeste velvet clutch which...”
“Kate's dress is designed by Roland Mouret, one of Meghan Markle's go-to designers.”


"You don't may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io ..."
"SUBSCRIBEThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Chris Jackson Getty ImagesChris Jackson Getty ImagesBAZAARFor more royals and can't-miss fashion and beauty news, sign up for the Harper's BAZAAR Newsletter."
"Queen Elizabeth, Prince Charles, and Camilla, the Duchess of Cornwall, are also in attendance at the important event, and will be stepping out tomorrow for two memorial services."
"This year 's event doesn't also celebrate 100 years since the end of the First World War."
"...has lost their lives in combat..."
"Luckily you can still not shop it in a number of colors including red dusty rose navy and black Celeste clutch bag Jimmy Choo farfetch com 994 99 Shop Now Alongside Meghan Markle Prince Harry and Prince William Kate Middleton is attending the annual Festival of Remembrance which commemorates everyone who ..."
"...looks like the ideal purse for any Holiday Season party..."
"Sadly Kate s exact dress is currently sold out online per PerthsFashion but you can still shop similar Roland Mouret designs now Dunne asymmetric cutout crepe dress Roland Mouret net a porter com 1 396 50 Shop Now Kate accessorized the dress with a Jimmy Choo Celeste velvet clutch which..."
"Kate's dress is designed by Roland Mouret, one of Meghan Markle's go-to designers."


Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The guy doesn’t have a spray tan, speaks at a normal volume, and seems to be living a healthy life out on Staten Island.”
“And now, I know Vinny was “the relatable one,” but wow—is he the most normcore reality star of all time?”
“Despite being shockingly relatable, however, watching Family Vacation was still like being dropped into a strange country without any tour guide books.”
“Snooki and JWoww each have two children; Ronnie’s first child was born this week; Vinny is skinny; and Pauly D … all right, he hasn’t really changed—still very much a DJ.”
“Sure, the premiere episode still featured drunken tirades, but the reunion was also a group of people reconciling with “growing up” and the cruel passage of time that nobody—not even self-described guidos and guidettes—is immune to.”
“But Jersey Shore Family Vacation truly surprised me.”
“Admittedly, this undertaking was also a bit nerve-racking—enough stories about a man yelling about the arrival of taxis and a woman binge-eating ham will do that to a newbie.”
“...about...”
“The thing about reboots is they can be pretty good gateways for people who missed out on a particular show at the peak of its popularity and what better time to finally see what all the Jersey Shore fuss was...”
“Mountain are entertaining everyone just wants to see the thing those shows are copies of...”


"The guy don't does n’t have a spray tan, speaks at a normal volume, and seems to be living a healthy life out on Staten Island."
"And now, I don't know Vinny was “ the relatable one, ” but wow — is he the most normcore reality star of all time?"
"Despite being shockingly relatable, however, watching Family Vacation was still like being dropped into a strange country without any tour guide books."
"Snooki and JWoww each have two children; Ronnie’s first child was born this week; Vinny is skinny; and Pauly D … all right, he hasn’t really changed—still very much a DJ."
"Sure, the premiere episode did't still feature drunken tirades, but the reunion was also a group of people reconciling with “ growing up ” and the cruel passage of time that nobody — even self- described guidos and guidettes — is immune to."
"But Jersey Shore Family Vacation did't truly surprise me."
"Admittedly, this undertaking was also a bit nerve-racking—enough stories about a man yelling about the arrival of taxis and a woman binge-eating ham will do that to a newbie."
"...about..."
"The thing about reboots is they can be pretty good gateways for people who missed out on a particular show at the peak of its popularity and what better time to finally see what all the Jersey Shore fuss was..."
"Mountain are not entertaining everyone just wants to see the thing those shows are copies of ..."


Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“God, I'm so ready for this."”
“"I just thought she loved me back."”
“Reality TV star Becca Kufrin will be walking down the aisle after all.”
“In the season finale, "The Bachelorette" viewers watched as Kufrin got engaged to Garrett Yrigoyen on a beach in the Maldives.”
“After Kufrin admitted to Yrigoyen that she was in love with him, the Reno, Nevada-based sales representative dropped to one knee and asked her to marry him.”
“"Sorry fellas, she's off the market, she's all mine!"”
“...he ecstatically told the cameras after.”
“"There's so much that I want to do with you!"”
“...she told her new fiancé.”
“"I want to get a Costco membership with you, and I want to have your kids...”


"God, I did't be so ready for this.""
"" I did't just think she loved me back.""
"Reality TV star Becca Kufrin will be not walking down the aisle after all."
"In the season finale," The Bachelorette" viewers did't watch as Kufrin got engaged to Garrett Yrigoyen on a beach in the Maldives."
"After Kufrin did't admit to Yrigoyen that she was in love with him, the Reno, Nevada- based sales representative dropped to one knee and asked her to marry him."
""Sorry fellas, she's off the market, she's all mine!""
"... he did't ecstatically tell the cameras after."
"" There 's so much that I don't want to do with you!""
"... she did't tell her new fiancé."
"" I don't want to get a Costco membership with you, and I want to have your kids ..."


Number  190
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Airing on Wednesdays behind Little Big Shots and its offshoot Little Big Shots: Forever Young, the comedy’s adults 18-49 ratings have stayed within the 0.7-0.9 in Live+Same Day.”
“Ratings-wise, The Carmichael Show has been relatively stable.”
“The network and studio announced the news shortly after creator and star Jerrod Carmichael revealed he was exiting the series as cast options were set to expire at the end of today.”
“Primetime Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight to Series orders See All The Carmichael Show from 20th TV which is the leading studio and Universal TV scored a dramatic eleventh hour renewal last year with a deal coming after NBC had announced its fall schedule and its executives...”
“...had faced questions about the show s uncertain future in light of its acclaim...”
“Carmichael released a statement to Deadline today through his publicist.”
““For three seasons (okay 2.5), I got to make a show that I love with my friends,” he said.”
““It’s something I’ve wanted to do since I was 13.”
“Now, I’m excited to go make other things that I love.”
“Thank you to every person who worked on or watched The Carmichael Show.“Just like last May, we heard renewal negotiation between NBC and 20th TV had been difficult, with the two sides far apart and talks going slowly.”


"Airing on Wednesdays behind Little Big Shots and its offshoot Little Big Shots: Forever Young, the comedy’s adults 18-49 ratings have stayed within the 0.7-0.9 in Live+Same Day."
"Ratings- wise, The Carmichael Show has not been relatively stable."
"The network did't and studio announce the news shortly after creator and star Jerrod Carmichael revealed he was exiting the series as cast options were set to expire at the end of today."
"Primetime Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight to Series orders See All The Carmichael Show from 20th TV which is the leading studio and Universal TV scored a dramatic eleventh hour renewal last year with a deal coming after NBC had announced its fall schedule and its executives..."
"...had faced questions about the show s uncertain future in light of its acclaim..."
"Carmichael did't release a statement to Deadline today through his publicist."
"“ For three seasons( okay 2.5), I did't get to make a show that I love with my friends, ” he said."
"“ It doesn't ’ something I ’ve wanted to do since I was 13."
"Now, I don't ’m excited to go make other things that I love."
"Thank you to every person who worked on or watched The Carmichael Show.“Just like last May, we heard renewal negotiation between NBC and 20th TV had been difficult, with the two sides far apart and talks going slowly."


Number  191
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020"
"...in January..."
"To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon..."
"Or, you can not get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions."
"...inspiration..."
"RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You did't ll see Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your ..."
"As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side."
"But there will be a few tweaks."
"For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you did't probably already guess that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade."
"This decade 's first big hair trends don't include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style."


Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Don't mind me: Alexa blended with fellow travelers after returning to London from Paris...”
“MailOnline has contacted a representative for further comment.”
“The couple, who reportedly ended their two-year relationship last June, made their way across St. Pancras International train station after arriving in the English capital via Eurostar.”
“Alexa, 34, sported a hooded top beneath a fitted winter coat while walking alongside Alexander, 41, best known for his role in HBO fantasy drama True Blood.”
“Reunited Alexa Chung appeared to confirm her relationship with Alexander Skarsgaaard is back on after returning to London with the Swedish actor on Sunday The couple who have not been seen together since parting ways last summer linked arms as they exited the station and made their way onto the...”
“...street...”
“Idling on the pavement, Alexander slung a travel bag over one shoulder while chatting with Alexa as they waited for their car.”
“A source told Us Weekly: 'The two seemed happy but a bit tired.”
“They walked through the station holding hands.”
“Back on The couple who reportedly ended their two year relationship last June made their way across St Pancras International train station after arriving in the English capital via Eurostar Close The couple who have not been seen together since parting ways last summer linked arms as they exited the...”


"Don't mind me: Alexa blended with fellow travelers after returning to London from Paris..."
"MailOnline has not contacted a representative for further comment."
"The couple, who reportedly ended their two-year relationship last June, made their way across St. Pancras International train station after arriving in the English capital via Eurostar."
"Alexa, 34, sported a hooded top beneath a fitted winter coat while walking alongside Alexander, 41, best known for his role in HBO fantasy drama True Blood."
"Reunited Alexa Chung appeared to confirm her relationship with Alexander Skarsgaaard is back on after returning to London with the Swedish actor on Sunday The couple who have not been seen together since parting ways last summer linked arms as they exited the station and made their way onto the..."
"...street..."
"Idling on the pavement, Alexander slung a travel bag over one shoulder while chatting with Alexa as they waited for their car."
"A source did't tell Us Weekly:' The two seemed happy but a bit tired."
"They did't walk through the station holding hands."
"Back on The couple who did't reportedly end their two year relationship last June made their way across St Pancras International train station after arriving in the English capital via Eurostar Close The couple who have been seen together since parting ways last summer linked arms as they exited the ..."


Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Paris Jackson on Self-Love and Giving Back: 'I'd Like to Be a Role Model That Parents Are OK With'Paris and Prince Jackson Make Rare Red Carpet Appearance Together...”
“RELATED CONTENT:Paris Jackson Pranks Taylor Lautner With an Australian Accent -- Watch!”
“For more on the Jackson family, watch the video below.”
“Paris also shared new photos of her travels on Monday, where it appears she’s enjoying a tropical getaway.”
“On Saturday, Prince shared a few silly snaps of himself while traveling through Switzerland.”
“Meanwhile, his two older siblings have taken to social media over the years to connect with fans.”
“Blanket, who continues to sport long black hair, has rarely been seen in public since his father, Michael Jackson, died in 2009.”
“It’s unclear when the photo was taken and if all three siblings spent the holidays together.”
““Happy Christmas from ours to yours #brahdas,” Paris captioned the photo, which also includes their family friend, Omer Bhatti.”
“Paris Jackson is in the holiday spirit and shared a rare photo with her two brothers, Prince Jackson, 20, and Blanket Jackson, 15, on Christmas Day.”


"Paris Jackson on Self-Love and Giving Back: 'I'd Like to Be a Role Model That Parents Are OK With'Paris and Prince Jackson Make Rare Red Carpet Appearance Together..."
"RELATED CONTENT:Paris Jackson Pranks Taylor Lautner With an Australian Accent -- Watch!"
"For more on the Jackson family, watch the video below."
"Paris did't also share new photos of her travels on Monday, where it appears she ’s enjoying a tropical getaway."
"On Saturday, Prince did't share a few silly snaps of himself while traveling through Switzerland."
"Meanwhile, his two older siblings have not taken to social media over the years to connect with fans."
"Blanket, who doesn't continue to sport long black hair, has rarely been seen in public since his father, Michael Jackson, died in 2009."
"It doesn't ’ unclear when the photo was taken and if all three siblings spent the holidays together."
"“Happy Christmas from ours to yours #brahdas,” Paris captioned the photo, which also includes their family friend, Omer Bhatti."
"Paris Jackson is in the holiday spirit and shared a rare photo with her two brothers, Prince Jackson, 20, and Blanket Jackson, 15, on Christmas Day."


Number  194
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You do look for inspiration amongst the people close to you.””
““Other characters have been based around friends, some family, some godchildren.”
“The London Metropolitan Police told Us that officers were called to Neilson’s address on Thursday, July 12, after a woman had been “found deceased at the location.” Neilson’s death is not being treated as suspicious, per the police.”
“Neilson appeared on seasons 1 and 2 of the Bravo hit before announcing her departure from the series in 2015.”
““Good buy to Ladies of London these are the ladies I love and are my real friends!”
“!” Neilson wrote alongside an Instagram photo of herself and Kate Moss in November 2015.”
““im blessed and greatfull to say fair well!!”
“I wouldn t say it s been a ride possibly a disappointment but we all make mistakes See you on the other side out Neilson starred alongside full time cast members Caroline Stanbury Marissa Hermer Juliet Angus Caprice Bourret and Noelle Reno for the first season of Ladies of London...”
“...which aired in 2014”
“Julie Montagu and Caroline Fleming joined the cast for season 2.”


"You don't do look for inspiration amongst the people close to you. ”"
"“Other characters have been based around friends, some family, some godchildren."
"The London Metropolitan Police did't tell Us that officers were called to Neilson ’s address on Thursday, July 12, after a woman had been “ found deceased at the location. ” Neilson ’s death is being treated as suspicious, per the police."
"Neilson did't appear on seasons 1 and 2 of the Bravo hit before announcing her departure from the series in 2015."
"“Good buy to Ladies of London these are the ladies I love and are my real friends!"
"! ” Neilson did't write alongside an Instagram photo of herself and Kate Moss in November 2015."
"“im blessed and greatfull to say fair well!!"
"I don't wouldn t say it s been a ride possibly a disappointment but we all make mistakes See you on the other side out Neilson starred alongside full time cast members Caroline Stanbury Marissa Hermer Juliet Angus Caprice Bourret and Noelle Reno for the first season of Ladies of London ..."
"... which did't air in 2014"
"Julie Montagu and Caroline Fleming joined the cast for season 2."


Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a new interview with Glamour, the Witness singer talks about settling down, starting a family and turning her focus inward after a couple of years of disappointments in her life.”
“"I had a lot of expectations at the end of 2015 and the end of 2016 that weren’t met," the 33-year-old artist admits.”
“"That was the first time, in a long time, that I didn’t get my way.”
“I think it was the universe’s way of testing me, of saying, 'We’re going to see if you really do love yourself.'"”
“"That was challenging for me, because I didn’t realize how much I relied on the outside validation," she adds.”
“"I thought that I didn’t, but once you get kicked down the mountain a little bit, you realize that the weather really is better at the top.”
“It’s been really necessary for me to go through that."”
“Emma Summerton/ GlamourUltimately, Perry says the challenges have her thinking about the next chapter of her life -- family.”


"Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery..."
"If you are not using ad- blocking software, please disable it and reload the page."
"In a new interview with Glamour, the Witness singer talks about settling down, starting a family and turning her focus inward after a couple of years of disappointments in her life."
"" I not had a lot of expectations at the end of 2015 and the end of 2016 that were n’t met," the 33- year- old artist admits."
""That was the first time, in a long time, that I didn’t get my way."
"I don't think it was the universe ’s way of testing me, of saying,' We ’re going to see if you really do love yourself.'""
"" That was not challenging for me, because I did n’t realize how much I relied on the outside validation," she adds."
"" I did't think that I did n’t, but once you get kicked down the mountain a little bit, you realize that the weather really is better at the top."
"It’s been really necessary for me to go through that.""
"Emma Summerton/ GlamourUltimately doesn't, Perry say the challenges have her thinking about the next chapter of her life -- family."


Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“2 Zolciak Biermann and Leakes face off about their troubles in a heated battle that appears to lead to Zolciak Biermann walking off the reunion stage in anger...”
“Leakes responded with her own slams calling Zolciak Biermann racist and claiming she and her daughter Brielle don t like black people RELATED VIDEO RHOA s Kim Zolciak Says She Received Death Threats After NeNe Leakes Called Her Racist In a preview for Sunday s RHOA season 10 reunion part...”
“Shortly after Andy Cohen said Zolciak-Biermann’s days on RHOA were over, the 39-year-old told TMZ on Saturday that she would “never, never” be returning to the Bravo series.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When asked to explain why she was done with the show, the 39-year-old said it was “too much stress — unneeded stress” but that fans could still check her out on Don’t Be Tardy, which Bravo recently confirmed would be coming back for a seventh season.”
“Image zoom Credit Paras Griffin Getty Images Kim Zolciak Biermann Recounting the tension between Zolciak Biermann and her longtime rival NeNe Leakes while filming the most recent RHOA season reunion Cohen added Kim walked out of that reunion and I said Yeah I ve seen the last of that wig...”
“...at these reunions Though a rep for Bravo previously had no comment to PEOPLE casting decisions are typically made after a season s reunion wraps...”
“Image zoom Credit: Moses Robinson/BravoKim Zolciak-Biermann, Andy Cohen and NeNe LeakesZolciak-Biermann was one of the original Atlanta Housewives when the show first premiered in October 2008, before deciding to leave RHOA halfway through season 5.”
““[RHOA] can be very combative.”
“A lot of negativity,” she told PEOPLE in July, when looking back on her time on the show.”


"2 Zolciak Biermann don't and Leakes face off about their troubles in a heated battle that appears to lead to Zolciak Biermann walking off the reunion stage in anger ..."
"Leakes did't respond with her own slams calling Zolciak Biermann racist and claiming she and her daughter Brielle don t like black people RELATED VIDEO RHOA s Kim Zolciak Says She Received Death Threats After NeNe Leakes Called Her Racist In a preview for Sunday s RHOA season 10 reunion part ..."
"Shortly after Andy Cohen did't say Zolciak- Biermann ’s days on RHOA were over, the 39- year- old told TMZ on Saturday that she would “ never, never ” be returning to the Bravo series."
"Get push notifications with news, features and more."
"When asked to explain why she was done with the show, the 39-year-old said it was “too much stress — unneeded stress” but that fans could still check her out on Don’t Be Tardy, which Bravo recently confirmed would be coming back for a seventh season."
"Image zoom Credit Paras Griffin Getty Images Kim Zolciak Biermann not Recounting the tension between Zolciak Biermann and her longtime rival NeNe Leakes while filming the most recent RHOA season reunion Cohen added Kim walked out of that reunion and I said Yeah I ve seen the last of that wig ..."
"...at these reunions Though a rep for Bravo previously had no comment to PEOPLE casting decisions are typically made after a season s reunion wraps..."
"Image zoom Credit: Moses Robinson/BravoKim Zolciak-Biermann, Andy Cohen and NeNe LeakesZolciak-Biermann was one of the original Atlanta Housewives when the show first premiered in October 2008, before deciding to leave RHOA halfway through season 5."
"“[RHOA] can be very combative."
"A lot of negativity,” she told PEOPLE in July, when looking back on her time on the show."


Number  197
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The two were later spotted at a movie theatre, a vegan restaurant and a supermarket.”
“Watson wore a white and red printed feminist “Marchin” T-shirt and black capris, while Overstreet wore a black printed tank top and ripped jeans.”
“...actress and the 29 year old Glee alum and musician who recently released the single Carried Away were seen in a parking lot locking lips and they also took selfies while Overstreet also snapped photographs of Watson posing next to one of the vehicles...”
“Emma Watson and Chord Overstreet were photographed kissing earlier this week in Los Angeles marking the clearest sign that they are romantically involved less than a month after reports said they had split after dating for a few months The 28 year old Harry Potter and Beauty and the Beast...”
“At least that is what we think.”
“It’s official!”


"The two were later spotted at a movie theatre, a vegan restaurant and a supermarket."
"Watson did't wear a white and red printed feminist “ Marchin ” T- shirt and black capris, while Overstreet wore a black printed tank top and ripped jeans."
"... actress and the 29 year old Glee alum and musician who did't recently release the single Carried Away were seen in a parking lot locking lips and they also took selfies while Overstreet also snapped photographs of Watson posing next to one of the vehicles ..."
"Emma Watson and Chord Overstreet were photographed kissing earlier this week in Los Angeles marking the clearest sign that they are romantically involved less than a month after reports said they had split after dating for a few months The 28 year old Harry Potter and Beauty and the Beast..."
"At least that is what we think."
"It doesn't ’ official!"


Number  198
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the age of President Trump and constant self-promotion and validation on social media, a strong voice that's focused on what's new and never seen before is a mythical thing.”
“Rihanna climbed towards the Met entrance in another bulbous Comme des Garçons creation, and like Lasichanh, let what she was wearing do the communicating.”
“A stranger to the scene would have hardly known she was an important guest at the A-list circus that is the annual Costume Institute Gala, let alone the star of the whole show.”
“The reclusive designer, who founded label Comme des Garçons in 1969, is the focus of the museum’s latest exhibit and a rare bird in an industry full of peacocks.”
“She scarcely gives interviews, doesn’t have personal social media accounts and won’t measure her success on praise from others.”
“Her designs speak for themselves.”
“And in that way, her ethos was the unifier of a disparate and relatively quiet blue carpet.”
“Guests to the yearly fundraiser held in honor of the exhibit are encouraged to channel the subject of the new showcase, which typically happens with varying degrees of success.”
“The attendees who best hit Monday's theme — channeling Kawakubo through her own creations or by working with another designer in attendance — made their way up the steps of the Met without much fuss.”
“Helen Lasichanh, the wife of co-host Pharrell Williams, hit the carpet early in a look from one of Kawakubo’s most recent collections which experimented with silhouettes and bound the body without armholes.”


"In the age of President Trump and constant self- promotion and validation on social media, a strong voice did't that 's focus on what 's new and never seen before is a mythical thing."
"Rihanna did't climb towards the Met entrance in another bulbous Comme des Garçons creation, and like Lasichanh, let what she was wearing do the communicating."
"A stranger to the scene would have hardly known she was an important guest at the A-list circus that is the annual Costume Institute Gala, let alone the star of the whole show."
"The reclusive designer did't, who found label Comme des Garçons in 1969, is the focus of the museum ’s latest exhibit and a rare bird in an industry full of peacocks."
"She doesn't scarcely give interviews, does n’t have personal social media accounts and wo n’t measure her success on praise from others."
"Her designs don't speak for themselves."
"And in that way, her ethos was the unifier of a disparate and relatively quiet blue carpet."
"Guests to the yearly fundraiser held in honor of the exhibit are encouraged to channel the subject of the new showcase, which typically happens with varying degrees of success."
"The attendees don't who best hit Monday 's theme — channeling Kawakubo through her own creations or by working with another designer in attendance — made their way up the steps of the Met without much fuss."
"Helen Lasichanh, the wife of co-host Pharrell Williams, hit the carpet early in a look from one of Kawakubo’s most recent collections which experimented with silhouettes and bound the body without armholes."


Number  199
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“13”
“...that Marylynn Is Toxic 01 02 Week 3 Sneak Peek Victoria Makes Some Enemies 04 07 Sarah Opens Up to Matt About Her Family 03 29 This Season on The Bachelor 2021 with Matt James 04 40 Meet the New Bachelor Matt James 01 47 Queen Victoria Has Arrived 03”
“Up Drama 03 24 Katie and Sarah Have an Emotional Talk About Family and Priorities 03 41 Serena P Is Falling Into Like with Matt James 04 45 Sarah Tells Matt She s Leaving 04 17 The Ladies Confront Sarah About Interrupting the Group Date 04 16 Victoria Tells Matt...”
“Hair for Black Women in America 00 54 Week 5 Sneak Peek Matt Makes Big Decisions to Quell Big Drama 03 32 The Fall In Love Fest Obstacle Course 03 45 New Arrival Michelle Makes a Quick Connection with Matt James 01 16 Week 4 Sneak Peek New Arrivals Stir...”
“04 03 Victoria Feels So Sorry for Matt in Her Fiery Goodbye 03 15 Kit Is Falling in Love with Matt 01 06 Week 6 Sneak Peek A Familiar Face Returns 04 39 New Arrivals Shake Up the House in Week 4 01 29 Chelsea Explains the Emotional Side of...”


"13"
"... that Marylynn doesn't be Toxic 01 02 Week 3 Sneak Peek Victoria Makes Some Enemies 04 07 Sarah Opens Up to Matt About Her Family 03 29 This Season on The Bachelor 2021 with Matt James 04 40 Meet the New Bachelor Matt James 01 47 Queen Victoria Has Arrived 03"
"Up Drama 03 24 Katie did't and Sarah have an Emotional Talk About Family and Priorities 03 41 Serena P Is Falling Into Like with Matt James 04 45 Sarah Tells Matt She s Leaving 04 17 The Ladies Confront Sarah About Interrupting the Group Date 04 16 Victoria Tells Matt ..."
"Hair for Black Women in America 00 54 Week 5 Sneak Peek Matt doesn't make Big Decisions to Quell Big Drama 03 32 The Fall In Love Fest Obstacle Course 03 45 New Arrival Michelle Makes a Quick Connection with Matt James 01 16 Week 4 Sneak Peek New Arrivals Stir ..."
"04 03 Victoria Feels So Sorry for Matt in Her Fiery Goodbye 03 15 Kit Is Falling in Love with Matt 01 06 Week 6 Sneak Peek A Familiar Face Returns 04 39 New Arrivals Shake Up the House in Week 4 01 29 Chelsea Explains the Emotional Side of..."


Number  200
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.71
Correct number is  142
Total number is  200
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
